Google 



This is a digital copy of a book that was preserved for generations on Hbrary shelves before it was carefully scanned by Google as part of a project 

to make the world's books discoverable online. 

It has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one that was never subject 

to copyright or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 

are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often difficult to discover. 

Marks, notations and other maiginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 

publisher to a library and finally to you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud to partner with libraries to digitize public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order to keep providing this resource, we liave taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial parties, including placing technical restrictions on automated querying. 
We also ask that you: 

+ Make non-commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request that you use these files for 
personal, non-commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain fivm automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort to Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attributionTht GoogXt "watermark" you see on each file is essential for informing people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use, remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 
countries. Whether a book is still in copyright varies from country to country, and we can't offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liabili^ can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through the full text of this book on the web 

at |http : //books . google . com/| 



« « 



The Class Struggle 



(ERFURT PROGRAM) 



By KARL KAUTSKY 
Translated by WILLIAM E BOHN. 



« •• 



CHICAGO 
CHARLES H. KERR & COMPANY 

1910 



1 J !^r>.*?^^ 



Copyright, 1910 
By Charles H. Kerr & Company 



4 • 






too ^ •- 

• - V " 

« «• «. w 

w >- >- *• 

» ^ >- >- 



w ^ *' 



W V 




PBm8(0F 

JOHN F. HIQGINS 

CHICAGO 



I 



TRANSLATOR'S NOTE. 

At Erfurt, in 1891, the Congress of the G erm aa 
Sgeial^emoct^^jadopted a new program. The 
following year Karl Kautsky published Das Er- 
furt er Program . This work turned out to be ' 
more than a mere exposition of the new state- ■ 
ment of principles. In his preface the author ex- 
plained that it was designed to fill the gap be- 
tween propaganda pamphlets on the one side 
and special monographs on the other. It was at 
once scientific a nd populan it contained a system - 
atic survey of Socialist thought and was, never- 
theless, of sufficiently modest dimensions to be 
available for the average person's use. 

In 1904, in the introduction to the fifth edition, 
the author stated that the Erfurt Program re- 
mained in all essential particulars an accurate 
statement of the principles of the German Social 
Democracy . Hence, his work demanded iio fun- 
damental revision. It may he added that the pro- 
gram adopted at Erfurt nineteen years ago is still 
valid, not only for the German Social Democ- 
racy, but, with comparatively unimportant modi- 
fications, for the i nternational Socialist move- 
ment. Therefore, this book of Karl Kautsky's 



4 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

remains in a sense the most authoritative expo- 
sition of the principles underiying that move- 
ment. 

The following translation is based on the 
eighth German edition (1907). It is as exact a 
rendering in English as could be compressed into 
two-thirds of the space occupied by the original. 
The passages omitted consist chiefly of illustra- 
tive material. The author's argument, his state- 
ment of principles, has nowhere been tampered 

with. 

W. E. B. 




CONTENTS. 

Chapter Page 

^H^^ The Passing of Small Production 

^^^H 1. Small Production and Private Property, 9 

^^^^^1 2. Commodities and Capital 10 

^^^r 3, The Capitalist Method of Production , . 13 
I 4. The Death-Struggle of Small Produc- 
tion 16 

)U. The Proletariat 

H 1. From Apprentice to Proletarian 18 

H 2. Wages 23 

^H 3. Dissolution of the Proletarian Family. 26 

^B 4. Prostitution 27 

^B 5. The Industrial Reserve Army 29 
^B 6. The Increase of the Proletariat ; Mer- 

V cantile and Educated Proletariat 35 
In The Capitalist Class 

1. Commerce and Credit 43 

2. Division of Labor and Competition 48 

^^^ 3. Profit. 52 

^^K 4. Rent 53 

^^^B f 5. Taxes 55 

^^V^ye. The Falling Off of the Rate of Profit. . 58 
^^^^H T. The Growth of Large Production; Syn- 

^^^^H dicates and Trusts 62 

^^H| NC Industrial Crises 71 

^^M ^*-P. Chronic Over- Production 81 

IV. TjE Commonwealth of the Futuke 

Social Reform and Social Revolution.. 88 
Private Property and Common Prop- 
erty. M 




3. Socialist Production 

4. The Economic Significance of the State. 1 

5. State Socialism and the Social Democ- 

6. The Structure of the Future State I 

7. The "Abolition of the Family" 1. 

8. Confiscation of Properly 1. 

9. Division of Products in the Future 

State 1, 

10. Socialism and Freedom t 

The Class Stbugclb 

1. Socialism and the Propertjr-HoIilmG: 

Classes 1. 

2. Servants and Menials.,... 1 

3. The Slums li 

4. The Beginnings of the Wage-Earning 

Proletariat 1. 

5. The Advance of the Wage -Earning 

Proletariat 1! 

6. The Conflict Between the Elevating and 

Degrading Tendencies which Affect 

the Proletariat I, 

7. Philanthropy and Labor Legislation.,.. 1 

8. The Labor Union Movement 1 

ft The Political Struggle ..•,.. 1. 

la The Labor Party 

11. The Labor Movement and Socialism... 
li The Socialist Party— Union of the 

Labor Movement and Socialism 

13. The International Character of the So- 

cialist Movement 

14. The Socialist Party and the Pec 




The Class Struggle. 

i THE PASSING OF SMALL PRODUC- 
TION. 

' 1. Small Prodiiction and Private Property. 

The program adopted by the German Social 
Democracy at Erfurt in 1891 divides itself into 
two parts. In the first place it outlines the funda- 
mental principles on which Socialism is based, 
and in the second it enumerates the demands 
which the Social Democracy makes of present 
day society. The first part tells what Socialists 
believe ; the second how they propose to make 
their belief effective. 

We shall concern ourselves only with the first 
of these parts. This again separates itself into 
three divisions: (1) an analysis of present day 
society and its development; (2) the objects of 
the Social Democracy; (3) the means which are 
to lead to the realization of these objects. 

The first section of the program reads as fol- 
lows: "Production on a small scale is based on 
' the ownership of the means of production by 
the laborer. The economic development of bour- 
geois society leads necessarily to the overthrow 
of this form of production. It separates the 
worker from his tools and changes him into a 
propertyless proletarian. The means of produc- 
tion become more and more the monopoly of a 
comparatively small number of capitalists and . 
landholders. 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

"Along with this monopolizing of the means^ 
production goes the crowding out and scattering 
of small production, the development of the tool 
into the machine, and a marvelous increase in 
the productivity of labor. But all the advantages 
of this transfontiation are monopolized by capj 
italists and landholders. For the proletariat and 
the disappearing middle class — the small busi- 
ness men and farmers — it means increasing un- 
certainty of subsistence; it means misery, op- 
pression, servitude, degradation and exploitation, 

"Forever greater grows the number of prole- 
tarians, more gigantic the array of superfluous 
laborers, and sharper the opposition between ^y- 
ploiters and exploited. The class-struggle be- 
tween the bourgeoisie and proletariat is the com- 
mon mark of all industrial countries ; it divides 
modern society into two opposing camps and the 
warfare between them constantly increases in bit- 
terness. 

"The abyss between propertied and property- 
less is further widened by industrial crises.* 
These have their causes in the capitalist system 
antl, as the system develops, naturally occur on an 
increasing sca'e. They make universal uncer- 
tainty the norma! condition of society and so 
prove thit our power of production has got be- 
yond our control, that private ownership of the 
means of production has become irreconcilable 
with their effective ase and complete develop- 
ment." 

Many a man thinks he has given proof of wis- 
dom when he says, "Thff» > 'w<fh"tT(f few under 



THE PASSING OF SMALL PRODUCTION 

the sun." There is nothing more false. Modern 
science shows that nothing is stationary, that in 
society, just as in external nature, a continuous 
development is discoverable. 

On the nature of this social development is 
based the theory of Socialism. No one can un- 
derstand the one without study of the other. 

We know that primitive man lived, like the 
animals, on whatever nature happened to offer. 
But in the course of time he began to devise 
tools. He became fisher, hunter, herdsman, 
finally fanner and craftsman. This development 
was constantly accelerated, until today we can 
see it going on before our eyes and mark its 
stages. And still there are those who solemnly 
proclaim that there is nothing new under the sun, 

A people's way of getting a living depends on 
its means of production — on the nature of its 
tools and raw materials. But men have never 
carried on production separately ; always, on the 
contrary, in larger or smaller societies. And the 
varying forms of these societies have depended 
on the manner of production. The development 
of society, therefore, corresponds to a develop- 
ment of the manner of production. 

The forms of society and the relations of its 
members are intimately connected with the forms 
of property which it maintains. Hand in hand 
with the development of production goes a de- 
velopment of property. So long as labor was 
performed with comparatively simple tools which 
each laborer could possess, it went without saying 
that he owned the product of his toil. But as the 
means of production have changed, this notion 
of property right has passed a>NVj . 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

We shall examine the course of development 
liich has brought this about. 

2. Commodities and Capital. 

The beginnings of capitalist society are to be 
found in agriculture and handicraft 

Originally the agricultural family satisfied all 
of its own needs. It produced all the food, 
clothing and tools for its own members and built 
its own house. It produced as much as it needed 
and no more. With the advance in the methods 
of farming, however, it came about that more 
was produced than enough to satisfy the imme- 
diate needs of the family. This placed the family 
in a position to purchase weapons, tools or 
articles of luxury, which it could not produce 
itself. Through this exchange products became 
commodities. 

A commodity is a product designed for ex- 
change. The wheat the farmer produces for his 
own consumption is not a commodity ; the wheat 
he produces to sell is a commodity. Selling is 
nothing more nor less than trading a commodity 
for another which is acceptable to all, gold, for 
example. 

Now the craftsman working independently is 
a producer of commodities from the beginning. 
He does not sell merely his surplus products ; pro- 
duction for sale is his main purpose. 

Exchange of commodities implies two condi- 
tions: first, a division of social labor; second, 
private ownership of the things exchanged. The 
more this division develops and the more private 
prt^erty increases in extent and importance, the 



THE PASSING OF SMALL PRODUCTION 

more general becomes production for exchange. 

This leads naturally to the appearance of a 
new trade; buying and selling becomes a busi- 
ness. Those engaged in it make their living by 
selling dearer than they buy. This does not mean 
that they control prices absolutely. The price of 
a commodity depends finally on its exchange 
value. The value of a commodity, however, is 
determined by the amount of labor generally re- 
quired to produce it. The price of a commodity, 
nevertheless, seldom coincides exactly with its 
value; it is determined by the conditions of the 
market more than by the conditions of produc- 
tion — primarily by the relation of supply and de- 
mand. 

The farmer or craftsman buys for consump-t 
tion, the tradesman buys to sell. Now money 
used for this latter purpose is capital. One can- 
not say of any commodity or sum of money 
that by its very nature it is capital. That depends 
on the use to which it is put. The tobacco a 
merchant buys to sell is capital; that which he 
buys to smoke is not. 

The original form of capital is merchant's cap- 
ital. Almost equally old is interest-bearing cap- 
ital, the profits of which are in the form of inter- 
est. As soon as these forms of capital have been 
developed, private property becomes something 
quite different from what it was in the beginning. 
Defenders of the present system try to distract 
attention from this aspect of property by talking 
constantly of the forms necessary to the begin- 
nings of society. They attempt to prevent our 
seeing any difference between the ownership of 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

E home and the ownership of a branch of i 
dustry. 

At the stage of economic development now 
under discussion the income of the craftsman 
or laborer depends somewhat on his industry 
and skill. But it can never go beyond a fixed 
limit. That of the tradesman, however, is de- 
termined only by the amount of his capital. The 
possibilities of labor are limited; those of capi- 
tal are unlimited. 

So we have here a condition that would nat- 
urally lead to social development. We started 
with a society in which each owned certain means 
of production; in which, therefore, the indi- 
viduals were approximately equal. The natural 
limitations of the income from labor and the lack 
of similar limitations of the income from capital 
would naturally tend to bring about a condition 
of inequality. But there is still another element 
of the situation to be taken into account. 

Private property in the means of production 
implies for everyone the possibility of coming 
into possession of them, but it implies also the 
possibility of losing possession. That is, the 
craftsman may fall into absolute poverty. The 
existence of interest-bearing capital implies the 
existence of want. One who has what he needs 
will not borrow. By exploiting want, capital 
constantly increases it. 

Here we have, then, the beginnings of mod- 
em conditions. Some "make" money without 
producing; others produce and remain in pov- 
erty. It is true that the evils of the system are 
not yet quite clear, The capitalist is dependent 



THE PASSING OF SMALL PRODUCTION 13 

2 prosperity of the farmer and craftsman; 
his interest does not he in dispossessing them 
entirely. Whole classes are not driven into pov- 
erty. Therefore poverty is regarded as a visita- 
tion of Providence, or as the result of shiftless- 
ness or carelessness. 

This way of looking at things is still common 
among the small capitalist class, and representa- 
tives of the present system, editors, lecturers, 
etc., strive to maintain popular faith in it. Pri- 
vate property in the means of production was 
once necessary to the good of society ; there 
was a time when the average man had a chance 
to own property. This condition of affairs, they 
would have us believe, still exists. But in reality 
the nature of private property has changed. The 
old conditions have passed away absolutely. 
How this came about we are now to see. 

3. The Capitalist Method of ProductUm. 

In the course of the Middle Ages the handi- 
crafts developed steadily. There was a great in- 
crease in the division of labor — e. g., weaving 
divided into woolen weaving, linen weaving, etc. 
There was also increase in skill and improvement 
in tools. Simultaneouly there came about a de- 
velopment of trade, especially as a result of im- 
proved means of transportation by water. 

Four hundred years ago the handicrafts were 
at their height. This was an eventful time in 
the history of commerce. The waterway to 
India came into use and America was discov- 
ered, with its endless supplies of gold and silver. 
A flood of wealth inundated Europe, w«.i!^ 



14 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

which the European adventurers had scooped up "^ 
by means of barter, deceit and robbery. The 
lion's share of this wealth fell to the tradesmen 
able to fit out ships with bold, unscrupulous 
crews. 

At the same time there came into being the 
modern state, the centralized official and mili- 
tary state, at first an absolute monarchy. This 
state met the demands of the rising capitalist 
class and depended on it for support. The mod- 
em state, the state of developed commodity- 
production, draws its power, not from personal 
service, but from its financial income. The 
monarchs had, therefore, every reason to pro- 
tect and favor the capitalists who brought money 
into the country. In return the capitahsts lent 
money to the monarchs, made debtors of them 
and put them in the position of dependents. This 
enabled them more and more to force the political 
and mihtary power into their service. The state 
was obliged to improve means of communica- 
tion, take over colonies and carry on wars in 
the interest of capital. 

Our text-books on economics tell us that the 
beginning of capital is to be found in thrift. But 
we have learned that its origin was an altogether 
different one. Colonial policies were the chief 
sources of wealth open to capitalist nations ; i. e., 
capital was drawn from plundering of foreign 
lands, from piracy, smuggling, slave-trading and 
war. Even down into the nineteenth century 
history shows us plenty of examples of this 
"thrift." And "thrifty" trades-people found in 
the state itself a powerful ally in this sort of 
"saving." 



THE PASSING OF SMALL PRODUCTION 



15 



tut newly discovered lands and commercial 
routes did more than bring wealth to the mer- 
chants ; they opened up a new market for the sea- 
going nations of Europe, especially England, 
Handicraft was unable to satisfy the rapidly in- 
creasing demands of this market. These demands 
were on a large scale ; production had to proceed 
on a large scale. That is, the market demanded 
a form of production which could and would 
adapt itself to the demand; in other words, a 
form absolutely in command of the merchants. 

The merchants naturally found it to their in- 
terest to satisfy the demand of this new market; 
and they had the money to purchase the neces- 
sary means, raw materials, tools, factories and 
labor. But where was this last to come from? 
So long as a man owns tools of his own and can 
produce with them, he will not sell himself to 
another. Fortunately for the merchant, rural 
laborers were being driven from the soil. The 
landlords wanted their share of the new pros- 
perity, therefore they enlarged their scale of pro- 
duction and demanded a larger proportion of the 
product. So agricultural laborers were forced to 
the doors of the new-built factories. 

Thus the foundations of capitalist industry 
were laid by means of expropriation, by means of 
a revolution as bloody as any in history. 

The separation of great masses of workers 
from the means of production, their transforma- 
tion into propertyless proletarians, was a condi- 
tion necessary to capitalist production. Economic 
development made the change inevitable. But 
the rising classes were not content to sit by atu 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

watch the course of events; they resorted to V 
lence to accelerate the change. It was through 
violence of the most brutal, repulsive kind that 
capitalist society was ushered in. 

4. The Deatta-Strugglc of Small Production. 

At first the new system differed but little from 
the old so far as external appearance was con- 
cerned. The capitalist delivered raw material to 
his hired workers and collected from them the 
finished product. Later he found it advan- 
tageous to gather them in a large building called 
a factory. 

As soon as workers produced together in a 
factory, it was discovered that a division of labor 
increased the profits. Gradually systems of pro- 
duction became so developed that each operative 
had to make but a single motion or perform a. 
single operation. That is, the laborer had been 
reduced to the level of a machine. Only one step 
remained — to replace him with a machine, and 
that step was soon taken. It was made possible 
by the development of science — and especially by 
the application of steam-power to industrial proc- 
esses. The introduction of machinery meant an 
industrial revolution. With this change economic 
development became the triumphant march of 
capitalism. 

Between 1770 and I7S9 the first practical ma- 
chines were introduced into the English textile 
industry. The steam engine was invented at the 
same time. From that period on the machine 
conquered one branch of industry after another 
and one country after another. It has placed it 



THE PASSING OF SMALL PRODUCTION 17 

in the power of a factory operative to do the 
work of several hundred handicraftsmen. 

Under these conditions the factory rules, and 
the days of handicraft, of independent produc- 
tion, are numbered. What remains is carried on 
chiefly by unfortunates who cannot find places 
in the factory system. 



II. THE PROLETARIAT. 



1. From Apprentice 



i Proletarian. 



We have seen that the capitalist system of pro- 
duction implies the separation of the laborer from 
the means of production. On the one side there 
is the capitalist, who owns the machine, and on 
the other the proletarian, who does the work. 

Originally it took forcible methods to secure 
the supply of proletarians necessary to this sys- 
tem. Today, however, such methods are no 
longer necessary. The economic power of the 
system has become sufficient to accomplish the 
desired result without breaking the law of pri- 
vate property. In fact, it is by the operation of 
this law that every year a sufficient number of 
farmers and independent craftsmen are given the 
choice between starvation and work in the fac- 
tories. 

That the number of the proletariat is steadily 
on the increase is such a palpable fact that no 
one attempts to deny it, not even those who would 
make us believe that society today rests on the 
same basis as it did a hundred years ago, and 
who try to paint the picture of the small pro- 
ducer in rosy colors. Indeed a change has taken 
place in the make-up of society, just as it has in 
the system of production. The capitalist form 
of production has overthrown all others, and be- 
come the dominant one in the field of industry; 
■ nilarly wage-labor is today the dominant form 



THE PROLETAKIAT 19 

of labor. A hundred years ago the farming 
peasantry took the first place ; later, the small city 
industrialists; today it is the wage-earner. 

In all civilized countries the proletarians are 
today the largest class; it is their condition and 
modes of thought that tend to control those of 
all the other divisions of labor. This implies a 
complete revolution in the condition and thought 
of the bulk of the population. The conditions 
of the proletariat differ radically from those of all 
former categories of labor. The small farmer, 
the artisan, the small producers generally, were 
the owners of the product of their labor by rea- 
son of their ownership of the means of produc- 
tion. The product of the labor of the proletarian 
does not belong to him, it belongs to the capitalist, 
to the owner of the requisite instruments of pro- 
duction. True enough, the proletarian is paid by 
the capitalist, but the value of his wages is far 
below that of his product. 

When the capitalist in industry purchases the 
only commodity which the proletarian can offer 
for sale, that is, his labor-power, he does so for 
the sole purpose of utilizing it in a profitable 
way. The more the working-man produces, the 
larger the value of his product. If the capitalist 
were to work his employes only long enough to 
produce the worth of the wages he pays them, 
he would clear no profits. But his capital cries 
for profits and finds in him a willing listener. 
The longer the time is extended during which the 
workmen labor in the service of the capitalists, 
over and above the time needed to cover their 
wages, the larger is the value of thcw ■^\';ifei!A.,'C»R. 



L laboi 

k poist 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

larger is the surplus over and aix)ve the capita 
outlay in wages, and the larger is the per cent of 
exploitation to which these workmen are subject- 
ed. This exploitation of labor finds a limit only 
in the powers of endurance of the working people 
and in the resistance they may be able to offer to 
their exploiters. 

In capitalist production, the capitalist and the 
wage-earner are not fellow-workers, as were the 
employer and employed in previous industrial 
epochs. The capitalist soon develops into, and re- 
mains, essentially a merchant. His activity, in so 
far as he is at all active, hmits itself, like that of 
the merchant, to the operations of the market. 
His labors consist in purchasing as cheaply as 
possible the raw material, labor power and other 
essentials, and selling the finished products as 
dearly as possible. Upon the field of produc- 
tion itself he does nothing except to secure the 
largest quantity of labor from the workmen for 
the least possible amount of wages, and thereby to 
squeeze out of them the largest possible quantity 
of surplus values. In his relation to his employes 
he is not a fellow-worker, he is only a driver and 
exploiter. The longer they work, the better off 
he is ; he is not tired out if the hours of labor are 
unduly extended; he does not perish if the meth- 
od of production becomes a murderous one. The 
capitalist is vastly more reckless of the life and 
safety of his operatives than the master-workman 
of former times. Extension of the hours of la- 
bor, abolition of holidays, introduction of night 
labor, damp and overheated factories filled with 
poisonous gases, such are the "improvements" 



THE PROLETAHIAT 

which the capitalist mode of production has in- 
troduced for the benefit of the working-class. 

The introduction of machinery increases still 
further the danger to life and limb for the work- 
ing-man. The machine system fetters him to a 
monster that moves perpetually with a gigantic 
power and with insane speed. Only the closest, 
never-flagging attention can protect the working- 
man attached to such a machine from being seized 
and broken by it. Protective devices cost money ; 
the capitalist does not introduce them unless he is 
forced to do it. Economy being the much vaunt- 
ed virtue of the capitalist, he is constrained by it 
to save room and to squeeze as much machinery 
as possible into the workshop. What cares he 
that the limbs of his working-men are thereby 
endangered? Working-men are cheap, but large, 
airy workshops are dear. 

There is still another respect in which the capi- 
talist employment of machinery lowers the condi- 
tion of the working-class. It is this: the tool of 
the mechanic of former times was cheap and it 
was subject to few changes that would render it 
useless. It is otherwise with the machine; in the 
first place, it costs money, much money; in the 
second place, if through improvements in the sys- 
tem it becomes useless, or if it is not used to its 
full capacity, it will bring loss instead of profit to 
the capitaHst. Again, the machine is worn out, 
not only through use, but through idleness. Fur- 
thermore, the introduction of science into produc- 
tion constantly causes new discoveries and inven- 
tions to take the place of the old ones. So, be- 
cause they cannot compete with the improved 



22 THE CXASS STRUGGLE 

machinery, now this machine, now that, and oft* a 
whole factories at once, are rendered usekss "be- 
fore they have been used to their fuU extent. 
Therefore, every macliine is in danger of being 
made useless before it is used up; this is suffi- 
cient ground for the capitahst to utilize his ma- 
chine as quickly as possible from the moment he 
puts it in operation. In other words, the capital- 
ist application of the system of machinery is a 
spur that drives the capitalist to extend the hours 
of labor as much as possible, to carry on produc- 
tion without interruption, to introduce the system 
of night and day shifts, and, accordingly, to make 
of the unwholesome night work a permanent sys- 
tem. 

At the time the system of machinery began to 
develop, some idealists declared the golden age 
was at hand; the machine was to release the 
working-man and render him free. In the hands 
of the capitalist, however, the machine has made 
the burden of labor unbedrable. 

But in the matter of wages, also, the condition 
of the wage-earner is worse than that of the me- 
dieval apprentice. The proletarian, the workman 
of today, does not eat at the table of the capital- 
ist ; he does not hve in the same house. However 
wretched his home may be, however miserable 
his food, nay, even though he famish, the well- 
being of the capitalist is not disturbed by the 
sickening sight. The words wages and starva- 
tion used to be mutually exclusive; the free 
working-man formerly could star\'e only when 
he had no work. Whoever worked earned wages, 
he had enough to eat, starvation was not his lot. 



THE PSOLETAHIAT 23 

For the capitalist system was reserved the un- 
enviable distinction of reconciling these two op- 
posites — wages and starvation — raising starva- 
tion-wages into a pennanent institution, even into 
a prop of the present social system, 

2. Wages. 

Wages can never rise so high as to make it im- 
possible for the capitalist to carry on his business 
and to hve from the profits of it; under such 
circumstances it would be more profitable for the 
capitalist to give up his business. Consequently, 
the wages of the working-man can never risd 
high enough to equal the value of his products 
They must always be below that, so as to leave a 
surplus; it is only the prospect of a surplus that 
moves the capitalist to purchase labor power. It 
is therefore evident that under the capitalist sys- 
tem the wages of the workmen can never rise 
high enough to put an end to the exploitation of 
labor. 

The surplus which the capitalist class appro- 
priates is larger than is usually imagined. It cov- 
ers not only the profits of the manufacturer, but 
many other items that are usually credited to the 
cost of production and exchange. It covers, for 
instance, rent, interest on loans, salaries, mer- 
chant's profits, taxes, etc. All these have to be 
subtracted from the surplus, that is, the excess 
of the value of the product over the wages of the 
working-man. It is evident that this surplus must 
be a considerable one if a concern is to "pay." 
It is clear that the wages of the working-man 
cannot rise high enough to be even approximately 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

equal to the value of his profit. The capitalist 
system means under all circumstances the ex- 
ploitation of the wage-workers. It is impossible 
Mo abolish this exploitation without abolishing the 
■ system itself. And the exploitation must be great 
( even where wages are high. 

But wages rarely reach the highest point which 
even these circumstances would permit ; more of- 
ten they are found to be nearer to the lowest pos- 
sible point. This point is reached when the 
wages do not supply the workman with even the 
barest necessities. When the workman not only 
starves, but starves rapidly, all work is at an 
end. 

The wages swing between these two extremes. 
The less the necessities of the workman, the 
larger the supply of labor on the market, and 
the slighter the capacity of the working-man for 
resistance, the lower wages sink. 

In general, wages must be high enough to 
keep the working-man in a condition to work, or, 
to speak more accurately, they must be high 
enough to secure to the capitalist the measure of 
labor-power which he needs. In other words, 
wages must be high enough, not only to keep the 
working-men in a condition to work, but also in 
a condition to produce children to replace them. 

Now industrial development exhibits a ten- 
dency, most pleasing to the capitalist, to lower 
the necessities of the working-man and to de- 
crease his wages in proportion. 

There was a time when skill and strength were 
requisites for a working-man. The period of ap- 
prenticeship was long, the cost of training con- 



THE PROLETAHIAT 

sWerable. Now, however, the progress made in 
the division of labor and Uie introduction of ma- 
chinery render skill and strength in production 
more and more superfluous; they make it possi- 
ble to substitute unskilled and cheap workmen 
for skilled ones; and, consequently, to put weak 
women and even children in the place of men. 
In the early stages of manufacturing this ten- 
dency is already perceptible; but not until ma- 
chinery is introduced into production do we find 
the wholesale exploitation of women and chil- 
dren — the most helpless among the helpless. 

Originally, the wage-earner had to earn wages 
high enough to defray, not only his own ex- 
penses, but also those of his family, in order to 
enable him to propagate himself and to bequeath 
his labor power to others. Without this process 
the heirs of the capitalists would find no pro- 
letarians ready made for exploitation. 

When, however, the wife and young children 
of the working-man are able to take care of 
themselves, the wages of the male worker can 
safely be reduced to the level of his own personal 
needs without the risk of stopping the fresh sup- 
ply of labor power. 

The labor of women and children, moreover, 
aflfords the additional advantage that these are 
less capable of resistance than men; and their in- 
troduction into the ranks of the workers increases 
tremendously the quantity of labor that is offered 
for sale in the market. 

Accordingly, the labor of women and children 
not only lowers the necessities of the working- 
man, it also diminishes his capacity for resist- 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

face in that it overstocks the market; owing to 
)Oth these circumstances it lowers the wages of 
the working-man. 

3. Dissolution of the Proletarian Family, 

The participation of women in industrial pur- 
suits means the total destruction of the family 
life of the working-man without substituting for 
it a higher form of the family relation. The 
capitalist system of production does riot in most 
cases destroy the single household of the work- 
ing-man, but robs it of all but its unpleasant fea- 
tures. The activity of woman today in industrial 
pursuits does not mean to her freedom from 
household duties; it means an increase of her 
former burdens by a new one. But one cannot 
serve two masters. The household of the work- 
ing-man suffers whenever his wife must help to 
earn the daily bread. Present society offers, in 
the place of the individual household which it 
destroys, only miserable substitutes ; soup-houses 
and day-nurseries, where crumbs of the physical 
and mental sustenance of the rich are cast to the 
lower classes. 

Socialists are charged with an intent to abolish 
the family. We do know that every system of 
production has had a special form of household 
to which corresponds a special system of family 
relationship. We do not consider the existing 
form of the family the highest possible, and we 
do expect that a new and improved social system 
will develop a new and higher form of family re- 
lationship. But to hold this view is a very dif- 

rent thing from trying to dissolve all family 



THE PROLETARIAT 

bonds. Those who do destroy the family bonds 
— who not only mean to, but actually do destroy 
them right under our eyes — are not the Social- 
ists, but the capitalists. Many a slave-holder has 
in former times torn husband from wife and 
parents from children, but the capitalists have 
improved upon the abominations of slavery ; they 
tear the infant from the breast of its mother and 
compel her to entrust it to strangers' hands. And 
yet a society in which hundreds of thousands of 
such instances are a daily occurrence, a society 
whose upper classes promote "benevolent" insti- 
tutions for the purpose of making easy the sepa- 
ration of the mothers from their babies, such a 
society has the effrontery to accuse the Socialists 
of trying to abolish the family, because they, 
basing their opinion on the fact that the family 
has ever been one of the reflexes of the system 
of production, foresee that further changes in 
that system must also result in a more perfect 
family relationship. 

4. Prostitution. 

Hand in hand with the accusation on the sub- 
ject of family bonds goes the charge that Social- 
ists aim at a community of wives. This charge 
is as false as the other. Socialists, on the con- 
trary, maintain that ideal love, just the reverse 
of a community of wives and of all sexual op- 
pression and license, will be the foundation of 
matrimonial connections in a Socialist Common- 
wealth, and that pure love can prevail only in 
such a social system. What, on the other hatii 
do we see today ? 



2S 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 



Helpless women, forced to earn their living in 
factories, shops and mines, fall a prey to capital- 
ist cupidity. The capitaHst takes advantage of 
their inexperience, offers them wages too slight 
for their support, and hints at, or even brazenly 
suggests, prostitution as a means of supplement- 
ing their income. Everywhere the increase of fe- 
male labor in industry is accompanied by an in- 
crease in prostitution. In the modern state where 
Christianity is so devoutedly preached, many a 
thriving branch of industry is found where work- 
ing-women are paid so poorly that they would be 
compelled to starve did they not prostitute them- 
selves. And the capitalists declare that the abil- 
ity to compete, the prosperity of their industry, 
depend upon these low wages. Higher wages 
would ruin them. 

Prostitution is as old as the contrast between 
rich and poor. At one time, however, prostitutes 
were a middle class between beggars and thieves ; 
they were then an article of luxury in which so- 
ciety indulged but the loss of which would in no 
way have endangered its existence. To-day, 
however, it is no longer the females of the slums, 
alone, but working-women, who are compelled to 
sell their bodies for money. This latter sale is 
no longer simply a matter of luxury; it has be- 
come one of the foundations upon which pro- 
j duction is carried on. Under the capitalist sys- 
l tem prostitution becomes a pillar of society. 
What the defenders of this social system falsely 
charge Socialists with is the very thing they are 
guilty of themselves. Community of wives is 
a feature of capitalism. Indeed, such a deep 



THE PROLETARIAF 29 

has this system of community of wives 
taken in modern society that its representatives 
agree in declaring prostitution to be a necessary 
thing. They cannot understand that the aboli- 
tion of the proletariat implies the abohtion of 
prostitution. So deep are they sunk in intellec- 
tual stagnation that they cannot conceive a social 
system without community of wives. 

Community of wives is an invention of the 
upper classes of society, never of the proletariat. 
The community of wives is one of the modes of 
exploiting the proletariat; it is not Socialism, it 
is the exact opposite of Socialism. _ ^ 

5. The Industrial Reserve Army. 

We have seen that the introduction of female 
and child-labor in industry is one of the most 
powerful means whereby the capitalists reduce 
the wages of working-men. There is, however, 
another means which, periodically, is just as 
powerful. This is the introduction of working- 
men from regions that are backward and whose 
population has shght wants, hut whose labor- 
power has not yet been sapped by the factory 
system. The development of machinery makes 
possible, not only the employment of such un- 
trained working-men in the place of trained ones, 
but also their cheap and prompt transportation to 
the place where they are wanted. Hand in hand 
with the development of production goes the sys- 
tem of transportation ; colossal production cor- 
responds to colossal transportation, not only of 
merchandise, but also of persons. Steamships and 
railroads, these much-vaunted pUlars of civiliza- 



30 THE CLASS Struggle 

tion, not only carry guns, liquor and syphilis I 
barbarians, they also bring the barbarians and 
their barbarism to us. The flow of agricultural 
laborers into the cities is becoming constantly 
stronger; and from ever farther regions are the 
swarms of those drawing near who have fewer 
wants, are more patient and offer less resistance. 
There is a constant stream of emigration from 
one country of Europe to another, from Europe 
to America and even from the Orient to western 
lands. These foreign workers are partly expro- 
priated people, small fanners and producers, 
whom the capitalist system of production has 
ruined, driven on the street and deprived not 
only of a home, but also of a country. Look 
at these numberless emigrants and ask whether 
it is Socialism which robs them of their country. 

Through the expropriation of the small produc- 
ers, through the importation from distant lands 
of large masses of labor, through the use of the 
labor of women and children, through the short- 
ening of the time necessary to acquire a trade, — 
through all these means the capitalist system of 
production is able to increase stupendously the 
quantity of labor forces at its disposal. And side 
by side with this goes a steady increase in the 
productivity of human labor as a result of the 
uninterrupted progress in the technical arts. 

Simultaneously with these tendencies the ma- 
chine tends steadily to displace workmen and 
render them superfluous. Every machine saves 
labor-power; unless it did that, it would be use- 
less. In every branch of industry the transition 
from hand to machine labor is accompanied by 



THE PROLETARIAT 

the greatest suffering to the working-men who a 
affected by it. Whether they are factory workers 
or independent craftsmen, they are made super- 
fluous by the machine and thrown out upon the 
streets. It was this eflfect of machinery that the 
workingmen felt first. Many riots during the 
first year of the nineteenth century attest the suf- 
fering which the transition from hand to machine 
labor, or the introduction of new machinery, in- 
flicts upon the working-class and the despair to 
which they are driven thereby. The introduction 
of machinery, as well as its subsequent improve- 
ment, is always harmful to certain divisions of 
labor. True enough, under some conditions other 
working-men, for instance, those who make the 
machines, may profit by it. But it may be 
doubted whether a consciousness of this fact af- 
fords much comfort to those who are starving. 

Every new machine causes as much to be pro- 
duced as before by fewer workmen, or larger 
production with no increase in the number of 
workmen. From this it follows that, if the num- 
ber of workmen employed in a country does not 
decrease with the development of the system of 
machinery, the market must be extended in pro- 
portion to the increased productivity of these 
workers. But since the economic development in- 
creases the productivity of labor at the same time 
that it increases the quantity of disposable labor, 
it follows that, in order to prevent enforced idle- 
ness among workmen, the market must be ex- 
tended at a much more rapid pace than that at 
which the productivity of labor is increased by 
the machine. Such a rapid extension of the mar- 



r~ 



a- 



32 THE CLASS STRUGGLB 

ket has, however, rarely occurred under the rale 

of capitalist production. Therefore, enforced 

o idleness is a permanent phenomenon under the 

\ capitahst system of production, and is insepara- 

^ ble from it. Even in the best times when the 

. % market suddenly undergoes a considerable exten- 

■X V sion and business is brisk, production is not able 

4 to furnish work for all the unemployed. During 

V bad times, however, when business is at a stand- 

X t/ still, their number reaches enormous proportions. 

^ They constitute, with the workers of superfluous 

small concerns, a great army, "the industrial re- 

y V, serve army," as Marx called it, an army of labor 

^^ forces that stands ever ready at the disposal of 

I T ^ the capitalist, an army out of which he can draw 

rT "f ^ his reserves whenever the industrial campaign 

I t Jt grows hot. 

VV To the capitalist this reserve anny is invalua- 
^ ' ble. It places in his hands a powerful weapon 
6 % with which to curb the army of the employed. 
Vf' After excessive work on the part of some has 
.p \ produced lack of work for others, then the idle- 
nt, > ness of these is used as a means to keep up, and 
' ? even increase, the excessive work of the former. 
(..fc^^^And yet there are people who will contend that 

f-^ ^matters are today arranged in the best possible 
p way! 
'"">? Although the size of the industrial reserve 
\ army rises and falls with the ups and downs of 
rf- business, nevertheless, on the whole it shows a 
■>\ '9<*^teady tendency to increase. This is inevitable. 
\- The technical development moves on at a con- 
7- stantly increasing pace and steadily extends its 
\ < field of operations, while, on the other hand, the 



J 



THE PROLETARIAT 

extension of the markets is hemmed in by natural 
limits. 

What, then, is the full significance of lack of 
work? It signifies not only want and misery to 
the unemployed, not only intensified servitude 
and exploitation to the employed ; it signifies also 
uncertainty of livelihood for the whole working 
class. Wliatever hardships former modes of ex- 
ploitation inflicted upon the exploited, one boon 
was left them : the certainty of a Hvelihood. The 
sustenance of the serf and the slave was assured 
at least during the fife of the master himself. 
Only when the master perished was the life of his 
dependents in peril. Whatever amount of misery 
and want afflicted the people under former sys- 
tems of production, it never resulted from pro- 
duction itself; it was the result of a disturbance 
of production, brought on by failure of crops, 
drouths, floods, invasions of hostile armies, etc. 

Today the existence of the exploiter is not 
bound up in that of the exploited. At any mo- 
ment the workman, with his wife and children, 
can be thrown upon the street and given over to 
starvation without the exploiter, whom he has 
made rich, being the worse for it. 

The misery of enforced idleness is today rarely 
the result of a disturbance in production caused 
by outside influences; it is the necessary result 
of the development of the present system of pro- 
duction. Just the reverse happens of what oc- 
curred under the former systems of production; 
disturbances of production often improve the op- 
portunities for work rather than lessening them ; 
remember the results of the war of 1870 upon 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

["the industrial life of Germany and France in the 
years immediately following. 

Under our former system of production on a 
small scale the income of the worker was in pro- 
portion to his industry. Laziness ruined him and 
finally threw him out of work. Today, on the 
contrary, unemployment becomes greater the 
harder and the longer the workman toils; he 
brings enforced idleness upon himself through his 
own labor. Among the many maxims from the 
world of small production which capitalist large 
production has reversed is : "A man's industry is 
his fortune," 

Labor-power is no more a shield against want 
and misery than is property. As the specter of 
bankruptcy hovers always over the small farmer 
and the craftsman, so the specter of unemploy- 
ment hovers always over the wage-earner. Of all 
the ills which attend the present system of pro- 
duction the most trying, that which harrows 
men's souls deepest and pulls up by the roots 
every instinct of conservatism, is the permanent 
uncertainty of a livelihood. This constant uncer- 
tainty as to one's own condition undermines one's 
belief in the permanence of the existing order and 
one's interest in its preservation. Whoever is 
kept in eternal fear by the existing order loses all 
fear of a new one. 

Excessive work, lack of work, the destruction 
of the family — these are the gifts that the capital- 
ist system of production brings to the proletariat, 
and at the same time it forces more and more of 
the population into proletarian conditions , 
living. 



THE PROLETARIAT 



It is not only through the extension of large 
production that the capitalist system causes the 
condition of the proletariat to become more and 
more that of the whole population. It brings this 
about also through the fact that the condition o£ 
the wage-eamer engaged in large production 
strikes the keynote for the condition of the wage- 
earners in all other branches. The conditions 
under which the latter work and live are revolu- 
tionized; the advantages which they may have 
had over those engaged in capitalist industry are 
turned into so many disadvantages under the in- 
fluence of the latter. To illustrate: Where, for 
example, the craftsman still boards and lives with 
his master, this arrangement becomes a means of 
forcing hiin to be content with even poorer board 
and lodging than those of the wage-eamer who 
carries on his own household. 

There is another and very extensive domain in' 
which the capitalist system of large production 
tends to turn the population into proletarians — 
the domain of commerce. The large stores are 
already bearing heavily upon the smaller ones. 
The number of small stores does not, for that 
reason, diminish. On the contrary, it increases. 
The small store is the last refuge of the bankrupt 
small producer. Were the small stores actually 
crowded out, the ground would be wholly taken 
from under the feet of the small traders; they 
would then be thru^ forthwith below the class of 
the proletariat — into the slums; they would be 
turned into beggars, vagabonds and candidates 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

for the penitentiary — a wonderful social reform I 
But it is not in the reduction of the number 
of small stores, it is in the debasement of their 
character that the influence of large production 
manifests itself in commerce. The small trader 
deals in ever worse and cheaper goods; his life 
becomes more precarious, more proletarian. In 
the large stores, on the contrary, there is constant 
increase in the number of employes — genuine 
proletarians without prospect of ever becoming 
independent. Child labor, the labor of women, 
with its accompaniment of prostitution, excessive 
work, lack of work, starvation wages — all the 
symptoms of large production — appear also in 
increasing quantity in the domain of commerce. 
Steadily the condition of the employes in this 
department approaches that of the proletarians in 
the department of production. The only differ- 
ence perceptible between the two is that the for- 
mer preserve the appearances of a better hving, 
which require sacriiices unknown to the indus- 
trial proletarians. 

There is still a third category of proletarians 
that has gone far on the road to its complete de- 
velopment — the educated proletarians. Educa- 
tion has become a special trade under our pres- 
ent system. The measure of knowledge has in- 
creased greatly and grows daily. Capitalist society 
and the capitalist state are increasingly in need 
of men of knowledge and ability to conduct their 
business, in order to bring the forces of nature 
under their power. But not only the hard-work- 
ing small farmer, mechanic or the proletarian in 
general have no time to devote themselves to sci- 



THE PEOLETAEIAT 37 

e and art ; the merchant, the manufacturer, the 
banker, the stock-jobber, the landlord — all are in 
the same situation. Their whole time is taken up 
with their business and their pleasures. In mod- 
ern society it is not, as it used to be under pre- 
vious social orders, the exploiters themselves, or 
at least a class of them, who foster the arts and 
sciences. The present exploiters, our ruling class, 
leave these pursuits to a special class whom they 
keep in hire. Under this system education be- 
comes a merchandise, 

A hundred years or so ago this commodity was 
rare. There were few schools; study was ac- 
companied with considerable expense. So long 
as small production could support him, the 
worker stuck to it; only special gifts of nature 
or favorable circumstances would cause the sons 
of the workers to dedicate themselves to the arts 
and sciences. Though there was an increasing 
demand for teachers, artists and other profes- 
sional men, the supply was definitely limited. 

So long as this condition of things lasted, edu- 
cation commanded a high price. Its possession 
produced, at least for those who apphed it to 
practical ends, very comfortable livings ; not in- 
frequently it brought honor and fame. The 
artist, the poet, the philosopher, were, in mon- 
archical countries, the companions of royalty. 
The aristocracy of intellect felt itself superior to 
the aristocracy of birth or money. The only care 
of such was the development of their intellect. 
Hence it happened that people of culture could 
be, and often were, idealists. These aristocrats 
of education and culture stood above the other 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

classes and their material aspirations and antag- 
onisms. Education meant power, happiness and 
worth. The conclusion seemed inevitable that in 
order to make all inen happy and worthy, in 
order to banish all class antagonisms, all poverty, 
all wickedness and meanness out of the world, 
nothing else was needed than to spread education 
and culture. 

Since those days the development of higher ed- 
ucation has made immense progress. The num- 
ber of institutions of learning has increased won- 
derfully, and in a still larger degree, the number 
of pupils. In the meantime the bottom has 
been knocked out of small production. The small 
property holder knows today no other way of 
keeping his sons from sinking into the proletariat 
than sending them to college; and he does this 
if his means will at all allow. But, furthermore, 
he must consider the future not only of his sons, 
but also of his daughters. The development in 
the division of labor is rapidly encroaching on 
the household; it is converting one household 
duty after another into a special industry, and 
steadily diminishing household work. Weaving, 
sewing, knitting, baking, and many other occu- 
pations that at one time filled up the roimd of 
household duties, have been either wholly or par- 
tially withdrawn from the sphere of housekeep- 
ing. As a result of all this, marriage in which 
the wife is to be the liousekeepr only, is becom- 
ing more and more a matter of luxury. But it 
so happens that the small property holder and 
producer is at the same time sinking steadily, and 
steadily becoming poorer; more and more he 



THE PKOLETAHIAT 39 

fees the means to indulge in luxury. In conse- 
quence of this the number of unmarried women 
increases, and ever larger is the number of those 
families in which mother and daughter must be- 
come wage-earners. Accordingly the number of 
women wage-earners increases, not only in large 
and small production and commerce, but in gov- 
ermnent offices, in the telegraph and telephone 
service, in railroads and banks, in the arts and 
sciences. However loudly personal interests and 
prejudices may rebel against it, the labor of 
women presses itself forward more and more 
into the various professional pursuits. It is not 
vanity, nor forwardness nor arrogance, but the 
force of economic development that drives 
women to labor in these as well as in other 
fields of human activity. If men have succeeded 
in preventing the competition of women in cer- 
tain branches of intellectual labor which are still 
organized on craft lines, women workers tend to 
crowd all the more into the pursuits not so or- 
ganized, for example, authorship, painting, 
music. 

The result of this whole development is that 
the number of educated people has increased 
enormously. Nevertheless, the beneficent resuUs 
which the idealists expected from an increase of 
education have not followed. So long as educa- 
tion is a merchandise, its extension is equivalent 
to an increase in the quantity of that merchan- 
dise, consequently to the falhng in its price and 
the decline in the condition of those who possess 
it. The number of educated people has grown 
to such an extent that it more than suffices for the 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

wants of the capitalists and the capitahst state. 
The labor market of educated labor is today as 
overstocked as the market of manual labor. It 
is no longer the manual workers alone who have 
their reserve army of the unemployed and are af- 
flicted with lack of work ; the educated workers 
also have their reserve army of idle, and among 
them also lack of work has taken up its perma- 
nent quarters. The seekers for public office find 
that avenue of employment crowded. Those who 
seek openings elsewhere experience the extremes 
of idleness and excessive work Just as do the 
manual workers, and like them are the victims of 
wage-slavery. 

The condition of the educated workers deteri- 
orates visibly ; formerly people spoke of the "aris- 
tocracy of intellect," today we speak of the "in- 
tellectual" or "educated" proletariat. 

The time is near when the bulk of these prole- 
tarians will be distinguished from the others only 
by their pretensions. Most of them still imagine 
that they are something better than proletarians. 
They fancy they belong to the bourgeoisie, just 
as the lackey identifies himself with the class of 
of his master. They have ceased to be the lead- 
ers of the capitahst class and have become rather 
their defenders. Place-hunting takes more and 
more of their energies. Their first care is, not 
the development of their intellect, but the sale of 
it. The prostitution of their individuality lias be- 
come their chief means of advancement. Like 
the small producers, they are dazzled by the few 
brilliant prizes in the lottery of life; they shut 
their eyes to the numberless blanks in the wheel 
and barter away soul and body for the merest 



THE PEOLETARIAT 

chance of drawing such a prize. The barter and 
sale of one's convictions and the marriage for 
money are, in the eyes of most of our educated 
proletarians, two means, as natural as they are 
necessary, to "make one's fortune." 

Still, the supply of this class grows so rapidly 
that there is little to be made out of education, 
even though one throws his individuality into 
the bargain. The decline of the mass of edu- 
cated people into the class of the proletariat can 
no longer be checked. 

Whether this development will result in a 
movement of the educated people to join the bat- 
tling proletariat in mass and not, as hitherto, 
singly, is still uncertain. This however, is cer- 
tain : The fact that the educated people are being 
forced into the proletariat has closed to the pro- 
letarians the only gate through which its members 
could, by dint of their own unaided efforts, es- 
cape into the class above. 

The possibility of the wage-earner becoming a 
capitahst is, in the ordinary run of events, out of 
the question. Sensible people do not consider the 
chance of winning a prize in a lottery or of fall- 
ing heir to the wealth of some unknown relative 
when they deal with the condition of the work- 
ing-class. Under certain particularly favorable 
conditions it has sometimes happened that a 
workman succeeded, through great privations, in 
saving up enough to start a little industry of his 
own, or to set up a little retail shop, or to give 
his son a chance to study aud become something 
"better" than his father. But it was always ridic- 
ulous to hold out such possibilities to the work- 
man as a means of improving his con.di.twi^. \«^ 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

the ordinary course of events the working-man 
may thank his stars if he is at all able, even dur- 
ing good times, to lay by enough not to remain 
empty-handed when work becomes slack. Today, 
however, to hold out such hopes to working-men 
is more ridiculous than ever.* The economic de- 
velopment makes saving not only more difficult, 
but it renders it impossible for a working-man, 
even if he succeeds in saving something, to pull 
himself and his children out of the class of the 
proletariat. To invest his little savings in some 
small independent industry were for him to fall 
from the frying pan into the fire ; ten to one he 
will be thrown back to his previous condition, 
with the bitter experience that the small producer 
can no longer keep his head above water — an 
experience which he will have purchased with 
the loss of his hard-earned savings. 

Today, whichever way the proletarian may 
turn, he finds awaiting him the same proletarian 
conditions of life. These conditions pervade so- 
ciety more and more. In all countries the mass 
of the population has sunk to the level of the 
proletariat. To the individual proletarian the 
prospect has vanished of ever being able, by his 
own efforts, to pull himself out of the quagmire 
into which the present system of production has 
pushed him. The individual proletarian can ac- 
comphsh his own redemption only with the re- 
demption of his whole class. 




_ l^d-piicLJ 



III. THE CAPITALIST CLASS. 
1. Commerce and Credit. 

til countries where the capitalist system of pro- 
[uction prevails the masses of the people are 
forced down to the condition of proletarians ; that 
is to say, of workers who are divorced from their 
instruments of production so that they can pro- 
duce nothing by their own efforts, and, therefore, 
are compelled to sell the only commodity they 
possess — their labor-power. To this class, also, 
belong the majority of the farmers, small pro- 
ducers and traders; the little property they still 
possess today is but a thin veil, calculated rather 
to conceal than to prevent their dependence and 
exploitation. 

Over against this class we find a small group 
of property holders — capitalists and landlords — 
who alone possess the most important means of 
production and the most important sources of 
livelihood, the exclusive ownership of which in- 
vests them with the power to subjugate the class 
of propertyless and to exploit them. 

While the majority of the people sink ever 
deeper in want and misery, this small group of 
capitalists and landlords, together with their 
parasites, appropriate all the tremendous advan- 
tages that have been wnmg from nature, espe- 
cially through the progress made by the natural 
sciences and their practical application. 

There are three sorts of capital: merchant's 
capital, interest-bearing capital and industrial 



43 



i 



44 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

capital. The last of these is the youngest; pei«*." 
haps it is not as many hundred years old as the 
other two are thousands, But the youngest of 
these brothers has grown faster, much faster, 
than either of his seniors ; he has become a giant 
who has enslaved and forced them into his serv- 
ice. 

In its classic form small production was not 
dependent on commerce. The farmer and the 
mechanic could acquire the means of production, 
in so far as they needed any, direct from the pro- 
ducer; furthermore, they could sell their prod- 
uct directly to the consumer. Commerce, at that 
stage of economic development, catered chiefly to 
luxury; it was not then a matter of necessity, 
either for the promotion of production or for the 
support of society. 

Capitalist production, however, is from the 
very start dependent upon commerce; and vice 
versa, from a certain stage on, commerce needs 
capitalist production for its further development. 
The further the capitahst system of production 
extends, and the more dominant it becomes, the 
more requisite is the development of commerce 
to the whole industrial life. Commerce today no 
longer caters simply to superfluity and luxury. 
The whole system of production, yes, even the 
sustenance of the people, in a capitalist country, 
depends now upon the free and unrestricted 
action of commerce. This is one of the reasons 
why war is more devastating than ever ; it inter- 
rupts commerce, and that has become equivalent 
to a stoppage of production, to a suspension of 
economic life, and to an industrial ruin that 



THE CAPITALIST CLASS 

spreads beyond the field of battle and is not less 
mischievous than the devastation that takes place 
there. 

As important as the development of commerce 
is that of interest to the capitalist system of pro- 
duction. In the days of the small producer the 
money-lender was simply a parasite, who profited 
by the distress or improvidence of others. The 
money which he lent to others was, as a rule, put 
to unproductive uses. If, for instance, a noble- 
man borrowed money, he did so to spend it in 
pleasure; if a farmer or mechanic borrowed 
money, it was mainly to pay his taxes or the cost 
of lawsuits. In those days lending at interest 
was considered immoral and was everywhere con- 
demned. 

Under the capitalist system of production this 
has all changed. Money is now a means whereby 
to establish a capitalist industry, to buy and to 
exploit labor-power. When today a capitalist 
raises money in order to establish a factory, or 
to enlarge one already in existence it does not 
follow — provided, of course, that his undertak- 
ing prosper — that his previous income will be re- 
duced by the interest on the loan. The loan, on 
the contrary, helps him to exploit labor-power, 
consequently, to increase his income by an 
amount larger than the interest he will have to 
pay. Therefore, under the capitalist system of 
production, lending has lost its original character. 
Its role as a means for the exploitation of dis- 
tress or improvidence is pushed to the rear by a 
new one, that of "fructifying" the capitalist sys- 
tem of production, that is to say, of enabling it 



46 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

to develop faster than it otherwise would by t 
mere hoarding of capital in the vaults of indus- 
trial capitahsts. The horror once entertained for 
a lender has come to an end ; he now becomes a 
spotless character and receives a new and 
euphonious name, creditor. 

Simultaneously with this metamorphosis, the 
principal current of interest-bearing capital un- 
derwent a change. The money which the lenders 
heaped up in their vaults flowed formerly out of 
those reservoirs, through a thousand channels, 
into the hands of the non-capitalists. Today, on 
the contrary, the vaults of the lenders, the insti- 
tutions of credit, have become the reservoirs into 
which there flow, through a thousand channels, 
money from non-capitalists, and out of which this 
money is then conveyed to the capitalist. Credit 
is today. Just as it was formerly, a means where- 
by to render non-capitalists — whether property 
holders or propertyless — subject to the payment 
of interest; today, however, it has, further, be- 
come a powerful instrument wherewith to con- 
vert into capital the property in the hands of the 
various classes of non-capitalists, from the large 
estates of endowed institutions and aristocrats 
down to the pennies saved by servant girls and 
day laborers. In other words, it has become 
an instrument for the displacing of the old prop- 
ertied classes and the intensified exploitation of 
the wage-earners. People praise the present in- 
stitutions of credit, savings banks, etc., thinking 
that they turn the small savings of working-men, 
servant girls and farmers into capital and these 
unfortunates themselves into "capitalists." Nev- 



THE CAPITALIST CLASS 

ertheless, the only object in collecting the money 
of non-capitalists is to place at the disposal of 
capitalists an increased quantity of capital and 
thus to accelerate the development of the capital- 
ist system of production. What this means to 
wage-earners, small farmers and mechanics we 
have already seen. 

At the same time that the present institutions 
of credit are converting the whole property of 
non-capitalists into capital and placing it at the 
disposal of the capitalist class, they see to it that 
the capital of the capitalist class itself is better 
utilized than before. They become the reservoirs 
of all the money which the individual capitalist 
may, from time to time, have no occasion to use, 
and they make these sums, which otherwise 
would have lain "dead," accessible to such other 
capitalists as may stand in need of them. Fur- 
thermore, they make it possible to convert mer- 
chandise into money before it is sold, and there- 
by diminish the quantity of capital formerly 
needed in a given business undertaking. 

Through all these means the quantity and 
power of the capital at the disposal of the capi- 
talist class is enormously increased. Hence it is 
that credit has now become one of the most pow- 
erful levers of the capitalist system of produc- 
tion. Next to the great development of ma- 
chinery and the creation of the reserve army of 
unemployed labor, credit is the principal cause of 
the rapid development of the present system. 

Credit is, however, much more sensitive than 
commerce to any disturbance. Every shock it 
receives is felt throughout the economic organi- 
zation. 



48 THE CLASS STBUGGLE 

Many political economists have looked upon 
credit as a means whereby people without any, or 
with little, property could be turned into capi- 
talists. But, as its name indicates, credit rests 
upon the confidence of him who gives, in him 
who takes, credit. The more the latter possesses, 
the grater is the security that he offers, and the 
greater is the security that he enjoys. Conse- 
quently, credit is only a means whereby more 
money may be furnished to the capitalists than 
they possess, thereby to increase their preponder- 
ance and to draw shaqjer the social antagonisms, 
instead of to weaken or remove them. 

To sum up, credit is not only a means whereby 
to develop the capitalist system of production 
more rapidly, and to enable it to turn to use every 
favorable opportunity; it is also a means where- 
by to promote the downfall of small production ; 
and, lastly, it is a means to render modem indus- 
try more and more complicated and liable to dis- 
turbance, to carry the feeling of uncertainty into 
the ranks of the capitalists themselves and to 
make the ground upon which they move ever 
more uncertain, 

2. Division of Labor and Competition. 

While, on the one hand, the industrial devel- 
opment draws commerce and credit in ever closer 
relation with industry, it brings about, on the 
other hand, an increased division of labor.; the 
various functions which the capitalist has to ful- 
fill in the industrial Hfe, divide more and more 
and fall to the part of separate undertakings and 
institutions. Fonrierly, it was the merchant's 



THE CAPITALIST CLASS 4y 

fection not only to buy and sell goods, but to 
store them, and often to carry them to far dis- 
tant markets. He had to assort his goods, dis- 
play them, and render them accessible to the indi- 
vidual purchaser. Today there is a division of 
labor not between wholesale and retail trade 
only; We find also large undertakings for the 
transportation and the storing of goods. In those 
large central markets called exchanges, buying 
and selling have to such an extent become sepa- 
rate pursuits and freed themselves from the 
other functions commonly pertaining to the mer- 
chant, that not only are goods located in distant 
regions, or even not yet produced, bought and 
sold there, but that goods are bought without the 
purchaser intending to take possession of them, 
and others are sold without the seller ever having 
had them in his possession. 

In former days a capitalist could not be con- 
ceived without the thought of a large safe into 
which money was collected and out of which he 
took the funds which he needed to make pay- 
ments. Today the treasury of the capitalist has 
become the subject of a separate occupation in all 
industrially advanced countries, especially Eng- 
land and America. The bank has sprang up. 
Payments are no longer made to a capitalist, but 
to his bank, and from his bank, not from him, are 
his debts collected. And so it Iiappens that a few 
central concerns perform today the functions of 
treasury for the whole capitalist class of the 
country. 

But although the several functions of the cap- 
italist thus become the functions of separate un- 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

dertakings, they do not become independent of 
each other except in appearance and legal form ; 
economically, they remain as closely bound to and 
dependent upon each other as ever. The func- 
tions of any of these undertakings could not con- 
tinue if those of any of the others with which 
they are connected were to be interrupted. 

The more commerce, credit and industry be- 
come interdependent and the more the separate 
functions of the capitahst class are assumed by 
separate undertakings, the greater is the depend- 
ence of one capitahst upon another. Capitahst 
production becomes, accordingly, more and more 
a gigantic body, whose various limbs are in the 
closest relation to each other. Thus, while the 
masses of the people become ever more depend- 
ent upon the capitalists, the capitalists them- 
selves become ever more dependent upon one 
another. 

The economic machinery of the modem sys- 
tem of production constitutes a more and more 
delicate and comphcated mechanism; its uninter- 
rupted operation depends constantly more upon 
whether each of its wheels fits in with the others 
and does the work expected of it. Never yet did 
any system of production stand in such need of 
careful direction as does the present one. But 
the institution of private property makes it im- 
possible to introduce plan and order into this sys- 
tem. 

While the several industries become, in point 
of fact, more and more dependent upon one an- 
other, in point of law. they remain wholly inde- 
pendent. The means of production in every sin- 



THE CAPITALIST CLASS 

pe industry are private property; their ownef 
can do with them as he pleases. 

The farther large production develops, the 
larger every single industry becomes, the better 
is the order to which the economic activity of 
each is reduced, and the more accurate and well- 
considered is the plan upon which each is carried 
on, down to the smallest details. The joint op- 
eration of the various industries is, however, left 
to the blind force of free competition. It is at 
the expense of a prodigious waste of power and 
of materials and under stress of constantly in- 
creasing economic crises that free competition 
keeps the industrial mechanism in motion. The 
process goes on, not by putting every one in his 
place, but by crushing everyone who stands in 
the way. This is what is called "the survival of 
the fittest in the struggle for existence." The fact 
is, however, that competition crushes, not so much 
the truly unfit, as those who happen to stand in 
the wrong place, and who lack either the special 
quahfications or, what is more important, the cap- 
ital to survive. But competition is no longer sat- 
isfied with crushing those who are unequal to the 
"struggle for existence." The destruction of 
every one of these draws in its wake the ruin of 
numberless others who were economically con- 
nected with the bankrupt concern — wage-earn- 
ers, creditors, etc, 

"Every man is the architect of his own for- 
tune," So runs a favorite proverb. This proverb 
is an heirloom from the days of small production, 
when the fate of every single bread-winner, at 
most that of his family also, depended upon his 



52 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 



own personal qualities. Today the fate of cvety "^ 
member of a capitalist community depends less 
and less upon his own individuality, and more and 
more upon a thousand circumstances that are 
wholly beyond his control. Competition nQf 
longer brings about the survival of the fittest 



Whence does the capitalist class derive its in- 
come? The gains of merchant's and lender's 
capital consisted originally of the portions which 
they withheld from the property of those depend- 
ent on them, who might represent any of the vari- 
ous classes. It is otherwise with industrial cap- 
ital. It so happens that in proportion as the cap- 
italist system of production develops, the indus- 
trial form of capital overshadows all others and 
forces them into its service. Furthermore, it can 
do this only in so far as it returns to them a part 
of the surplus value which it has drawn from the 
workers. As a result of this development the sur- 
plus produced by the proletarians becomes more 
and more the only source from which the whole 
capitalist class draws its income. 

As the small industrialist and the small farmer 
are disappearing and their influence upon modern 
society is felt ever less, so also are disappearing 
the old forms of merchant's and interest-bearing 
capital, both of which made their gains by ex- 
ploiting the n on -capita list classes. Already there 
are nations without independent artisans and 
small farmers. England is an instance in point. 
But no one can conceive of a single modem state 
without large production. Whoever desires to 



THE C.\P1T.\LIST CLASS 



53 



tderstaad the modem forms of capital must 
proceed from the industrial form that capital has 
assumed. The real and increasingly important 
source from which flow capitalist gains is to be 
found in the surplus value produced by capital 
industry. 

We have in the preceding chapter become ac- 
quainted with the surplus value which the indus- 
trial proletarian produces and the industrial cap- 
ital appropriates. We have also seen how the 
amount of the surplus value produced by tlic in- 
dividual laborer increases at a more rapid rale 
than does his wage ; this is brought alwriut by the 
increase in the amount of labor, introilucinfr la- 
bor-saving machinery and cheaper forms of 
labor. At the same time there is an incrcaie In 
the number of prqjftarians. So the amount of 
the surplus accruing to the capitalist class swelU 
constantly more and more. 

Unfortunately, however, "life's unalbycd en- 
joyment is not the lot of mortal man." How- 
ever distasteful it may be to him, the capitaiisris 
compelled to "divide" with the landowner and the 
state. And the share claimed by each of thcK in- 
creases from year to year. 

4. Rent. 

When one speaks of the classes which are 
steadily becoming t!ie sole property holders and 
exploiters, the monopolists of the instruments of 
production, distinction must l;e made JKtween the 
capitalists and landlords. 

The land is a peculiar means of production. It 
is the most necessary of all ; without it no human 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

activity is possible ; even the sailor and the aero- 
naut need a point of departure and a landing 
place. Furthermore, it is a means of production 
that cannot be increased at pleasure. For all this 
it must be noted that as yet it has but rarely hap- 
pened that every inch of ground in any state was 
actually occupied or used productively by its in- 
habitants; even in China there are still wide 
stretches of unproductive land. 

In medieval Europe each farmer possessed his 
buildings and parcel of land. Water, forest and 
pasture were municipal property, and there was 
enough land so that each might be given posses- 
sion of any which he reduced to cultivation. 
Then came the development of commodity-pro- 
duction. The products of the land now had an 
exchange value. As a result the land also be- 
came, as it were, a product ; it had a value. As 
soon as this occurred the communities began to 
limit their numbers and take measures to insure 
the perpetual possession of lands; they became 
close corporations. 

But another class, the feudal lords, were also 
yearning for the communal property. And in 
regions where farming on a large scale had de- 
veloped they succeeded in driving the small farm- 
ers from the soil. In the course of events prac- 
tically all land became the private property of 3 
few. 

Thus a monopoly has come into existence, and 
a monopoly of an altogether extraordinary sort. 
The earth's surface is held by a few, not only 
against the property less proletarian clas3, but 
against part of the capitalist class itself. A part 



THE CAPITALIST CLASS 

of the industrial capitalist class may for a time 
monopolize a branch of industry, but its monop- 
oly is never absolute or permanent. In these re- 
spects the land monopoHsts have the advantage, 
their monopoly may be both absolute and lasting. 

This form of capitalism is most highly devel- 
oped in England, where a small number of fam- 
ilies have possession of all the land. Whoever 
needs land obtains the use of it only by paying 
rent. As a rule the capitalist cannot buy land for 
a factory or dwelling. Thus a part of his profit 
always goes to the landlord. 

In most parts of the world, however, the 
line is not so sharply drawn. On the continent of 
Europe, for example, the capitalist manufacturer, 
mine operator, etc., usually owns the land neces- 
sary to his operations. The great landowners, on 
their part, usually carry on their farming opera- 
tions themselves. 

On the other hand, as capitalism develops, pro- 
letarians are more and more herded in cities. This 
leads to an unprecedented heightening of land 
values and a reinforcement of the position of the 
land-owning class. Workers must pay higher 
and higher rent, and this, in turn, necessitates an 
increase in their wages. Thus once more the in- 
dustrial capitalist is forced to share his spoils 
with the land-owner. 

5. Taxes. 

If the landlord appropriates a constantly in- 
creasing proportion of the capitalist's surplus 
value, the state is not less active in the same di- 
rection. The modern state grew with and 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

through the capitahst class, just as, in turn, it has 
become the most powerful support of this class. 
Each has promoted the interests of the other. 
The capitalist class cannot forego the assistance 
of the state. It needs the powerful hand of gov- 
ernment to protect it against foes within and 
without. 

The further the capitalist system of production 
develops, the sharper become the contrasts and 
contradictions which it brings forth, the more 
complex becomes its operation, the greater the de- 
pendence of individuals upon each other, and 
consequently the more imperative the need of an 
authority which will see to it that each fulfills his 
economic functions. A process so sensitive as 
modern production can endure less easily than 
any previous one the strain attendant on the set- 
tling of differences by individual trials of 
strength. In place of self-dependence appears 
now a legal system fostered by the state. 

The capitalist system is by no means the prod- 
uct of political rights or laws. It is, on the con- 
trary, the needs of the system that have brought 
forth the laws that are now in force. TJiese laws 
do not create the exploitation of the proletariat; 
they only provide for the smooth running of the 
system of exploitation, together with all the other 
processes pertaining to the existing social order. 
Competition being styled the mainspring of pro- 
duction, law may be designated as a lubricating 
oil, the object of which is to diminish as much 
as possible the friction produced by the present 
social mechanism. 

As the conditions which produce this friction 



THE CAPITALIST CLASS 

grow gradually worse, the greater becomes the 
need of a strong state power to enforce the law. 
For example, the constantly increasing opposi- 
tion between exploiters and exploited, propertied 
and propertyless, steadily augments the slum ele- 
ment in our population and thus increases the 
necessity for a large police force. On the other 
hand, as each capitalist becomes more and more 
dependent on the co-operation of others of his 
class, the more he becomes dependent on the de- 
crees of the courts. 

But the capitalist is concerned not only with 
peaceful manufacture and trade within his own 
country. Foreign trade has from the be^nning 
played an important part in our industrial system, 
and the greater the extent to which it becomes 
the controlling interest, the more does the secur- 
ing and developing of foreign markets become 
one of the chief concerns of the entire nation. 
But in the world-market the capitalists of one 
nation meet those of another as competitors. In 
order to oppose these competitors, they call upon 
their government to maintain their rights, or, bet- 
ter yet, to drive out their foreign competitors 
altogether. Thus as states and monarchs become 
more and more dependent on the capitalist class 
armies and navies become more exclusively the 
tools of this class. Wars are no more dynastic, 
but commercial, and finally national ; they result 
from economic competition between the capital- 
ists of different nations. 

Thus the capitalist system needs, not only an 
army of officials to operate courts and police de- 
partments, but also an army of soldiers. Both 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

armies tend to grow rapidly, but during recent 
years the latter has oustripped the former. Fur- 
thermore, the application of modern science to 
warfare has enormously increased its cost. As a 
result, the military expenditures of the great 
world- states have increased incredibly. 

The state is becoming constantly more expen- 
sive, its burdens ever heavier. Capitalists and 
landowners try everywhere to foist these bur- 
dens upon the other classes. But the poorer 
classes grow constantly less able to pay, and so 
despite their cunning, the exploiters are obliged 
to increase the share of profits which they turn 
over to the state. 

6. The Falling OS in the Rate of Profit. 

Simultaneously with this development, the 
quantity of the capital which the capitalist class 
applies productively shows a tendency to increase 
more rapidly than the exploitation of the work- 
ing-class, that is to say, more rapidly than the 
mass of surplus which the latter creates. 

To illustrate : Compare a spinner of a hundred 
years ago with a machine-weaver of today. How 
enormous is the capital required to enable tbe lat- 
ter to work ! On the other hand, the capital 
which the capitaHst invested in hand -weaving was 
trifling in comparison. The exploited hand-spin- 
ner may have worked at home. In that case the 
capitalist paid him his wages and gave him the 
cotton or flax which he needed. In point of 
wages there has not been much change, but a 
machine-weaver consumes today in production a 
hundred times more raw material than the for- 



THE CAPITALIST CLASS 

mer hand-weaver ; over and above that, how t 
mendous are today the buildings, power engine! 
looms, etc., necessary to carry on the industry. 

There is still another thing to be considered 
The only outlays of the capitalist who a hundred'" 
years ago employed a spinner were for wages 
and raw material, there was not then any fixed 
capital, for the cost of the spinning-wheel was 
too trifling to consider. He turned his capital 
over quickly, say every three months ; as a result 
of this, he needed, to start with, only one-quarter 
of the capital which he used during the whole 
year. Today the capital invested in a spinning-mill 
for machinery and buildings is enormous. Even ■ 
though the time within which the capitalist could 
get back the sum he pays out in wages and for 
raw materials were now the same as it was a 
hundred years ago. the time which it now takes 
him to get back the rest of his capital, which a 
hundred years ago he hardly needed, has become 
a very long one. 

A number of circumstances work in the oppo- 
site direction. Among these the most important 
are the recently developed system of credit and 
the decline in the value of products, the latter of 
which is the inevitable result of the increase in 
the productivity of labor. But neither of these 
causes is sufficient to counteract the effect of the 
others. In all branches of production, in some 
slowly, in others rapidly, the quantity of capital 
necessary for production grows perceptibly from 
year to year. 

Let it be assumed that the capital necessary for 
a certain industry a hundred years ago was $10f" 



60 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

and that today the amount necessary is $1,000, 
and, furthermore, that the amount exploited from 
labor is now five times as large as then, i. e., that 
whereas the surplus which labor formerly pro- 
duced was $50, today it is $250. In this case the 
quantity of the surplus has increased absolutely ; 
nevertheless, in proportion to the quantity of cap- 
ital invested, the surplus value has decreased. A 
hundred years ago this proportion was 50 per 
cent, today it is only 25 per cent. This instance 
is simply an illustration meant to point out a 
tendency. 

The total amount of surplus yearly produced 
in this, as a capitalist country, increases rapidly; 
but still more rapidly grows the total amount of 
capital invested by the capital class in their es- 
tablishments. If now it be considered that tax- 
ation and rent carry off yearly an ever larger 
portion of the capitalists' surplus, the phenom- 
enon may be explained that the quantity of sur- 
plus that will accrue to a certain amount of capi- 
tal tends steadily to diminish, notwithstanding 
that the amount of exploitation of labor tends 
steadily to increase. 

Accordingly, profit, that is to say, the portion 
of the surplus produced by labor which a capi- 
tahst retains, shows a tendency to decline in pro- 
portion to the quantity of capital he invests. Or, 
to put it another way, in the course of the devel- 
opment of the capitalist system of production, 
the profit which a given quantity of capital yields 
tends to go down. This, of course, holds good 
only on the average and during long periods of 
time. An evidence of this downward tendency 
of profit is the steady decline of interest. 



THE CAPITALIST CLASS 

It happens, therefore, that while the exploita- 
tion of the working-man tends to rise, the rate of 
capitalist profit has a tendency to sink. This fact 
is one of the most remarkable contradictions of 
the capitalist system of production — a system that 
bristles with contradictions. 

Some there are who have concluded from this 
sinking of profits that the capitalist system of 
exploitation will put an end to itself, that capital 
will eventually yield so little profit that starva- 
tion will force the capitalists to look for work. 
This conclusion would be correct, if, as the rate 
of profits sank, the quantity of invested capital 
remained the same. This, however, is by no 
means the case. The total quantity of capital in 
all capitalist nations grows at a more rapid pace 
than the rate of profit declines. The increase of 
capital is a prerequisite to the sinking of profit, 
and if a capitalist's investment has increased from 
one million to two, and from two million to four, 
his income is not reduced when the rate of profit 
sinks from 5 per cent to 4, and from 4 to 3. 

The decline of the rate of profit, and likewise 
of interest, in no way implies a reduction of the 
income of the capitalist class, for the mass of sur- 
plus that flows into its hands grows constantly 
larger; the decline diminishes solely the income 
of those capitalists who are not able correspond- 
ingly to increase their capital. In the course of 
industrial development, it takes a constantly in- 
creasing amount of capital to support its owner 
with the "dignity of his class." The quantity of 
capital requisite to free its owner from labor, and 
to enable him to live on the labor of others, be- 




62 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

comes constantly larger. The sum which fifl_ 
years ago was a considerable fortune is today an 
insignificant pittance. 

The decline of profit and interest does not 
bring on the downfall, but the narrowing of the 
capitalist class, Every year small capitalists are 
expelled from it and consigned to the same death- 
struggle in which the small dealer, the small pro- 
ducer, the small farmer, the small concerns gen- 
erally, are engaged — a death-stru§^le that may be 
more or less protracted, but which will finally end 
for them, or for their children, with downfall 
into the proletariat. Their efforts to escape their 
fate only hasten their rain. 

One often wonders at the large number of 
simpletons whom any knave can allure to intrust 
him with their money upon the promise of high 
interest. Those people are, as a nile, not the 
fools they seem ; fraudulent undertakings are the 
last straws at which sinking capitalists grasp, in 
the desperate hope of making their small capital 
remunerative. It is not so much greed as the 
fear of poverty that blinds them. 

7. The Growth of Large Production. Syndicates 
and Trusts. 

Side by side with the competitive struggle be- 
tween individual and capitalist production rages 
the competitive struggle between large and small 
capitalists. Every day brings forth a new in- 
vention or a new discovery which increases the 
productivity of labor. Each of these renders use- 
less, to a. smaller or greater extent, former ma- 
chines, and compels the introduction of new ones. 



THE CAPITALIST CLASS 63 

often also the enlargement of establishments. 
The capitalist, who, at such a pinch, has not the 
requisite capital at his command, becomes, sooner 
or later, unable to hold his own in the competitive 
struggle and goes down, or is forced, at consider- 
able loss, to invest his capital in some smaller in- 
dustry not yet seized upon by more powerful cap- 
italists than himself. In this way competition in 
large industry causes over-stocking of capital in 
small industry, and thereby renders the competi- 
tion between the small capitalists all the more 
fierce and their ruin all the more rapid. 

The industries conducted on a large scale con- 
stantly expand. Establishments that once counted 
their workmen by hundreds become giant con- 
cerns that employ thousands of hands. Day by 
day the small business establishments disappear; 
the industrial development, instead of increasing, 
steadily decreases the number of individual en- 
terprises. 

Nor is this all. The industrial development 
leads steadily to the concentration of more and 
more capitalist undertakings into a single hand, 
be that the hand of a single capitalist, or of a 
combination of capitalists who legally constitute 
one person — the syndicate, the trust. 

The paths that lead to this are manifold. 

One of them is opened by the anxiety of the 
capitaUst to exclude competition. Competition 
has been shown to be the mainspring of the mod- 
em system of production ; indeed, it is the main- 
spring of all production of merchandise, i. e., 
production for sale. Nevertheless, however nec- 
essary competition is for the production of met- 



64 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 



chandise in general, there is no capitalist but is 
anxious to see his own goods free from compefi- 
tion in the market. If he is the sole possessor of 
goods for which there is a demand, if he has a 
monopoly of them, lie can send their pricees far 
above their actual value; then those who need 
his goods will be wholly dependent upon him. 
Where several sellers of the same goods appear 
in the market, they can establish a monopoly only 
by combining in such a way that they virtually 
become one seller. Such combines — rings, syndi- 
dicates, trusts— are the sooner and more easily 
brought about the smaller the number of compet- 
itors whose conflicting interests are to be har- 
monized. 

In so far as thz capitalist system expands the 
market and increases the number of competitors 
in it, it makes dilScult the formation of monopo- 
lies in production and commerce. But in every 
branch of capitalist industry the moment ar- 
rives, sooner or later, when its further develop- 
ment implies the lessening of the number of es- 
tablishments engaged in it. From that moment 
on the march is rapid toward the syndicate and 
the trust. The time when, in a given country, the 
syndicate can ripen into a trust may be hastened 
through the protection of its domestic market 
against foreign competitors by a high tariff. In 
such a case the number of competitors is dimin- 
ished and the domestic producers can more easily 
come together, establish a monopoly, and, thanks 
to "Protection of home industry," fleece the na- 
tional consumer to their hearts' content. 

During the last twenty years the number of 



THE CAPITALIST CLASS 

trusts, through which the price and production of 
certain wares is "regulated," has increased 
greatly, especially in "protected" countries, such 
as the United States, France and Germany, The 
trust, once formed, the several concerns that have 
combined constitute virtually only one concern, 
under the guidance of a single head. 

The articles most necessary for the develop- 
ment of production, such as coal and iron, are 
the ones that become the first subjects of syndi- 
cates and trusts. Combinations usually extend 
their influence far beyond the monopolized indus- 
tries themselves; they render the whole machin- 
ery of production dependent upon a few monop- 
olists. 

Simultaneously with the effort to bring to- 
gether the several establishments of one indus- 
try into a single hand, there also develops the 
effort of the several establishments engaged in 
different branches of industry, but one of which 
furnishes either the raw material or the ma- 
chinery needed by the others, to unite under one 
management. It is a common thing to see rail- 
road lines owning their own coal mines and loco- 
motive works; sugar manufacturers raise a part 
of their own cane or beets; the producer of pota- 
toes establish his own whisky distillery, etc. 

There is still a third way, and that the sim- 
plest, by which several establishments are merged 
into one. 

We have seen how important are the functions 
of the capitalist under the present system of pro- 
duction; under the system of private property in 
the means of production, large production is pos- 



66 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

sible only as capitalist production. Under 1 
system it is necessary, in order that production 
may be carried on smoothly, that the capitalist 
take the field with his capital and apply it effect- 
ivdy. 

At the same time, the larger a capitahst under- 
taking becomes, the more necessary it is for the 
capitalist to relieve himself of a part of his in- 
creasing duties, either by passing them over to 
other capitalist concerns, or to some employe 
whom he engages to attend to his business. Of 
coures, it makes no difference in the industrial 
process whether these functions are performed 
by an employe or by the capitalist himself; these 
functions produce no value when performed by 
the capitalist and they produce no value when 
performed by the employe. The capitalist, con- 
sequently, must now pay for them out of his sur- 
plus. This is another means by which the sur- 
plus of the capitalist, and accordingly his profits, 
are lowered. 

While the growth of an enterprise forces the 
capitalist to relieve himself by the employment 
of lieutenants, it, at the same time, through the 
increasing surplus it yields, reduces the expense 
of the change. The larger the surplus, the more 
functions can the capitalist transfer to his em- 
ployes, until finally he relieves himself of all lus 
functions ; so that there remains to him only the 
care as to how to invest profitably that portion 
of his profits that he does not need for personal 
consumption. 

The number of concerns in which this final 
stage has been reached grows from year to year. 



THE CAPITALIST CLASS 

This is shown clearly by the increase of stock 
companies, in which even the dullest intellect can 
see that the person of the capitalist ciits no figure, 
and the only thing of importance is his capital. 

Some have imagined that they saw in the rise 
of stock companies a means whereby to render 
accessible to the small holders the benefits of 
large production. But the stock company, like 
credit, of which it is only a special form, is 
rather a means to place at the disposal of the 
large capitalist the property of the small hold- 
ers. 

Just as soon as a branch of industry can dis- 
pense with the person of the capitalist, everyone 
can engage in it, whether or not he knows any- 
thing of the business, provided only he possesses 
the necessary funds to buy stock. Owing to this 
fact a capitalist is able to unite in his own hands 
industries that are wholly disconnected. Stock 
companies are easily acquired by a large capital- 
ist; all he needs to do is to secure possession of 
the majority of the stock, and the concern be- 
comes dependent upon him and subject to his 
interests. 

Finally, it must be observed that large masses 
of capital grow faster than the small ones, for 
the larger the capital, the larger, also, other 
things being equal, will be the profits, the smaller 
proportionately will be the quantity which the 
capitalist will consume personally, and the larger 
the portion which he can add to his previous in- 
vestments as fresh capital. The capitalist whose 
business yields him a yearly income of $10,000 
will be able to live but modestly according to cap- 



DO THE CLASS 

italist ideas. On the other hand, the capitalisfJ ^ 
whose business is large enough to yield him 
$100,000 annually, may, even though he were to 
spend upon himself five times as much as the 
previous one, add annually $60,000, i. e., three- 
fifths of his profits, to his previous capital. While 
the small capitalists are compelled to struggle 
harder and harder for their existence, the targe 
accumulations in the hands of the large capitahsts 
swell faster and faster and within a short time 
reach immense proportions. 

To summarize: The growth of large estab- 
lishments, the rapid increase of large fortunes, 
the steady decrease in the number of establish- 
ments, the steady concentration of different con- 
cerns in one hand, — all these make it evident that 
the tendency of the capitahst system of produc- 
tion is to concentrate in the hands of an ever 
smaller number the instruments of production, 
which have become the monopoly of the capital- 
ist class. The final result must be the concentra- 
tion of all the instruments of production in the 
hands of one person or one stock company, to 
be used as private property and be disposed of at 
will ; the whole machinery of production will 
be turned into a gigantic concern subject to a 
single master. The private ownership of the 
means of production leads, under the capitalist 
system, to its own destruction ! Its development 
takes the ground from under itself. The moment 
the wage-workers constitute the bulk of the con- 
sumers, the products in which the surplus lies 
locked up become tmsalable, that is, valueless. 

In point of fact, a state of things such as here 



THE CAPITALIST CLASS 69 

outlined would be as preposterous as it would be 
impossible. It will not, and cannot, come to that. 
The mere approach to such conditions would in- 
crease to such an extent the sufferings, antag- 
onisms and contradictions in society, that they 
would become unbearable and society would fall 
to pieces, even if a different turn were not previ- 
ously given to the development. But although 
such a condition of things will never be com- 
pletely reached, we are rapidly steering in that 
direction. At the same time that, on the one 
hand, the concentration of separate capitalist un- 
dertakings in few hands is progressing rapidly, 
on the other hand, the interdependence of seem- 
ingly independent concerns increases as the inev- 
itable result of the division of labor. This mutual 
dependence becomes, however, constantly more 
one-sided, for the small capitalists grow ever 
more dependent on the big ones. Just as most of 
those workers who are now engaged in home 
industries and who seem to be independent are in 
fact wage-workers under some capitalist, so also 
is many a small capitalist who apparently enjoys 
independence tributary to other capitalists, and 
many a seemingly independent capitalist concern 
is, in fact, but an appendage of some gigantic 
capitalist establishment. 

At the same time that the economic dependence 
of the bulk of our population upon the capitalist 
class is on the increase, there is also an increasing 
dependence within the capitalist class itself of a 
majority of its members upon a small set whose 
numbers become smaller, but whose power, be- 
cause of their wealth, becomes greater. 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

But dependence brings no more security to the 

capitalist than to the proletarians, the small trad- 
ers and producers. On the contrary, it means to 
him what it does to ail the others; with his de- 
pendence increases also the uncertainty of his sit- 
uation. The smaller capitalists, of course, suffer 
most, but even the largest accumulations of cap- 
ital afford no absolute certainty. 

Some of the causes of the increasing insecurity 
of capitalist undertakings we have already 
touched upon. One of these, the sensitiveness of 
the whole system to outward influences, is on the 
increase. In proportion as it draws sharper the 
antagonism between the classes; in proportion 
as it swells more and more the masses it arraigns 
against each other; in proportion as it places in 
the hands of each increasingly powerful weapons ; 
the capitalist system of production multiplies the 
occasions for disturbances and increases the dam- 
ages which these disturbances bring about. Fur- 
thermore, it is not only the surplus withheld by 
the capitalist that the growing productivity of 
labor increases ; it increases also the quantity of 
goods that are thrown upon the market. Along 
with the exploitation of labor grows the competi- 
tion among capitalists, which becomes a bit- 
ter contest of each against all. Together with 
this goes a steady revolution in the technical 
methods of production. New inventions and dis- 
coveries are incessantly made which render value- 
leas existing machinery and make superfluous, not 
only individual workers, not only individual ma- 
chines, but often whole establishments or even 
whole branches of industry. 



THE CAPITALIST CLASS 71 

■ No capitalist can depend on the future; none 
can say with certainty whether he will be able 
to keep what he has and to leave it to his chil- 
dren. 

The capitalist class itself is splitting up into 
two sets. The one, which increases steadily, is 
superfluous to industrial life; it has nothing to do 
but squander the growing quantity of surplus 
which flows into its hands. The other set, which 
consists of those who have not yet become super- 
fluous in their establishments, decreases steadily, 
hut in proportion to this decrease the cares and 
burdens of their situation grow heavier upon 
them. While the former set is degenerating in 
wasteful idleness, the latter is wearing itself out 
in the competitive struggle. 

To both the specter of uncertainty is a grow- 
ing menace. The modern system of production 
does not allow even the exploiters, even those 
who monopolize all its tremendous advantages, to 
enjoy their booty to the full. 

8. Industrial Crises. 

Great as is the uncertainty for all classes under 
our usual conditions, it is further increased by 
the crises which are periodically brought on, 
with the certainty of natural law, the moment 
production reaches a certain stage. 

The importance which these crises have as- 
sumed during the last decades and the general 
confusion of thought that prevails concerning 
them Justifies special attention. 

The great modern crises which convulse the 
world's markets arise from overproduction, 



72 



THE CLASS STBUGGLE 



which, in its turn, arises from the planlessm 
that inevitably characterizes our system of com- 
moditj' production. Overproduction, in the sense 
of more being produced than is actually needed, 
may occur under any system. But it couM, as a 
matter of course, cause no injury so long as the 
producers produce for the satisfaction of their 
own wants. If, for instance, in the generation 
gone by, a farmer's crop of grain happened to 
be larger than he needed, he stored up the grain 
against poorer years, and when his bam was full, 
he would feed his cattle with the residue, or, at 
worst, let it lie and spoil. 

It is otherwise with the modem system of com- 
modity production. In the first place, when the 
system is once well-developed, no one produces 
for himself, but for someone else ; everyone must 
buy what he needs. Moreover, the total produc- 
tion of society is not carried on in a systematic 
way ; on the contrary, it is left to each producer 
to estimate for himself the demand there may 
be for the goods which he produces. In the sec- 
ond place, just as soon as the modern system of 
production has outgrown its first stage, no one 
except the producer of coinable metals can buy 
before he has sold. These are the two roots out 
of which grows the crisis. 

For the illustration of this fact let the sim- 
plest example serve. At a market-place let there 
come together an owner of money, say a gold- 
digger with twenty dollars in gold, a wine-mer- 
chant with a cask of wine, a weaver with a bale 
of cloth, and a miller with a sack of flour. To 
simplify the case, let the value of each of these 



THE CAPITALIST CLASS 

goods be equal to twenty dollars, and let it be 
assumed that each has correctly estimated the 
needs of the other. The wine-merchant sells his 
wine to the gold-di^er, and with the twenty dol- 
lars he receives for it purchases the cloth in the 
hands of the weaver; and, lastly, the weaver in- 
vests the proceeds of his cloth in the purchase of 
the sack of meal. Each will go home satisfied. 

Next year these four meet again, each calculat- 
ing upon the same demand for his goods as be- 
fore. Let it be assumed that the gold-digger does 
not despise the merchant's wine, but that the 
wine-merchant either has no need of the cloth, 
or requires the money to pay a debt, and prefers 
wearing a torn shirt to purchasing new material. 
In that case the wine -merchant keeps in his 
pocket the twenty dollars and goes home. In 
vain does the weaver wait for a customer, and 
for the same reason that he waits, the miller is 
also disappointed. The weaver's family may be 
hungry, he may crave the flour in the miller's 
hands, but he has produced cloth for which there 
is no demand, and for the same reason that the 
cloth has become superfluous, the flour also is 
rendered "superfluous." Neither the weaver nor 
the miller has any money, neither can purchase 
what he wants ; what they have produced now 
appears as excessive production, Furthemore, 
the same is the case with all other goods which 
have been produced for their use and which they 
stand in need of ; to carry the illustration a little 
further, the table produced by the joiner and 
needed by the miller is "overproduced." 

The essential features of an industrial crisis 



74 



THE CLASS STSUGGLE 



are all present in this illustration. Of course, \ 
reality, the crisis does not manifest itself at such 
a primitive stage of production. At the first 
stage of production of merchandise, production 
for sale, every producer produces more or less 
for self -consumption; production for sale consti- 
tutes in each family but a part of its total in- 
dustry. The weaver and the miller of the illus- 
tration given above are each possessed of a 
patch of land and some cattle, and they can wait 
patiently until a purchaser for their commodities 
turns up. If the worst came to the worst, they 
could even manage to live without him. 

Furthermore, in the first stages of production 
for sale the market is still small, it can easily be 
estimated; year in and year out, production and 
consumption, the whole social hfe of a commun- 
ity, keep on the even tenor of their way. In the 
small settlements of the past everyone knew 
everybody and was well-informed as to his wants 
and his purchasing capacity. The industrial activ- 
ity of such places remained substantially the same 
from year to year ; the number of producers, the 
productivity of labor, the quantity of products, 
the number of consumers, their wants, the money 
at their disposal — all of these changed but slowly, 
and each change was promptly observed and 
taken into consideration. 

All this takes on a diiferent aspect with the ap- 
pearance of commerce. Under its influence pro- 
duction for s el f-con sumption is crowded ever 
more to the rear ; the individual producers of 
the goods for sale, and to a greater extent the 
dealers, are more and more thrown for their sup- 



THE CAPITALIST CLASS 

port Upon the sale of their goods, and, what is 
more important, upon their prompt sale. The 
prevention of the sale of a commodity, or even a 
delay in the sale, becomes ever more disastrous 
to the owner ; it may even cause his ruin. 

Through commerce the most various and 
widely separated markets are brought together; 
the general market is greatly extended, but it be- 
comes correspondingly more difficult to control. 
This inconvenience is further increased by the 
appearance of one or more middlemen who 
squeeze themselves between the producers and 
consumers. Simultaneously with the develop- 
ment of trade and the means of communication 
the transportation of products has been facili- 
tated ; the slightest cause is sutficient to bring them 
together in great quantities at any point. All 
these causes combined render more and more 
uncertain the work of estimating the demand for, 
and supply of, commodities. The development 
of statistics does not remove this uncertainty. 
The whole economic life of society becomes con- 
stantly more dependent upon mercantile specula- 
tion, and the latter becomes ever more risky. 

The merchant is a speculator from the start. 
Speculation was not invented at the exchange ; it 
is a necessary function of the capitalist. By spec- 
ulating, that is, by estimating in advance the de- 
mand for a commodity; by buying his goods 
where he can get them cheap, that is, where their 
supply is excessive; by selling them where they 
are dear, that is, where they are scarce, the mer- 
chant helps to bring some order into the chaos of 
the planless system of production that is carried 



76 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

on by individually independent concerns. But he 
is liable to err in his calculations, and all the 
more as l^e is not allowed much time to consider 
his ventures. He is not the only merchant in the 
world ; hundreds and thousands of competitors lie 
in wait to profit by every favorable opportunity ; 
whoever first espies it carries off the prize. 
Under such circumstances quickness is a neces- 
sity; it will not do to reflect long, to inquire 
much; the capitalist must venture. Yet be may 
lose. So soon as there is a great demand for a 
commodity in any market, it flows thither in large 
quantities until it exceeds the digestive powers of 
the market. Then prices tumble ; the merchant 
must sell cheap, often at a loss, or seek another 
market with his goods. His losses in this opera- 
tion may be large enough to ruin him. 

Wherever the modern system of production for 
sale is well developed, any given market is either 
excessively or inadequately supplied. This may 
lead to the result that in response to some ex- 
traordinary cause, the overstocking of the market 
becomes so excessive that the losses of the mer- 
chants may be unusually heavy and a large num- 
ber of them become unable to meet their liabili- 
ties ; that is, they fail. Under such circumstances 
we have a first-class commercial crisis. 

So long as small production was the leading 
form of industry, the extent and intensity of com- 
mercial crises could not but be limited. What- 
ever the call, it was not then possible to increase 
rapidly the total amount of commodities at any 
one place. Under the regime of hand-work or 
small industry, production is not capable of any 



THE CAPITALIST CLASS 

considerable extension. It cannot be extended 
by the employment of a larger number of work- 
men, for, under ordinary circumstances, it em- 
ploys all the members of a community that are 
at its disposal. It can be extended only by mak- 
ing heavier the burden of toil borne by the 
worker — lengthening his hours of work, depriv- 
ing him of holidays, etc, ; but in the good old days 
the independent mechanic and farmer, who were 
not yet crowded by the competition of large pro- 
duction, had no inclination for this. Finally, even 
if they submitted to such imposition, it made little 
difference to production, for the productivity of 
labor was comparatively small. 

This changes with the rise of capitalist large 
production. This system not only develops all 
the means that enable commerce to swamp any 
market with goods to a degree never dreamt of 
before, it not only expands the separate markets 
into a world-market that embraces the whole 
globe, it not only multiplies the number of the 
middlemen between the producer and the con- 
sumer, it also enables production to respond to 
every call of trade and to extend by leaps and 
bounds. 

At present, the very fact that the workmen are 
wholly subject to the capitalist — that he can, vir- 
tually at will, lengthen their hours of work, sus- 
pend their Sundays, hmit their night rest — en- 
ables him to increase production at a more rapid 
pace than was formerly possible. Furthermore, 
today one single hour of overwork means, with 
the present productivity of labor, an increase of 
production Immensely larger than in the days of 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

handicraft. Thanks to credit, capital has become 
a very elastic quantity. A brisk trade increases 
confidence, draws money out upon the street, 
shortens the time requisite for the turning over 
of capital and, accordingly, increases its effective- 
ness. But most important of all, capital has per- 
manently at its disposal a large reserve army of 
workmen — the unemployed. The capitalist is 
thus able at any time to expand his establish- 
ment, to employ additional workmen, to increase 
his production rapidly and to profit to the utmost 
by every favorable opportunity. 

It has been shown that under the rule of large 
production industrial capital steps ever more to 
the front and takes control of the whole capital- 
ist mechanism. But within the circle of capitahst 
production itself special branches of industry 
take the lead, as for instance, the iron and spin- 
ning industries. The moment any of these re- 
ceives a special impetus — be it through the open- 
ing of new markets in China, or the undertaking 
of extensive railroad lines — not only does it ex- 
pand rapidly, but it imparts the impetus it has 
received to the whole industrial organism. Cap- 
italists enlarge their establishments, start new 
ones, increase the consumption of raw and auxil- 
iary materials and employ new hands; simul- 
taneously with all this, rent, profit and wages 
go up. The demand for goods increases, all in- 
dustries begin to feel the industrial prosperity. 
At such times it looks as if every undertaking 
must prosper; confidence becomes blind, credit 
grows boundless. Whoever has money seeks to 
turn it into capital to make it profitable. Indus- 
trial giddiness takes possession of all. 



THE CAPITALIST CLASS 

In the meantime, production has greatly in- 
creased and the originally increased demand upon 
the market has been satisfied. Nevertheless, pro- 
duction does not stop. One producer does not 
know what the other is about, and even if, in a 
lucid interval, misgivings may arise in the mind 
of some capitalist, they are soon smothered by 
the necessity of profiting by the opportunity in 
order not to be left beliind in the competitive race. 
"The devil takes the hindmost." In the mean- 
time, the disposal of the increased quantity of 
goods becomes ever more difficult, the warehouses 
fill up. Yet the hurly-burly goes on. Then comes 
the moment when one of the mercantile establish- 
ments must pay for the goods received from the 
manufacturer months before. The goods are yet 
unsold; the debtor has the goods, but no money; 
he cannot meet his obligations and fails. Next 
comes the turn of the manufacturer. He also has 
contracted debts that fall due ; as his debtor can- 
not pay him, he, too, is ruined. Thus one bank- 
ruptcy follows another until a general collapse 
ensues. The recent blind confidence turns into 
an equally blind fear, the panic grows general, 
and the crash comes. 

At such times the whole industrial mechanism 
is shaken to its very center ; every establishment 
that is not planted upon the firmest ground goes 
to pieces. Misfortune overtakes not the fraudu- 
lent concerns alone, but all those which in ordi- 
nary times just managed to keep their heads 
above water. At such times the expropriation of 
the small farmers, small producers, small dealers 
and small capitalists goes on rapidly. As a mat- 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

ter of course, those among the large capitalists 
who survive get a rich booty. For during a crisis 
two important things take place : first, the expro- 
priation of the "small fry" ; second, the concen- 
tration of production into fewer hands, and 
thereby the accumulation of large fortunes. 

Few, if any, can tell whether they will survive 
the crisis. All the horrors of the modern system 
of production, the uncertainty of a livelihood, 
want, prostitution and crime, reach at such times 
alarming proportions. Thousands perish from 
cold and hunger because they have produced too 
much clothing, too much food, and too many 
houses I It is at such seasons that the fact be- 
comes most glaring that the modem productive 
powers are becoming more and more irreconcila- 
ble with the system of production for sale, and 
that private ownership in the means of produc- 
tion is growing into a greater and greater curse — 
first, for the class of the propertyless, and then 
for that of the property holders themselves. 

Some political economists have declared that 
the trust would do away with the crisis. This is 
false. 

The regulation of production by large syndi- 
cates or trusts presupposes above all things their 
control of all branches of industry and the or- 
ganization of these upon an international basis 
in all countries over which the capitalist system 
of production extends. But international trusts 
are difficult to organize and more difficult to hold 
together; so it is seldom that a trust becomes 
powerful enough to regulate international trade 
and avert a crisis. With regard to overproduc- 



tion, the principal mission of the trust is not to 
check it, but to shift its evil consequences from 
the shoulders of capitalists upon those of work- 
men and consumers. 

Cut let it be assumed that eventually the lead- 
ing Industries have been successfully organized 
into well-disciplined, international trusts. What 
would be the result? Competition among capi- 
talists would be removed in one direction only. 
The more completely competition disappears 
among the producers in one branch of industry, 
the greater becomes the antagonism between them 
and the producers of other commodities, who, as 
consumers, need the products of the trust, in 
short, complete international trustification would 
cause the capitalist class to be divided no longer 
into competing individuals, but into hostile groups, 
who would wage war to the knife against one 
another.* 

Only when all trusts are joined into one and 
the whole machinery of production of all capital- 
ist nations is concentrated in a few hands, that is, 
when private property in the means of produc- 
tion has virtually come to an end, can the trust 
abolish the crisis. On the contrary, from a cer- 
tain stage on in industrial development, the crisis 
is inevitable so long as private property in the 
means of production continues. 

9. Chronic Overproduction. 
Along with the periodical crises and their per- 
manent manifestations, along with the recurring 



82 



THE Cr-ASS STRUGGLE 



periods of overproduction and their accompanj 
menCs of loss of wealth and waste of fore 
there develops chronic overproduction and \ 

of energy, 

The revolution in the machinery of production 
goes on uninterrupted; the fields that it invades 
are ever more numerous. Year after year new 
branches of industry are captured by capitalist 
large production, and, consequently, the produc- 
tivity of labor grows incessantly, and at an ever 
increasing rate. Simultaneously with this the ac- 
cumulation of new capital proceeds without in- 
terruption. The intenser the exploitation of the 
single laborer and the larger the number of the 
exploited laborers, the larger also grows the 
quantity of the surplus and the mass of wealth 
that the capitalist class can lay by and apply as 
capital. The capitalist system, therefore, cannot 
remain stationary; its constant expansion and 
the constant expansion of its market are a vital 
necessity to it ; to stand still is death. While for- 
merly, in the days of handicraft and small farm- 
ing, the country produced year in and year out a 
quantity of wealth, which, as a rule, increased 
only with the increase of the population, the cap- 
italist system, on the contrary, is from the start 
dependent on an incessant increase of production ; 
every stoppage indicates a social malady which 
grows more painful the longer it lasts. Thus, 
together with the periodical incentives to i 
crease of production brought on by the i 
odical extensions of the market, there is a pei 
manent pressure in this direction inherer 
"ist system of production itself. Tl 



THE CAPITALIST CLASS 83 

sure, instead of being brought on by the ex- 
tension of the market, compels the latter to be 
pushed constantly further. 

But there is a hmit to the extension of the 
markets; there have been periods during the last 
thirty years when it has not gone on. True 
enough, the field over which capitalist produc- 
tion can extend itself is immense; it leaps over 
all local and national boundaries, it has the whole 
globe for its market. But capitalism has virtually 
reduced the size of the globe. Only a hundred 
years ago the market for capitalist industry was 
limited to the western part of Europe and cer- 
tain coastlands and islands almost exclusively 
dominated by England. But such was the vigor 
and greed of the capitalists and so gigantic were 
the means at their disposal, that since then almost 
all countries on earth have been forced open, 
not to the products of England alone, but to those 
of all capitalist nations. Today there are hardly 
any other markets to be opened, except those 
from which little is to be fetched besides fever 
and blows. 

The wonderful development of transportation 
renders from year to year a completer exploita- 
tion of the market possible ; but this tendency is 
counteracted by the circumstance that the mar- 
ket steadily undergoes a change in those very 
countries whose population has reached a certain 
degree of civilization. Everywhere the introduc- 
tion of the goods of capitalist large production 
extinguishes the domestic system of small pro- 
duction and transforms the industrial and agri- 
cultural laborers into proletarians. This pro- 



84 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

duces two important results in all the markn 
that are counted upon to absorb the surplus prod- 
ucts of capitahst industry: first, it lowers the 
purchasing power of the population and thereby 
counteracts the effect of the extension of the 
market ; and, second, and more important, it lays 
there the foundation for the capitalist system of 
production by calling into existence a proletarian 
class. Thus capitalist large production digs its 
own grave. From a certain point onward in its 
development every new extension of the market 
means the rising of a new competitor. At pres- 
ent, capitalist large production in the United 
States, which is not quite a generation old, is en- 
gaged not only in the work of freeing itself from 
its European competitor, but in an endeavor to 
seize upon the market of the whole American 
continent. The still more youthful capitalist in- 
dustry of Russia has started in to be the sole 
purveyor of the whole extensive territory owned 
by Russian in Europe and Asia. The East In- 
dies, China, Japan, Austraha are developing into 
industrial states that sooner or later wiil be able 
to supply their own wants. In short, the moment 
is drawing near when the markets of the indus- 
trial countries can no longer be extended and 
will begin to contract. But this would mean the 
bankruptcy of the whole capitalist system. 

For some time past the extension of the mar- 
ket has not kept pace with the requirements of 
capitalist production. The latter is, consequently, 
more and more hampered and finds it increas- 
ingly difficult to develop fully the productive 
powers that it possesses. The intervals of pros- 



THE CAPITALIST CLASS 

perity become ever shorter; the length of the 
crises ever longer. 

Hence the quantity of the means of production 
that either cannot be turned to sufficient use or is 
forced to remain wholly unused, is on the in- 
crease; the quantity of wealth that goes to 
waste is greater and greater; the quantity of 
labor power compelled to lie idle is ever more ap- 
palling. Under this last head belong not only 
the swarms of unemployed who are rapidly 
growing into a threatening social danger; tinder 
it must also be numbered, first, that ever-increas- 
ing crew of social parasites who, finding all ave- 
nues of productive work closed to them, try to 
eke oi*t a miserable existence through a variety 
of occupations, most of which are wholly super- 
fluous and not a few injurious to society — such 
as middlemen, saloonkeepers, agents, drummers, 
etc. ; second, that stupendous mass of humanity 
of all degrees that may be designated as "the 
«lums," such as the cheats and swindlers of high 
and low grade, the criminals and prostitutes, to- 
gether with their innumerable dependents ; third, 
the swarms of those who fasten upon the possess- 
ing classes in the capacity of personal servants ; 
finally, there is the great body of soldiers, for 
the steady increase of armies during the last 
twenty years would not have been possible with- 
out the overproduction which has set free so 
large a part of the world's labor-power. 

The capitalist system begins to suffocate in its 
own surplus ; it becomes constantly less able to 
endure the full unfolding of the productive pow- 
ers which it has created. Constantly more ere- 



ative forces must be idle, ever greater quantities 
of products be wasted, if it is not to go to pieces 
altogether. 

The introduction of the capitalist system, that 
is, the replacing of small production, under 
which the instruments of labor were the prop- 
erty of the individual workers, with capitalist 
large production, under which the implements of 
labor became the private property of a few in- 
dividuals and workmen were turned into prop- 
ertyless proletarians, was the means whereby the 
productive powers of labor were immensely in- 
creased. To do this was the historic mission 
of the capitalist class. The sufferings inflicted 
upon the masses of human beings expropriated 
and exploited were terrible, but it fulfilled its 
mission. It was as much a historic necessity as 
the two cornerstones upon which it rose; first, 
the production of merchandise, that is, produc- 
tion for sale; next, the private ownership of the 
implements of labor. 

But however necessary were the capitalist sys- 
tem and the conditions which produced it, they 
are no longer so. The functions of the capi- 
talist class devolve ever more upon paid em- 
ployes. The large majority of the capitalists 
have now nothing to do but consume what others 
produce. The capitalist today is as superfluous 
a human being as the feudal lord had become a 
hundred years ago, 

Nay, more. Like the feudal lord of the eight- 
eenth century, the capitalist class has today be- 
yjme a hindrance to further development. Private 
rship in the implements of labor has long 



THE CAPITALIST CLASS o7 

ceased to secure to each producer the product 
of his labor and to guarantee him freedom. 
Today, on the contrary, society is rapidly drift- 
ing to the point where the whole population of 
capitalist nations will be deprived of both prop- 
erty and freedom. What was once a foundation 
stone of society has become a means of tearing 
up all foundations: instead of a means of spur- 
ring society on to the highest development of 
its productive powers, it has become a means of 
compelling society more and more to waste its 
powers of production. So private property in 
the means of production has changed from what 
it originally was into its opposite, not only for 
the small producer, but for society as a whole. 
From a motive power of progress it has become 
a cause of social degradation and bankruptcy. 

Today there is no longer any question as to 
whether the system of private ownership in the 
means of production shall be maintained. Its 
downfall is certain. The only question to be 
answered is : Shall the system of private owner- 
ship in the means of production be allowed to 
pull society with itself down into the abyss; or 
shall society shake oiT that burden and then, free 
and strong, resume the path of progress whic^, 
the evolutionary law prescribes to it ? 



IV. THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE 
FUTURE. 

1. Social Reform and Social Revolution. 

"Private ownership in the instruments of produc- 
tion, once the means of securing lo the producer 
the ownership of his product, has to-day become the 
means of expropriating the farmer, the artisan, and 
the small trader, and of placing the non-producers — 
capitalists and landlords — in possession of the prod- 
ucts of labor. Only the conversion of private own- 
ership of the means of production — the land, mines, 
raw materials, tools, machines and the means of 
transportation and communication — into social own- 
ership and the conversion of commodity production 
into socialist production, carried on for and by so- 
ciety, can production on a large scale and the ever- 
increasing productivity of social labor be changed 
from a source of misery and oppression for the ex- 
ploited classes, into one of well-being and harmon- 
ious development." — Article 5, Erfurter Program. 

The productive forces that have been gener- 
ated in capitalist society have become irreconcil- 
able with the very system of property upon 
which it is built. The endeavor to uphold this 
system of property renders impossible all further 
social development, condemns society to stagna- 
tion and decay — -a decay that is accompanied b 
the most painful convulsions. 

Every further perfection in the powers of pii^ 
duction increases the contradiction that eid ' 
between these and the present system of proi 
erty. All attempts to remove this cotitradicttM 
or even to soften it down, without interferi 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE 

with properly, have proved vain, and must con- 
tinue so to prove as often as attempted. 

For the last hundred years thinkers and states- 
men among the possessing classes have been try- 
ing to prevent the threatened downfall of the 
system of private property in the instruments of 
production, that is to say, to prevent revolution. 
Social reform is the name they give to their 
perpetual tinkerings with the industrial mechan- 
ism for the sake of removing this or that ill 
effect of private property in the means of pro- 
duction, at least of softening its edge, without 
touching private property itself. During the last 
hundred years manifold cures have been recom- 
mended and tried ; it is now hardly possible to 
imagine any new receipe in this line. All the so- 
called "latest" panaceas of our social quacks 
which are to heal the old social evils quickly, 
without pain and without expense, are, upon 
closer inspection, discovered to be but a revival 
of old devices, all of which have been tried be-^ 
fore in other places and found worthless. We 
pronounce these reforms inoperative in so far 
as they propose to remove the growing contra- 
dictions between the powers of production and 
the existing system of property and at the same 
time strive to uphold and confirm the latter. But 
we do not mean that the social revolution — the 
abolition of private property in the means of 
production — will be accomplished of itself, that 
the irresistible, inevitable course of evolution will 
do the work without the assistance of man ; nor 
yet that all social reforms are worthless and that 
nothing is left to those who suffer from the con- 



90 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

tradiction between the modem powers of \ 
duction and the system of property but idly to 
fold their arms and patiently to wait for its abo- 
lition. 

When we speak of the irresistible and inevit- 
able nature of the social revolution, we presup- 
pose that men are men and not puppets; that 
they are beings endowed with certain wants and 
impulses, with certain physical and mental powers 
which they will seek to use in their own interest. 
Patiently to yield to what may seem unavoidable 
is not to allow the social revolution to take its 
course, but to bring it to a standstill. 

When we declare the abolition of private prop- 
erty in the means of production to be unavoid- 
able, we do not mean that some fine morning the 
exploited classes will find that, without their 
help, some good fairy has brought about the rev- 
^ution. We consider the breakdown of the 
[present social system to be unavoidable, because 
iwe know that the economic evolution inevitably 
(brings on conditions that will compel the ex- 
Iploited classes to rise against this system of pri- 
ivate ownership. We know that this system mul- 
Itiplies the number and the strength of the ex- 
Iploited, and diminishes the number and strength 
I of the exploiting, classes, and that it will finally 
[lead to such unbearable conditions for the mass 
(of the population that they will have no choice 
but to go down into degradation or to overthrow 
the system of private property. 
1 Such a revolution may assume many forms, 
1 according to the circumstances under which it 
I takes place. It is by no means necessary that 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE 



it be accompanied with violence and bloodshi 
"Ihere are instances in nistory when the ruling 
classes were either so exceptionally clear-sighted 
or SO particularly weak and cowardly that they 
submitted to the inevitable and voluntarily ab- 
dicated. Neither is it necessary that the social 
revolution be decided at one blow ; such probably 
was never the case. Revolutions prepare them- 
selves by years or decades of economic and polit- 
ical struggle; they are accomplished amidst con- 
stant ups and downs sustained by the conflicting 
classes and parties ; not infrequently they are in- 
terrupted by long periods of reaction. 

Nevertheless, however manifold the forms 
may be which a revolution may assume, never 
yet was any revolution accomplished without vig- 
orous action on the part of those who suffered \ 
most under the existing conditions. ' 

When, furthermore, we declare that those so- 
cial reforms which stop short of the overthrow 
of the present system of property are unable to 
abohsh the contradictions which the present eco- 
nomic development has produced, we by no . 
means imply that all struggles on the part of 
the exploited against their present sufferings are | 
useless within the framework of the existing so- 
cial order. Nor do we claim that they sho uld 
patiently endure all the ill-treatment and all the / 
forms of exploitation which the capitalist sys- / 
tem may decree to them, or that so long as they I 
are at all exploited, it matters little how. What J 
we do mean is that the exploited classes should jl 
not o verrat e the social reforms, and should not I 
imagine that through them the existing condi- I 



.92 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 



tions can be rendered satisfactory. The ■ 
iploited classes should carefully examine all the 
|Social reforms that are offered to them. Nine- 
tenths of the proposed reforms are not only use- 
less, but positively injurious to the exploited 
I classes. Most dangerous of all are those which, 
I aiming at the salvation of the threatened social 
I order, shut their eyes to the economic develop- 
j mcnt of the last century. The working-men who 
take the field in favor of such schemes waste 
1 their energies in a senseless endeavor to revive 
the dead past. 

-^Maay are the ways in which the economic de- 
velopment may be influenced : it may be hastened 
and it may be retarded ; its results may be made 
more, or less, painful; only one thing is impos- 
sible — to stop its course, or turn it back. 
L W hpn, for instance, in the early stages of 
capitalism, the workers destroyed the machines, 
opposed woman's labor, and so on, their efforts 
were useless, and could not be otherwise. They 
arrayed themselves against a development that 
nothing could resist. Since then they have hit 
upon belter methods whereby to shield them- 
selves as much as possible against the injurious 
effects of capitalist exploitation. With their 
trade-unions and their political activities, each 
supplementing the other, they have in all civil- 
ized countries met with more or less success. 
But each of their successes, be it the raising of 
wages, the shortening of hours, the prohibition 
of child labor, the estabhshment of sanitary 
regulations, gives a new impulse to the economic 
development. For example it may have caused 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTUKE 93 

the capitalist to replace the dearer labor with 
machinery, or it may have forced up his pay- 
roll and thereby rendered the competitive strug- 
gle harder for the small capitalist, shortened 
his economic existence and hastened the con- 
centration of capital. 

Accordingly, however justifiable, or even neces- 
sary, it may be for the workmen to establish labor 
organizations to better their condition by lower- 
ing the hours of work and securing other equally 
wholesome changes, it would be a profound error' 
to imagine that such reforms could delay thei 
social revolution. Equally mistaken is the no- 
tion that one cannot admit the usefulness of so- 
cial reforms without admitting that it is neces- 
sary to preserve society upon its present basis. 
On the contrary, reforms may be supported | 
from the revolutionary standpoint and because, L 
as has been shown, they hasten the course of I »^ 
events and because, so far from doing away with " 
the suicidal tendencies of the capitahst system, 
they rather strengthen them. 

The turning of the people into proletarians, 
the concentration of capital in the hands of a 
few, who rule the whole economic life of capi- 
talist nations, none of these cruel and revolting 
effects of the capitalist system can be checked by ' 
any reform that is based upon the existing sys- . 
tern of property, however far-reaching such re-,, 
form may be, 

Z. Private Property and Common Property. 

Indeed, there can no longer be any question as 
to how private property in the instalments of 



94 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 



production is to be preserved; the only quest? 
is what shall, or rather must, take its place. It 
is not a question of making an invention but 
of dealing with a fact. We have as httle choice 
in the matter of the system of property that 
shall be instituted as we have in the matter of 
preserving the present one or throwing it over- 
board. 

The same economic development that forces 
on us the question, What shall we put in the 
place of the system of private ownership in the 
means of production? brings with it the condi- 
tions that answer the question. The new sys- 
tem of property lies latent in the old. To be- 
come acquainted with it we must turn, not to our 
personal leanings and desires, but to the facts 
that surround us. 

Whoever understands the conditions that are 
requisite for the present system of production 
knows what system of property those condi- 
tions will demand when the existing system of 
property ceases to be possible. Private property 
the instruments of production has its root 
n small production. Individual production makes 
.ndividual ownership necessary. Large produc- 
tion, on the contrary, means co-operation, social 
production. In large production the individual 
does not work alone, but a large number of 
workers, the whole commonwealth, work to- 
gether to produce a whole. Accordingly, the 
modem instruments of production are extensive 
and powerful. It has become wholly impossible 
that every single worker should own his own 
instruments of production. Once the present 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE 

Stage is reached by large production, it admil 
of but two systems of ownership. 

First, private ownership by the individual in 
the means of production used by co-operative 
labor; that means the existing system of capi- 
taHst production with its train of misery and ex- 
ploitation as the portion of the workers and suf- 
focating abundance as the portion of the capi- 
talist. 

Second, ownership by the workers in comi 
of the instruments of production ; that means a^ 
co-operative system of production and the ex- 
tinction of the exploitation of the workers, who 
become masters of their own products and who 
themselves appropriate the surplus of which, 
under our system, they are deprived by the capi- 
talist. 

To substitute common, for private, ownership 
in the means of production, this it is that eco'' 
nomic development is urging upon us with 
increasing force. 

3. Socialist Production. 

The abohtion of the present system of pre 
duction means substituting production for i 
for production for sale. 

Production for use may be of two forms: 

First, individual production for the satisfac 
tion of individual wants; and, _ 

SeoMid, social or co-operative production for 
the satisfaction of the wants of a commonwealth. 

The first form of production has never been a 
general form of production. Man has always, i 
been a social being, as far back as we can tra 




him. The individual has always been thrown 
upon co-operation with others in order to satisfy 
some of his principal wants ; others had to work 
for him and he, in turn, had to work for others. 
Individual production for self -con sumption has 
always played a subordinate part ; today it hardly 
deserves mention. 

Until the present system of production (pro- 
duction for sale) was developed, co-operative 
production for common use was the leading 
form; it is as old as production itself. If any 
one system of production could be considered 
better adapted than any other to the nature of 
man, then co-operative production must be pro- 
nounced the natural one. In all probability for 
every thousand years of production for sale, co- 
operative production for use numbers tens of 
thousands. The character, extent and power of 
co-operative societies have changed along with 
the instruments and methods of production which 
they adopted. Nevertheless, whether such a 
commonwealth was a horde or a tribe or any 
other form of community, they all had certain es- 
sential features in common. Each satisfied its 
own wants, at least the most vital ones, with 
the product of its own labor; the instruments of 
production were the property of the community; 
its members worked together as free and equal 
individuals according to some plan inherited or 
devised, and administered by some power elected 
by themselves. The product of such co-operative 
labor was the property of the community and 
was applied either to the satisfaction of common 
wants, whether these were occasioned by produc- 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE 97 

tion or consumption, or were distributed among 
the individuals or groups which composed the 
community. 

The well-being of such self-supporting com- 
munities or societies depended upon natural and 
persona! conditions. The more fertile the ter- 
ritory they occupied, the more diligent, inventive 
and vigorous their members, the greater was 
the general well-being. Drouths, freshets, in- 
vasions by more powerful enemies, might afflict, 
or even destroy, them, but there was one visita- 
tion they were free from, the fluctuations of the 
market. With this they were either wholly un- 
acquainted, or they knew it only in connection 
with articles of luxury. 

Such co-operative production for use is noth- 
ing less than communistic or, as it is called to- 
day, socialist production. Production for sale 
can be overcome only by such a system. So- 
cialist production is the only system of produc- 
tion possible when production for sale has be- 
come impossible. 

This fact does not, however, imply that it is 
necessary to revive the dead past or to restore 
the old forms of community property or com- 
munal production. These forms were adapted 
to Certain means of production; they were, and 
continue to be, inapplicable to more highly de- 
veloped instruments of production. It was for 
that reason that they disappeared almost every- 
where in the course of economic development 
at the approach of the system of production for 
sale, and wherever they did resist the latter, their 
effect was to interfere with the development of 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

productive powers. As reactionary and hopeless 
as were the efforts to resist the system of pro- 
duction for sale, would be today any endeavor 
to overthrow the present by a revival of the old 
communal system. 

The system of socialist production which has 
become necessary, owing to the impending bank- 
ruptcy of our present system of production for 
sale, will and must have certain features in com- 
mon with the older systems of communal pro- 
duction, in 50 far, namely, as both are systems 
of co-operative production for use. In the same 
way, the capitalist system of production bears 
some resemblance to the system of small and 
individual production, which forms the transi- 
tion between it and communal production; both 
produce for sale. Just as the capitalist system 
of production, as a higher development of com- 
modity production, is different from small pro- 
duction, so will the form of social production, 
that has now become necessary be different from 
the former systems of production for use. 

The coming system of socialist production will 
not be the sequel to ancient communism ; it will 
be the sequel to the capitalist system of produc- 
tion, which itself develops the elements that are 
requisite for the organization of its successor. 
It brings forth the new people whom the new 
system of production needs. But it also brings 
forth the social organization which, as soon as 
the new people have mastered it, will become the 
foundation stone of the new system of produc- 
tion. 

Socialist production requires, in the first place, 



THE COMMONWEAl 



99 



uie transformation of the separate capitalist es- 
tablishments into social institutions. This trans- 
formation is being prepared for by the circum- 
stance that the personality of the capitalist is 
steadily becoming more and more superfluous in 
the present mechanism of production. In the 
second place, it requires that all the establish- 
ments requisite for the satisfaction of the wants 
of the commonwealth be united into one large 
concern. How economic development is prepar- 
ing the way for this by the steady concentration 
of capitalist concerns, has been explained in the 
foregoing chapter. 

What must be the size of such a self-sufficing 
commonwealth? As the socialist republic is not 
an arbitrary creation of the brain, but a neces- 
sary product of economic development, the size 
of such a commanwealth cannot be prede- 
termined. It must conform to the stage of social 
development out of which it grows. The higher 
the development that has been reached, the 
greater the division of labor that has been per- 
fected, the more intercourse has developed be- 
tween the producers — the larger will be the size 
of the commonwealth. 

It is now nearly two hundred years since a 
well-meaning Englishman. John Be Hers, sub- 
mitted to the English Parliament a plan to end 
the misery which even then the capitalist sys- 
tem, young as it was, was spreading through 
the land. He proposed the establishment of 
communities that should produce everything that 
they needed, industrial as well as agricultural 
products. According to his plan, each oaov- 



100 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

nmnity needed only from two hundred to 
hundred workmen. 

At that time handicraft was still the leading 
form of production; the capitalist system was 
still in the manufacturing st^e; as yet there 
was no thought of the capitalist concern with its 
modern machinery. 

A hundred years later the same idea was taken 
up anew, but considerably deepened and per- 
fected, by socialist thinkers. By that time the 
present factory system of mills and machinery 
had already begun; handicrafts were here and 
there disappearing; society had reached a higher 
stage, Accordingly, the communities which the 
socialists proposed at the beginning of the nine- 
teenth century for the purpose of removing the 
ills of the capitalist system were ten times larger 
than those proposed by Bellers { for instance, the 
phalansteries of Fourier). 

In comparison with the ecnomic conditions of 
the time of Bellers, those which Fourier knew 
seemed wonderfully advanced; but from the 
point of view of a generation later these, in their 
turn, had become trivial. The machine was rest- 
lessly revolutionizing social life; it had expanded 
capitalist undertakings to such an extent that 
some of them already embraced whole nations 
in their operations; it had brought the several 
undertakings of a country into greater depend- 
ence upon one another so that they virtually con- 
stituted one industry; and it constantly tends to 
turn the whole economic life of capitalist nations 
into a single economic mechanism. The div 
and subdivision of labor is earned on fui 



ations ii 
vis^^^ 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE 101 

and further; the several industries apply them- 
selves more and more to the production of special 
articles only; and what is more, to their produc- 
tion for the whole world; and the size of these 
estabhshments, some of which count their work- 
men by thousands, becomes constantly larger. 

Under such circumstances, a community de- 
signed to satisfy its wants and embracing all the 
requisite industries, must have dimensions very 
different from those of the socialist colonies 
planned at the beginning of the nineteenth cen- 
tury. Among the social organizations in exis- 
tence today there is but one that has the requisite 
dimensions, that can be used as the requisite 
field, for the establishment and development of 
the Socialist or Co-operative Commonwealth, 
and that is the modern state. 

Indeed, so great is the development that pro- 
duction has reached in some industries and so 
intimate have become the connections between 
the several capitalist nations that one might al- 
most question whether the limits of the state 
are suiiiciently inclusive to contain the Co-opera- 
tive Commonwealth. 

Nevertheless, there is something else to be 
taken into account. The present expansion of 
international intercourse is due, not so much to 
the existing conditions of production as to the 
existing condition of exploitation. The greater 
the extension of capitalist production in a coun- 
try and the intenser the exploitation of the work- 
ing class, the larger also, as a rule, is the surplus 
of products that cannot be consumed in the 
country itself and that, consequently, must be 



THE CLASS SIBCGGIX 

sent abroad. If the population of the country 
bare not themsdves die means to buy tbe staples 
wbkb they prodn^ tbe capitalists go with their 
products in search of fore^ customers, whether 
or not the populatioa of tbeir own country stand 
in need of the products. The capitalists are 
after purchasers, not after consumers. This ex- 
plains the horrible phenomenon that Ireland and 
India export large quantities of wheat during 
a famine; recently, during the frightful famine 
in Russia, the exportation of wheat by the Rus- 
sian capitalists could be checked only by an im- 
perial order. W'hen exploitation shall have 
ceased, and production for use shall have taken 
the place of production for sale, exportation and 
importation of products from one state to an- 
other will fall off greatly. 

The existing commerce between the several 
nations will not entirely disappear. The division 
of labor has been carried on so far, the market 
which certain giant industries require for their 
products has become so extensive, and, on the 
other hand, so many commodities, — supplied 
only by international commerce,^-cofTee, for in- 
stance — have become necessities, that it seems 
impossible for any Co-operative Commonwealth, 
even though co-extensive with a nation, to sat- 
isfy all its wants with its own products. Some 
sort of exchange of products between one na- 
tion and another is sure to continue. Such ex- 
change will not, however, endanger the economic 
independence and safety of the several nations 
_BO long as they produce all that is actually nec« 
" |r and exchange with one another superfluit| 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE 103 

only. A co-operative commonwealth co-exten- 
sive with the nation could produce all that it re- 
quires for its own preservation. 

This dimension would by no means be unal- 
terable. The modern nation is but a product and 
tool of the capitalist system of production; it 
grows with that system, not only in power, but 
also in extent. The domestic market is the safest 
for the capitalist class of every country. It is 
the easiest to maintain and to exploit. In pro- 
portion as the capitalist system develops, so also 
grows the pressure on the part of the capitalist 
class in every nation for an extension of its 
political boundaries. The statesman who main- 
tained that modern wars are no longer manifes- 
tations of dynastic, but of national, aspirations 
was not far from the truth, provided one under- 
stands by national aspirations the aspirations of 
the capitalist class. Nothing so much injures the 
vital interests of the capitalists of any nation as 
a reduction of their territory. The capitalist 
class of France would long ago have pardoned 
Germany the $1,250,000,000 which she demanded 
as an indemnity for the war of 1870, but can 
never pardon the annexation of Alsace-Lorraine. 

All modern nations feel the necessity of ex- 
tending their boundaries. This is easiest for the 
United States, which will soon actually control all 
America, and for England, which is enabled by 
its sea power to expand the extent of its colonies 
without interruption, Russia also enjoyed at 
one time great advantages in this respect, but 
the limits of her aggrandizement seem to have 
been reached; she is bounded on all sides by 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

nations which resist her advancement. Worst 
off are the nations of continental Europe in this 
respect; they, as well as others, require terri- 
torial expansion, but they are so closely hemmed 
in by one another that none can grow except at 
the expense of some other. The colonial policy 
of these states affords inadequate relief to the 
need of expansion caused by their capitalist 
system of production. This situation is the most 
powerful cause of the miUtarism which has 
turned Europe into a military camp. There are 
but two ways out of this intolerable state of 
things: either a gigantic war that shall destroy 
some of the existing European states, or the 
union of them all in a federation. 

This is enough to show that every modern 
state has the desire to expand in response to the 
demands of economic development. In this way 
each is seeing to it that its boundaries become 
sufficiently extensive to sa^sfy the needs of the 
coming co-operative commonwealth. 

4. The Economic Significance of the State. 

All communities have had ec onomic function s 
to fulfill 1 This must, self -evidently, have been "the 
case with the original comm unist societies which 
we encounter at the threshold Of hlsl6fy. In 
proportion as individual small production, private 
ownership in the means of production, and pro- 
duction for sale underwent their successive de- 
velopment, a number of sni-ijil fnnrtinng came 
into existence, the fulfillment of which either ex- 
ceeded the power of the individual industries, or 
were from the start recognized as too important 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE 105 

to be handed over to the arbitrary conduct of 
individuals. Along with the care for the poor, 
the young, the old, the infirm (schools, hospitals, 
poorhouses), the community reserved the func- 
tions of promoting and regulating commerce — 
i. e., building highways, coining money, superin- 
tending highways — and the management of cer- 
tain general and important matters pertaining to 
production. In m ediaeval socie ty these several 
functions devolved upon the fowns and some- 
times upon religious corporations. The mediaeval 
state was httle concerned with such functions. 
All this changed as the state took on its modem 
form, that is, became the state of office-holders 
and soldiers, the tool of the capitalist class. Like 
all previous states, the modem state is the too! 
of class rule. It could not, however, fulfill its 
mission and satisfy the needs of the capitalist 
class without either dissolving, or depriving of 
their independence, those economic institutions 
which lay at the foundation of the pre-capitalist 
social system, and taking upon itself their func- 
tions. Even in places where the modern stat e 
tolerated the continuance of mediaeval organiza- 
tions, these fell into decay and became less and 
less able to fulfill their function s. These func- 
tions became, however, broader and broader with 
the development of the capitalist system; they 
grew with such rapidity that the state was grad- 
ually compelled to assume even those functions 
which it cares least to trouble itself about. For 
instance, the necessity of taking over the whole 
system of charitable and educational institutions 
has become so pressing upon the state that it has 





AtT 

of tfae 



e canatilrst class, m 
it OMdd free itself 
: at the state; the 
Aeir ^tfe^ at home 
and foreign 
its hinds off die 
Ike ' ^r***'!*' class had 
However great 
wer of the state 
itself as sobserv-ient as 
Etta vkere die capitalisi class had 
■^H I ill II vith wfacKn to £spute the 
■ad wfiefc jum f diu ^, the power 
state sfaDwed itself friendlj, the office- 
oftai hiTMir (fisagreeaUe {riends to deal 



The hosttli^ of the capitalist dass to the in- 
terference of die state tn the eooooraic life of a 
cottntiy came to the surface first in England, 
where it reoetvcd the name of the " Manchester 
Scho^ " The doctiines of that school were tlie 
first weapotis with which the capitalist class took 
the field against the sodalist-labor movement. It 
i» therefore no wonder that the ofwnion took hold 
of many a socialist workinginan that a supporter 
of the Manchester School and a capitalist were 
one and the same thing and that, on tlie other 
hand, Socialism and the interference of the stj^ 
in the economic affairs of a country were id« 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE 107 

cal. No wonder that such workingmen believed 
that to overthrow the Manchester School was to 
overthrow capitalism itself. Nothing less true. 
The Manchester teaching was never anything 
more than a teaching which the capitalist class 
played against the workingman or the govern- 
ment whenever it suited its purposes, but from 
the logical practice of which it has carefully 
guarded itself. Today the Manchester School no 
longer influences the capitalist class. The reason 
of its decline was the increasing force with which 
the economic and political development urged the 
necessity of the extension of the functions of the 
state. 

These functions grew from day to day. Not 
only do those which the state assumed from the 
start become ever larger, but new ones are born 
of the capitahst system itself, of which the for- 
mer generations had no conception and which 
affect ultimately the whole economic system. 
Formerly, statesmen were essentially diplomats 
and jurists ; today they must, or should, be econ- 
omists. Treaties and privileges, ancient re- 
searches and matters of precedent, are of little 
use in the solution of modern political problems; 
economic principles have become the leading 
arguments. What are today the chief matters 
with which statesmen concern themselves? Are 
they not finance, colonial affairs, tariff, protection 
and insurance of workingmen? 

Nor is this all. The economic development 
forces the state, partly in self-defense, partly for 
the sake of better fulfilhng its functions, partly 
also for the purpose of increasing its revenues, 




108 

to take into its 
tions or industries. 

During the Middle Ages the rulers derived 
their main income from their property in land; 
later, during the sixteenth, seventeenth and eight- 
eenth centuries, their treasuries derived large ac- 
cessions from the plundering of church and other 
estates. On the other hand, the need of money 
frequently compelled the rulers to sell their land 
to Uie capitalists. In most European countries 
even now, however, very considerable survivals 
of the former state ownership of land can be 
foimd in the domains of the crown and the state 
mines. Furthermore, the development of the 
mihtary system added arsenals and wharves ; the 
development of commerce added post-offices, rail- 
roads, and telegraphs ; finally, the increasing de- 
mand for monej' on the part of the state has 
given birth, in European countries, to all man- 
ner of state monopolies. 

While the economic functions and the eco- 
nomic power of the state are thus steadily in- 
creased, the whole economic mechanism becomes 
more and more complicated, more and more sen- 
sitive, and the separate capitalist undertakings be- 
come, as we have seen, proportionately more 
interdependent upon one another. Along with all 
this grows the dependence of the capitalist class 
upon the greatesTot a ii rm-ir c^tah[i>!hnipnf<; — thfi, 
state or government. T his increased dependence 
and interrelatioH increases also the disturbances 
and disorders which afflict the economic mechan- 
ism, for relief from all of which, the largest ol 
existing economic powers, the state or goi 



-St o^ 



, THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE 109 

, with increasing frequency, appealed to 
by the capitalist class. Accordingly, in modern 
society the state is called upon more and more to 
step in and take a hand in the regulation and 
management of the economic mechanism, and 
ever stronger are the means placed at its disposal 
and employed by it in the fulfillment of this 
function. The economic omnipotence of the 
state, which appeared to the Manchester School 
as a socialist Utopia, has developed under the 
very eyes of that school into an inevitable result 
of the capitalist system of production itself. 



5. State Socialism and the Social Democracjr. 



The economic activity of the modern state h 
the natural starting point of the development 
that leads to the Co-operative Commonwealth. 
It does not, however, follow that every national- 
ization of an economic function or of an indus- 
try is a step towards the Co-operative Common- 
wealth, and that the latter could be the result of 
a general nationalization of all industries with- 
out any change in the character of the state. 

The theory that this could be the case is that 
of the state Socialists. It arises from a misun- 
derstanding of the state itself. Like all previous 
systems of government, the modern state is pre- 
eminently an instrument intended to guard the 
interests of the ruling class. This feahire is in no 
wise changed by its assumption of features of 
general utility which affect the interests not of 
the ruling class alone, but of the whole body 
politic. The modern state assumes these func- 
tions often simply because otherwise the interests 






110 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

of the ruling class would be endangered with 
those of society as a whole, but under no circum- 
stances has it assumed, or could it ever assume, 
these functions in such a manner as to endanger 
the overlordship of the capitaHst class. 

If the modern state nationalizes certain indus- 
tries, it does not do so for the purpose of restrict- 
ing capitalist exploitation, but for the purpose 
of protecting the capitalist system and establish- 
ing it upon a firmer basis, or for the purpose of 
itself taking a hand in the exploitation of labor, 
increasing its own revenues, and thereby re- 
ducing the contributions for its own support 
which it would otherwise have to impose upon 
the capitalist class. As an exploiter of labor, the 
state is superior to any private capitalist. Be- 
sides the economic power of the capitalists, it can 
also bring to bear upon the exploited classes the 
political power which it already wields. 

The state has never carried on the nationalizing 
of industries further than the interests of the 
ruling classes demanded, nor will it ever go fur- 
ther than that, So long as the property-holding 
classes are the ruling ones, the nationalization of 
industries and capitalist functions will never be 
carried so far as to injure the capitalists and land- 
lords or to restrict their opportunities for ex- 
ploiting the proletariat. 

The state will not cease to be a capitalist insti- 
tution until the proletariat, the working-class, has 
become the ruling class; not until then will it 
become possible to turn it into a co-operative 
common wetlth. 

From the recognition of this fact is born the 



fUE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE 

airr which the SociaHst Party has set before i 
to rail the working-class to conquer the political 
power to the end that, with its aid, they may 
change the state into a self-sufficing co-operative 
commonwealth. 

Socialists are frequently reproached with hav- 
ing no fixed aims, with being able to do nothing 
but criticize and with not knowing what to put 
in place of that which they would overthrow. 
Nevertheless, the fact remains that none of the 
existing parties has so well-marked and clear an 
aim as the Sociahst Party. It may, indeed, be 
questioned whether the other political parties 
have any aims at all. They all hold to the exist- 
ing order, although they all see that it is un- 
tenable and unendurable. Their programs con- 
tain nothing except a few little patches by which 
they hope and promise to make the untenable, 
tenable and the unendurable, endurable. 

The Socialist Party, on the contrary, does not 
build on hopes and promises, but upon the un- 
alterable necessity of economic development. 
Whoever declares these aims to be false should 
show in what respect the teachings of Socialist 
political economy are false. He should show 
that the theory of development from small to 
large production is false, that production is car- 
ried on today as it was a hundred years ago, that 
things are today as they have always been. Only 
he who could prove this is justified in the belief 
that things will continue as they are. But who- 
ever is not featherbrained enough to believe that 
social conditions remain always the same, cannot 
reasonably suppose that the present conditions 



[ hai 



112 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 



will continue forever. Can any other party 

the Socialist Party point out to him what will and 

must take their place? 

All other political parties live only in the pres- 
ent, from hand to mouth; the Sociahst party is 
the only one which has a definite aim in the 
future, the only one whose present policy is dic- 
tated by a general, consistent purpose. Because 
they neither can nor will see, because they stub- 
bornly persist in star-gazing, they declare off- 
hand that the Socialists know not what they want 

:cept to destroy the existing order. 



6. The Structure of the Future State. 



It is not our purpose to meet all the objections, 
misconceptions and misstatements with which 
the capitalist class strives to combat Socialism. 
It is profitless to attempt to enlighten malice and 
stupidity. Socialists could wear themselves to 
the bone in such an undertaking and never have 
done. 

There is, however, one objection that should 
be met. It is important enough to merit thor- 
ough treatment, and its removal will make 
clearer the point of view and purpose of social- 
ism. 

Our opponents declare that the co-opera- 
tive commonwealth cannot be considered prac- 
ticable and cannot be the object of the endeav- 
ors of intelligent people until the plan is pre- 
sented to the world in a perfected form, and 
has been tested and found feasible. They claim 
that no sensible man would start to build a bouse 



yant i 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE U3 

before he had perfected his plan, and before 
experts had approved of it; that least of all 
would he pull down his only dwelling before he 
knew what else to put in its place. Sociahsts 
are, accordingly, told that they must come out 
with their plan of a future state; if they refuse, 
it is a sign that they themselves have not much 
confidence in it. 

This objection sounds very plausible, so plaus- 
ible, indeed, that even among Socialists them- 
selves many are of the opinion that the exposi- 
tion of some such plan is necessary. Indeed, 
some plan seemed a necessary prerequisite as 
long as the laws of social evolution were un- 
known, and it was believed that social forms 
could be built up at will, hke houses. People 
speak even to-day of "the social edifice." 

Social evolution is a modern science. Former- 
ly, economic development proceeded so slowly 
that it was barely noticeable. Mankind often re- 
mained centuries, and even thousands of years, 
at the same stage. There are neighborhoods in 
Russia where the agricultural implements still in 
use can scarcely be distinguished from those that 
we meet at the very threshhold of history. 
Hence it happened that the system of production 
in existence at a certain time seemed an unalter- 
able arrangement to the people of that age. 
Their fathers and grandfathers had produced 
under that system and the conclusion was that 
their children would do hkewise. Man naturally 
considered the social institutions into which he 
was born as permanent and ordained of God, and 
thought it was sacrilege to attempt innovations. 



THE CLASS STRl'GGI-E 

at as the changes might be which weR 
WTot^i by wars and cUss-stru^les, they 
seemed to affect nothing but the surface of 
diings. Sach con^-ulsions did, as a matter of 
course, affect the foundations also, but this 
fact was hardly noticeable to the individual 
observer who stood in the midst of such events. 
History is essentially nothing but a more or less 
faithful chronicle of events recorded by such 
spectators; hence history remains essentially su- 
perficial. Although one who takes a bird's-eye 
view of the thousands of years of antiquity can 
clearly perceive a social evolution, the average 
historian takes no notice of it. 

Not until the age of capitalist production was 
reached did social evolution proceed at such a 
pace that men became conscious of it. Of course 
they first looked for the causes of this evolution 
on the surface. But one who sticks to the sur- 
face can see only the forces which determine 
the immediate course of progress, and these are 
not the changing conditions of production, but 
the changing ideas of men. 

As the capitalist system developed it created 
among the persons who depended upon it. capital- 
ists, proletarians, etc., new wants wholly differ- ■ 
ent from those of the people connected with the ■; 
feudal system of production. To these different%/' 
wants there corresponded also different ideas of 
right and wrong, of necessities and luxuries, of 
usefulness and harm. In proportion as the capi- 
talist system grew and the classes that had part 
in it became more marked, the ideas which cor- 
responded to this system of production became 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FL'TURE 115 

Bearer, asserted themselves in the government, 
and were felt in the social life, until finally the 
new classes that had been formed took possession 
of the state and shaped it agreeably to their own 
wants. 

The philosophers who first endeavored to in- 
vestigate the causes of social development thought 
they found them in the ideas of men. To a 
certain degree they recognized that these ideas 
sprang from material wants ; but the fact still 
remained a secret to them that these wants 
changed from age to age, and that the changes 
were the results of alterations in economic condi- 
tions, that is, in the system of production. They 
started with the notion that the wants of man — 
"human nature" — were unchangeable. Hence 
they could see but one "true," "natural," "just" 
social system, because only one could correspond 
to the "true nature of man." All other social 
forms they pronounced the result of mental aber- 
rations which came about only because mankind 
did not realize sooner what they needed ; human 
judgment, it was thought, had been befogged, 
either, as some imagined, on account of the 
natural stupidity of man, or, as others main- 
tained, on account of the willful machinations 
of kings or priests. Looked at from such a 
standpoint the development of society appears 
to be the result of a development of thought. 
The wiser men are, the quicker they are to dis- 
cover the social forms that suit human nature, 
the juster and better does society become. 

This is the theory of our so-called liberal think- 
ers. Wherever their influence is felt this view 



116 THE tUiSS StKCCCLt 

preraih. As a mtter of course the first < 
tsts, wlio appeared at tikt b epnning of tbc nine- 
tcentfa ccntniy, wcic nndcr tbe iafliKDce of it. 
They, also, imgiiKd that the insrihitioos of the 
capitafist stale bad sprang from the brain ot 
file philosoirficn of the prcvioos century-. But 
it was dear to these socialists that the capitalist 
sjrstem was not tbe perfect thing which the 
eighteenth centarj' expected. Accordingly this 
system appeared to them as still falling short of 
tbe tnie one; the philosophers of the eighteenth 
century must have made a mistake somewhere. 
The early socialists addressed themselves to the 
task of finding tbe mistake, and. in their turn, 
finding the true social system, that is. the one 
that would perfectly suit human nature. They 
realized that it was necessary to elaborate their 
plan more carefully than any of their illustrious 
predecessors had done, lest some untoward in- 
fluence should nullify their work also. This 
method of procedure was. moreover, dictated by 
circumstances. The early socialists did not stand, 
as did their predecessors, in the presence of a 
social system near its downfall, nor uiu they have, 
as did their predecessors, the encouragement of a 
mi^ty class whose interests demanded the over- 
throw of the existing order. They could not pre- 
' sent the social order for whicli they strove as in- 
evitable, but only as desirable. It was a necessity 
of their situation, then, to present their ideal 
in as clear and tangible a form as possible to 
the end that the mouths of people should water 
after it, and none should entertain a doubt eitiur.,^ 
as to its practicability or desirability. 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE 

The adversaries of socialism have not got h 

yond the standpoint occupied by the social sci- 
ence of a hundred years ago. The only socialists 
they know and can understand are, accordingly, 
those early Utopian socialists who started from 
the same premises as they themselves. The ad- 
versaries of socialism look upon the socialist 
commonwealth just as they would upon a capital- 
ist enterprise, a stock company, for example, 
which is to be "started," and they refuse to take 
stock before it is shown in a prospectus that the 
concern will be practicable and profitable. Such 
a conception may have had its justification at 
the beginning of the nineteenth century; today, 
however, the socialist commonwealth no longer'; 
needs the endorsement of these gentlemen. '• 

The capitalist social system has run its course; 
its dissolution is now only a question of tU)_ 
Irresistible economic forces lead with the cerXl 
tainty of doom to the shipwreck of capitalisnl 
production. The substitution of a new sociaP ' 
order for the existing one is no longer simply , 
desirable, it has become inevitable. . 

Ever larger and more powerful grows today 
the mass of the propertyless workers for whom 
the existing system is unbearable ; who have noth- 
ing to lose by its downfall, but everything to 
gain ; who are bound — unless they are willing to 
go down with the society of wliich they have 
become the most important part — to call into be- 
ing a social order that shall correspond to their 
interests. 

These statements are not mere fancies ; social- 
ists have demonstrated them with the actual facts 



118 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

of our system of production. These facts are 
more eloquent and convincing than the most 
brilliant pictures of the future order could be. 
The best that such pictures can do is to show 
that the socialist commonwealth is not impossi- 
ble. But they are bound to be defective; they 
can never cover all the details of social life; they 
will always leave some loophole dirough which 
an enemy can insinuate an objection. That, 
however, which is shown to be inevitable is 
thereby shown, not only to be possible, but to 
be the only thing possible. If indeed the social- 
ist commonwealth were an impossibility, then 
mankind would be cut off from all further 
economic development. In that event modem 
society would decay, as did the Roman empire 
nearly two thousand years ago, and finally re- 
lapse into barbarism. 

As things stand today capitalist civilization 
cannot continue; we must either move forward 
into socialism or fall back into barbarism. 

In view of this situation it is wholly unneces- 
sary to endeavor to move the enemies of social- 
ism by means of a captivating picture. Anyone 
to whom the occurrences of the modern system 
of production do not loudly announce the neces- 
sity of the socialist commonwealth will be totally 
deaf to the praises of a system which does not 
yet exist and which he cannot realize nor under- 
stand. 

Moreover, the construction of a plan upon 
which the future social order is to be built has 
become, not only purposeless, but wholly irre- 
concilable with the point of view of modern sd- 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTUKE 119 

ence. In the course of the nineteenth century a 
great revolution took place, not only in the eco- 
nomic world, but also in men's minds. Insight 
into the causes of social development has in- 
creased tremendously. As far back as the forties 
Marx and Engels showed — and from that time 
on every step in social science has proved it — 
that, in the last analysis, the history of mankind 
is determined, not by ideas, but by an economic 
development which progresses irresistibly, obedi- 
ent to certain underlying laws and not to any- 
one's wishes or whims. In the foregoing chap- 
ters we have seen how it goes on ; how it brings 
about new forms of production which require 
new forms of society; how it starts new wanj^^ 
Sinong^ men _w.hidi_ compel .them to_ reflect _upon 
thfiir. social condition, and to devise means 
whereby to. adjust society to. the new system in 
accordance with which production is carried on. 
For, we must always remember, this process of 
adjustment does not proceed of itself; it needs 
the aid of the human brain. W ithou t^ thought, 
without ideas^ there is_.no. progress. _ But Taeas 
are oHly^he means to social development; the 
first impulse does not proceed from them, as 
was formerly believed, and as many still think; 
the first impulse comes from economic condi- 
tions. 

Accordingly it is not the thinkers, the philoso- 
phers, who determine the trend of social progress. 
What the thinkers can do is to discover, to recog- 
nize, the trend; and this they can do in propor- 
tion to the clearness of their understanding of 
the conditions which preceded, but they can never 



120 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

themselves determine the course of social ( 
lution. 
I And even the recognition of the trend of social 
progress has its hmits. The organization of 
social life is most complex; even the clearest in- 
tellect finds it impossible to probe it from all 
sides and to measure all the forces at work in 
it with sufficient accuracy to enable him to fore- 
tell accurately what social forms will result from 
the joint action of all these forces. 

A new social form does not come into exist- 
ence through the activity of certain especially 
gifted men. No man or group of men can con- 
ceive of a plan, convince people by degrees of its 
utihty, and, when they have acquired the requi- 
site power, undertake the construction of a social 
edifice according to their plan. 

All social forms have been the result of long 
and fluctuating struggles. The exploited have 
fought against the exploiting classes ; the sinking 
reactionary classes against the progressive, revo- 
lutionary ones, In the course of these struggles 
the various classes have merged in all manner 
of combinations to battle with their opponents. 
The camp of the exploited at times contains both 
revolutionary and reactionary elements ; the camp 
of the revolutionists may contain at times both 
exploiters and exploited. Within a single class 
different factions are frequently formed accord- 
ing to the intellect, the temperament, or the sta- 
tion of individuals or whole sections. And, final- 
ly, the power wielded by any single class has 
never been permanent; each has risen or fallen 
as its understanding of the surrounding condU 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE 12 

tions, the compactness and size of its organiza- 1 
tion, and its importance in the mechanism of 
production increased or diminished. 

In the course of the fluctuating struggles of 
these classes the older social forms, which had 
become untenable, were pushed aside for new 
ones. The social order which took the place 
of the old was not always immediately the best 
possible. In order to have made it so the revo- 
lutionary class of each epoch would have had to 
be in possession of the sole political power and 
the most perfect understanding of their social 
conditions. As long as this was not the case, 
mistakes were inevitable. Not infrequently a 
new social order proved itself partially, if not 
wholly, as untenable as the one overthrown. 
Nevertheless, die stronger the pressure of eco- 
nomic development, the clearer became its de- 
mands and the greater the ability of the revolu- 
tionary classes to do what was required of them. 
The institutions of the revolutionary class which 
were in opposition to the demands of economic 
development fell into decay and were soon for- 
gotten. But those which had become necessary 
quickly struck root and could not be extermi- 
nated by the upholders of the former system. 

It is in this way that all new social orders have 
arisen. Revolutionary periods differ from other 
periods of social development only by virtue 
of the fact that during them the phenomena of 
development proceed at an unusually rapid pace. 

The genesis of a social institution is, it thus 
appears, very different from that of a building. 
Previously perfected plans are not applicable to 



THE CLASS STStrCCLE 

ihe construction of the former. In view of this 
fact, sketching plans for the future social state 

is about as rational as writing in advance the 
history of the next war. 

The course of events is, however, by no means 
independent of the individual. Everyone who 
is active in society affects it to a greater or less 
extent, A few individuals, especially prominent 
through their capacity or social position, may ex- 
ercise great influence upon the whole nation. 
Some may promote the development of' society 
by enlightening the people, organizing- the. iSLYtti 
lutionaiy forces and causing them to act with 
vigor and precision ; others may retard social de- 
velopment for many years by turning their pow- 
ers in the opposite direction. The former tend, 
by the promotion of the social evolution, to di- 
minish the sufferings and sacrifices that it de- 
mands; the latter, on the contrary, tend to in- 
crease these sufferings and sacrifices. But no 
one, whether he be the mightiest monarch or the 
wisest and most benevolent philosopher, can de- 
termine at will the direction that the social evo- 
lution shall take or prophesy accurately the new 
forms that it will adopt. 

Few things are, therefore, more childish than 
to demand of the socialist that he draw a pic- 
ture of the commonwealth which he strives for. 
This demand, which is made of no other party 
than the Socialist Party, is so childish that it 
would not deserve much attention were it not 
for the fact that it is the objection against social- 
ism which its adversaries raise with sob erest 
mien. 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE 123 

Never yet in the history of mankind has it 

happened that a revolutionary party was able 
to foresee, let alone determine, the forms of 
the new social order which it strove to usher in. 
The cause of progress gained much if it could 
as much as ascertain the tendencies that led to 
such a new social order, to the end that its 
political activity could be a conscious, and not 
merely an instinctive, one. Ng more can be 
demanded of the Socialist Party. At the same 
time, never yet was there a political party that 
looked so deeply into the social tendencies of 
its times, and so thoroughly understood them 
as the Socialist Party. 

This is due, not so much to the SociaHst 
Party's merit, as to its good fortune. It owes 
its superiority to the fact that it stands upon 
the shoulders of capitaHst political economy, 
the first that ever undertook a sdenti6c investi- 
gation of social relations and conditions. One 
result of this investigation was that the revo- 
lutionary classes which overthrew the feudal 
system of production had a much clearer con- 
ception of their social mission and suffered much 
less from self-deception than any other revolu- 
tionary class before them. But the thinkers in 
the ranks of the Socialist Party have carried 
the investigations of the social relations much 
further, they have gone much deeper than any 
capitalist economist. Capital, Karl Marx's great 
work, has become the lodestar of modern eco- 
nomic science. As far as the work of Karl 
Marx stands above the works of Quesnay, Adam 
Smith and Ricardo, just so far stand the social- 



TUE CLASS STRUGGLE 

ists of today above the revolutionary classes 
that appeared at the close of the eighteenth and 
the beginning of the nineteenth century in point 
of clearness of vision and certainty of purpose. 
If the socialists decline to lay before the pubHc 
a prospectus of the future commonwealth, the 
bourgeois writers can find in this fact no reason 
to mock or to conclude that we do not know 
what we are after. The Socialist Party has a 
clearer insight into the future than had the path- 
finders of the present social order. 

We have said that a thinker may be able 
to discover the tendencies of the economic de- 
velopment of his day, but that it is impossible 
for him to foresee the social forms in which that 
development will ultimately find expression. A 
glance at existing conditions will prove the cor- 
rectness of this view. The tendencies of the 
capitalist system of production are the same in 
all countries where it prevails ; and yet how dif- 
ferent are the political and social forms in Eng- 
land from those in France, those in France from 
those in Germany, and those in the United 
States from any of these. Again, the historical 
tendencies of the labor movement, which has 
been brought on by the existing system of pro- 
duction, are everywhere identical, and yet we 
see tliat the forms under which this movement 
manifests itself are different in each country. 

The tendencies of the capitalist system of pro- 
duction are today well known. Nevertheless, no 
one would venture to foretell what forms it 
will take in ten, twenty or thirty years — pro- 
vided, of course, that it endures that long. And 



I THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE 12Sj 

' some demand of the socialists a detailed 
description of the social forms that are to com 
into existence after the present system of pro? 
duction. 

It does not follow, however, from the re- 
fusal of the socialists to draw up a plan of 
the future state and the measures which must 
lead up to it that they consider useless or harm- 
ful all thought ahout the socialist society. The 
useless and harmful thing is the making of 
positive propositions for bringing in and or- 
ganizing the socialist society. Propositions for 
the shaping of social conditions can be made 
only where the field is fully under control and 
well understood. For this reason the Sociahst 
Party can make positive propositions only for 
the existing social order. Suggestions that go 
beyond that cannot deal with facts, but must pro- 
ceed from suppositions; they are, accordingly, 
phantasies and dreams which remain at best 
without result. In case their inventor is vigor- 
ous and intellectually gifted he may affect the 
public mind, but the only result will be a waste 
of time and energy. 

We should not, however, confuse with these I 
vagaries those inquiries to ascertain the ten- I 
dencies that the economic development will or 
may take as soon as it is transferred from the 
capitalist to the sociahst basis. lo such inquiries 
th ere i s no quesiion of schemes for the future, 
buT^ the scientific consideration of results re- 
Veaied'by the Investigation of definite facts. In- v 
quiries of this sort are by no means useless ; the \ 
more clearly we see into the future, the better ' 




will we employ our energy in the presenL Tfie 
most noted thinkers of the Socialist Party have 
undertaken such inquiries. The works of Karl 
Marx and Frederick Engels contain the results 
of many investigations of this sort. August 
Bebel has given in his hook on Woman Under 
Socialism the result of his work in this field. 

Similar inquiries every thinking socialist has 
probably carried on in private; for everyone 
who has placed before himself a great goal real- 
izes the need of clearness in regard to the con- 
ditions under which he can reach it. The most 
widely divergent views have been formed and 
expressed by persons of different position, tem- 
perament, insight into economic questions and 
acquaintance with other non-capitalistic, espe- 
cially communistic, forms of society. But such 
differences in the manner of looking at things 
in no way disturb the compactness and unity of 
the Socialist Party. It makes little difference 
how various may be the views of our goal, so 
long as our eyes are all turned in the same di- 
rection — and that the right one. 

We might close this chapter here. But so 
many false notions about the socialist common- 
wealth have been inherited from the Utopians 
or invented by ignorant men of letters, that this 
course would have the appearance of an evasion. 
Therefore we shall take up certain of then in 
order to show how the tendencies of our eco- 
nomic development might work themselves out 
in a socialist community. 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE 

7. The "Abolition of the Family." 

One of the most widespread prejudices against 
socialism rests upon the notion that it proposes 
to abolish the family. 

No socialist has the remotest idea of abolish- 
ing the family, that is, legally and forcibTy dis- 
solving-.rt. Only the grossest misrepresentation 
can fasten upon socialism any such intention. 
Moreover, it takes a fool to imagine that a form 
of family life can be created or abolished by 
decree. 

The modem form of family is in no way op- 
posed to the socialist system of production ; the 
institution of the socialist order, therefore, does 
not demand the abolition of the family. 

What does lead to the abolition of the present 
form of family life is, not the nature of co- 
operative production, but economic development. 
We have already seen in another chapter how 
under the present system the family is torn to 
pieces, husband, wife and children are separated, 
and celibacy and prostitution made common. 

The socialist system is not calculated to check 
economic development; it will, on the contrary, 
give it a new impulse. This development will 
continue to draw from the circle of household 
duties and turn into special industries one occu- 
pation after another. That this cannot fail to 
have in the future, as in the past, its effect on 
the sphere of woman is self-evident; woman 
will cease to be a worker in the individual house- 
hold, and will take her place as a worker in 
the large industries. But this change will not 
be to her then, as it is today, a mere transition 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

1 household slavery to wage slave 
not, as it does today, hurl her from the protection 
of her home into the most exposed and helpless 
section of the proletariat. By working side by 
side with man in the great co-operative industries 
woman will become his equal and will take an 
equal part in the community life. She will be 
his free companion, emancipated not only from 
the servitude of the house, but also from that of 
capitahsm. Mistress of herself, the equal of 
man, she will quickly put an end to all prosti- 
tution, legal and well as illegal. For the first 
time in history monogamy will become a real, 
rather than a fictitious, institution. 

These are no Utopian suggestions, but scientific 
conclusions based on definite facts. Whoever 
wishes to overthrow them must prove the 
facts non-existent. Since this cannot be done, 
there remains nothing for the ladies and gentle- 
men who wish to know nothing of this phase of 
our development than to become indignant and 
prove their morality by ail manner of lies and 
misrepresentations. But all their demonstrations 
will not delay our inevitable evolution a single 
moment. 

This much is certain; whatever alteration the 
traditional form of the family may undergo, 
it will not be the act of sociahsm or of the social- 
ist system of production, but of the economic 
development that has been going on for the 
last century. Socialist society cannot retard 
this development; what it will do is to remove 
from the economic development all the painful 
and degrading features that are its inevitable 



THE COMMONWEALTn OF THE FUTURE 129 

accompaniments under the capitalist system of 
production. While, on the one hand, under the 
capitalist system of production the economic de- 
velopment is steadily snapping, one after an- 
other, the family bonds and destroying family 
life, under the socialist system of production, 
on the other hand, whatever existing family form 
may disappear, can be replaced only by a higher. 

8. Confiscation of Property. M 

Our opponents, who know better than we what 
we want and can picture with greater accuracy 
the future state, also declare that socialism can 
never come into power except through a whole- 
sale confiscation of property, confiscation without 
compensation not only of house and farm, but 
of superfluous furniture and savings bank de- 
posits. Next to the charge of intending to forci- 
bly dissolve all family ties, this is the triunp card 
played against us. 

The program of the Socialist Party has noth- 
ing to say about confiscation. It does not men- 
tion it. not from fear of giving offense, but be- 
cause it is a subject upon which nothing can be 
said with certainty. The only thing that can be 
declared with certainty is that the tendency of 
economic development renders imperative the 
social ownership and operation of the means of 
large production. In what way this transfer 
from private and individual into collective own- 
ership will be effected, whether this inevitable 
transfer will take the fonn of confiscation, 
whether it will be a peaceable or a forcible on) 
— these are questions no man can answer. Pm' 



130 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

experience throws little light on tliis matter. 
The transition may be effected, as was that from 
feudalism to capitalism, in as many different 
ways as there are different countries. The man- 
ner of the transition depends wholly upon the 
general circumstances under which it is effected, 
the power and enHghtenment of the classes con- 
cerned, for instance, all of them circumstances 
that cannot be calculated for the future. In 
historical development the unexpected plays the 
most prominent role. 

It goes without saying that the Socialist Party 
wishes this unavoidable expropriation of large 
industry to be effected with as little friction as 
possible, in a peaceful way, and with the con- 
sent of the whole people. But the historical de- 
velopment will take its course regardless of the 
wishes of either sociahsts or their adversaries. 

In no case can it be said that the carrying out 
of the socialist program demands under all cir- 
cumstances that the property whose expropria- 
tion has become necessary, will be confiscated. 

Nevertheless, it may be said with certainty 
that economic development can render necessary 
the confiscation of only a part of existing prop- 
erty. The economic development demands social 
ownership of the implements of labor only; it 
does not concern itself with the part of property 
that is devoted to personal and private uses. 
This is applicable not only to food, furniture, 
etc. We recall what was said in a previous chap- 
ter about savings banks. They are the means 
whereby the private property of the non-capi- 
talist classes is rendered accessible to capitalists. 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE 131 

The deposits of evei'y single depositor, taken 
separately, are too insignificant to be applied to 
capitalist industry; not until many deposits have 
been gathered together are they in a condition 
to fulfill the function of capital. In the measure 
in which capitalist undertakings pass from pri- 
vate into social concerns, the opportunities will 
be lessened for patrons of savings banks to 
draw interest upon their deposits; these will 
cease to be capital and will become merely non- 
interest-bearing funds. But this is a very differ- 
ent thing from the confiscation of savings bank 
deposits. 

The confiscation of such property is, moreover, 
not only economically unnecessary but politically 
improbable. These small deposits come mainly 
from the pockets of the exploited classes, from 
those classes to whose efforts the introduction 
of socialism will be due. Only those who con- 
sider these classes to be utterly unreliable can 
believe that they would begin by robbing them- 
selves of their hard-earned savings in order to 
regain possession of the means of production. 

But not only does the introduction of socialist 
production not require the expropriation of non- 
productive wealth, it does not even require the 
expropriation of all property in the means of 
production. 

That which renders the socialist society neces- 
sary is large production. Co-operative produc- 
tion requires also co-operative ownership in the 
means of production. But just as private prop- 
erty in the means of production is irreconcila- 
ble with co-operative work in large industry, so 



132 



THE CU^SS STRUGGLE 



co-operative or social ownership in the 
of production is irreconcilable with small pro- 
duction. This requires, as we have seen, private 
ownership in the means of production. The aim 
of socialism is to place the worker in possession 
of the necessary means of production. The ex- 
propriation of the means of production in small 
industry would mean merely the senseless pro- 
ceeding of taking them from their present owner 
and returning them again to him. 

Accordingly, the transition to the socialist 
society does not at all require the expropriation 
of the small artisan and the small farmer. This 
transition not only will deprive them of nothing, 
but it will bring them many advantages. Since 
the tendency of socialist society is to substitute 
production for use for production for sale, it 
must be its endeavor to transform all social dues 
(taxes, interest upon mortgages on property 
that has been nationalized, etc., so far as these 
may have been not wholly abolished) from 
money payments into payments in products. 
But this means the raising of a tremendous bur- 
den 'from the farmer. In many ways that is 
what he is striving for today, but it is impossible 
under the supremacy of production for sale. 
Only the socialist society can bring it, and with 
it remove the main cause of the ruin of the farm- 
ing industry. 

It is the capitalists who expropriate the fan 
ers and artisans. Socialist society puts an < 
to this expropriation. 

Certainly, socialism will not put an end 
Ic development. On the contrar 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE 133 

the only means to ensure its progress beyond a 
certain point. In socialist society as in society 
today large industry will develop more and more 
and increasingly absorb small industry. But 
here, too, the same conclusion holds gpod as in 
the case of the family and marriage. The di- 
rection of the evolution remains the same, but 
socialism removes all the painful and shocking 
manifestations that under the present system are 
the accompaniments of the social evolution. 

Today the transformation of the small farmer 
and the small producer from workers in the 
field of small production to workers in the field 
of large production means their transformation 
from property- holders into proletarians. In a 
socialist society a farmer or artisan who becomes 
a worker in a large socialized industry will be- 
come a sharer in all the advantages of large in- 
dustry; his condition is plainly bettered. His 
transition from large to small industry is no 
more to be compared with the change from a 
property-holder to a proletarian, but rather to 
the transformation of a small property-holder 
into a large property-holder. 

Small production is doomed to disappear. Only 
the socialist system can make it possible for 
farmers and handicraftmen to become partici- 
pants in the advantages of large production with- 
out sinking into the proletariat. Only under the 
socialist system can the inevitable downfall of 
the small producer, industrial and agricultural, 
result in an improvement of their condition. 

The mainspring of economic development will 
no longer be the competition which grinds down 



134 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 



and expropriates those who fall hejiind, it i 
be the power of attraction which the more highly 
developed forms of production exercise upon 
the less developed ones, 

A development of this sort is not only pain- 
less, it proceeds much more rapidly than that 
brought out by the spur of competition. Today, 
when the introduction of new and higher forms 
of production is impossible without ruining and 
expropriating the owners of industries carried 
on under inferior forms, and without inflicting 
suffering and privation upon the large masses 
of workers who have become throu^ this means 
superfluous, every economic progress is do^edly 
resisted. We see on all sides instances of the 
tenacity with which producers cling to antiquated 
forms of production, and of their desperate ef- 
forts to preserve them. Never yet was any sys- 
tem of production known so revolutionary as the 
present one ; never did any revolutionize so com- 
pletely within the space of a hundred years all 
human activities. And yet how many ancient 
ruins of antiquated, out-lived forms of produc- 
tion stitl exist 1 

Just as soon as the fear disappears of being 
thrown into the proletariat if an independent 
industry is abandoned; just as soon as the pres- 
ent prejudices against large production disappear 
because of the advantages which the social own- 
ership of large production will bestow upon all ; 
just as soon as it is possible for everyone to 
share these advantages, only fools will strive to 
preserve antiquated forms of production. 

What capitalist large production has not ac- 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTUSE 13^ 

compHshcd within a hundred years, socialist lai _ 
production will bring about within a short time, 
the absorption of outgrown small production. 
It will accomplish this without expropriation, 
through the attractive power of improved in- 
dustrial methods. In places where agricultural 
production is still not production for sale, but 
prevailingly production for use, small farming 
will perhaps continue for some time under the 
socialist society. In the end the advantages of 
co-operative large production will be discerned 
in these districts also. The change from small 
to large production in agriculture will be hastened 
and made easy by the steadily progressing dis- 
appearance of the contrast between city and cov 
try, and by the tendency to locate industries 
rural districts. 



9. Division of Prodncts in the Future State. 



There is still a point, the most important of 
all, that should be touched upon. The first ques- 
tion which is put to a socialist is usually: How 
will you go about the division of wealth? Shall 
each have an equal share? 

"Dividing up !" That sticks in the crop of the 
Philistine. Their whole conception of sociahsm 
begins and ends with that word. Indeed, even 
among the cultured the idea prevails that the 
object of socialism is to divide the whole wealth 
of the nation among the people. 

That this view still prevails, despite all pro- 
tests and proofs on the part of socialists, is to 
be ascribed not only to the malice of our oppo- 
nents, but also, and perhaps to a greater extent, 



n 



136 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

to their inability to understand the social i 
ditions that have been created by the develop- 
ment of large production. Their horizon is still, 
to a great extent, bounded by the conceptions 
that belong only to small production. From the 
standpoint of small production "dividing up" is 
the only possible form of socialism. The notion 
of dividing has long been familiar to the small 
business man and farmer. From the beginning 
of production for sale in antiquity, it has hap- 
pened innumerable times that as soon as a few 
families had heaped up great wealth and reduced 
farmers and artisans to a state of dependence, 
these latter rose in rebellion and attempted to im- 
prove their condition through the expulsion of 
the rich and the division of their property. They 
succeeded in this for the first time during the 
French Revolution, which laid such stress on 
the rights of private property. Peasants, artisans 
and the class that was about to develop into capi- 
talists, divided among themselves the church 
estates, "Dividing up" is the sociahsm of small 
production, the socialism of the conservative 
ranks of society, not the socialism of the pro- 
letariat engaged in large industry. 

Socialists do not propose to divide; on the 
contrary, their object is to concentrate in the 
hands of society the instruments of production 
that are now scattered in the hands of various 
owners. 

But this does not dispose of the question of 
'"dividing up." If the means of production be- 
long to society, to it must belong also, as a matter 
of course, the function of disposing of the prod- 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE 137 

flcts that are brought forth by the use of these 
means. In what way will society distribute these 
among its members ? Shall it be according to the 
principle of equality or according to the labor 
performed by each? And in the latter case, is 
every kind of labor to receive the same reward, 
whether it be pleasant or unpleasant, hard or 
easy, skilled or unskilled? 

The answer to this question seems to be the 
central point of socialism. Not only does it 
greatly preoccupy the opponents of socialism, but 
even the eariy socialists devoted a great deal of 
attention to it. From Fourier to VVeitling and 
from Weitling to Bellamy, there runs a steady 
stream of the most diversified answers, many of 
which reveal a wonderful cleverness. There is 
tio lack of positive propositions, many of which 
are as simple as they are practicable. Neverthe- 
less, the question has not the importance gener- 
ally ascribed to it. 

There was a time when the distribution of 
products was looked upon as wholly independent 
of production. Since the contradictions and ills 
of the capitalist system manifest themselves first 
in its peculiar method of distributing its products, 
it was quite natural that the exploited classes and 
their friends should have found the root of all 
evil in the "unjust" distribution of products. 
Of course, they proceeded, in accordance with 
the ideas prevalent at the beginning of the nine- 
teenth century, upon the supposition that the ex- 
isting system of distribution was the result of the 
ideas of the day, especially of the legal system 
in force. In order to remove this unjust distri- 



138 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

bution, all thai was needed was to invent a jui 
one, and to convince the world of its advantages. 
The just system could be no other than the re- 
verse of the existing one. "Today the grossest 
inequality rules ; the principle upon which distri- 
bution should be based must be one of equality." 
Today the idler rolls in wealth while the laborer 
starves, so others said: "To each according to 
his deeds" (or in newer form, "To each the 
product of his labor"). But doubts arose as to 
both these formulas, and so arose a third: "To 
each according to his needs." 

Since then socialists have come to realize that 
the distribution of products in a community is 
determined, not by the prevailing legal system, 
but by the prevailing system of production. The 
share of the landlord, the capitalist and the wage- 
earner in the total product of society is deter- 
mined by the part which land, capital and labor- 
power play in the present system of production. 
Certainly in a socialist society the distribution 
of products will not be left to the working of 
blind laws concerning the operation of which 
those concerned are unconscious. As today in 
a large industrial establishment production and 
the payment of wages are carefully regulated, 
so in a socialist society, which is nothing more 
than a single gigantic industrial concern, the 
same principle must prevail. The rules accord- 
ing to which the distribution of products is to 
be carried out will be established by those con- 
cerned. Nevertheless, it will not depend upon 
their pleasure what these rules shall be; tl 
will not be adopted arbitrarily according to I 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE 

or that "principle," they will be determined t_ 
the actual conditions of society and, above all, by 
the conditions of production. 

For instance, the degree of productivity of 
labor, at any given time, exercises a great in- 
fluence upon the manner in which distribution is 
effected. We can conceive a time when science 
shall have raised industry to such a high level 
of productivity that everything wanted by man 
will be produced in great abundance. In such 
a case, the formula, "To each according to his 
needs," would be applied as a matter of course 
and without difficulty. On the other hand, not 
even the profoundest conviction of the justice 
of this formula would be able to put it into 
practice if the productivity of labor remained 
so low that the proceeds of the most excessive 
toil could produce only the bare necessities. 
Again, the formula, "To each according to his 
deeds," will always be found inapplicable. If it 
has any meaning at all, it presupposes a distribu- 
tion of the total product of the commonwealth 
among its members. This notion, like that of a 
general division with which the socialist regime 
is to be ushered in, springs from the modes of 
thought that are peculiar to the modem system 
of private property. To distribute all products 
at stated intervals would be equivalent to the 
gradual reintroduction of private property in 
the means of production. 

The very principle of socialist production limits 
the possible distribution to only a jjortion of the 
products. All those products which are requisite 
to the enlargement of production cannot, as j" 



140 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

matter of course, be the subject of distributioiijl^ 
and the same holds good with regard to all such 
products as are intended for common use, i. e., 
for the establishment, preser\-atioii or enlarge- 
ment of pubhc institutions. 

Already in modern society the number and 
size of such institutions increases steadily. It is 
in this domain especially that large production 
crowds down small production. It goes without 
saying that so far from being checked, this de- 
velopment will be greatly stimulated in a socialist 
society. 

The quantity of products that can be absorbed 
by private consumption and, accordingly, be 
turned into private property, must inevitably be 
a much smaller portion of the total product in 
a socialist, than in modern, society, where almost 
all the products are merchandise and private 
property. In socialist society it is not the bulk 
of the products, but only the residue, that is 
distributed. 

But even this residue socialist society will not 
be able to dispose of at will; there, too, the re- 
quirements of production will determine the 
course to be pursued. Such production is un- 
dergoing steady changes ; the forms and methods 
of distribution will be subject to manifold 
changes in a socialist society. 

It is entirely Utopian to imagine that a special 
system of distribution is to be manufactured, 
and that it will stand for all time. In this mat- 
ter, as httle as any other, is socialist society likely 
to move by leaps and bounds, or start all over 
anew; it will go on from the point at which 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE Mlj 

capitalist society ceases. The distribution i 
goods in a socialist society might possibly con- 
tinue for some time under forms that are essen- 
tially developments of the existing- system of 
wage-payment. At any rate, this is the point 
from which it is bound to start. Just as the forms 
of wage-labor differ today, not only from time 
to time, but also in various branches of industry, 
and in various sections of the country, so also 
may it happen that in a socialist society the dis- 
tribution of products may be carried on under 
a variety of forms corresponding to the various 
needs of the population and the historical ante- 
cedents of the industry. We must not think of 
the sociahst society as something rigid and uni- 
form, but rather as an organism, constantly de- 
veloping, rich in possibilities of change, an or- 
ganism that is to develop naturally from increas- 
ing division of labor, commercial exchange, and 
the dominance of society by science and art. 

Next to the thought of "dividing up," that 
of "equal shares" troubles the foes of socialism 
most. "Socialism," they declare, "proposes that 
everyone shall have an equal share of the total 
product ; the industrious is to have no more than 
the lazy; hard and disagreeable labor is to re- 
ceive no higher reward than that which is light 
and agreeable ; the hod-carrier who has nothing 
to do but carry the material is to be on a par 
vnth the architect himself. Under such circum- 
stances everyone will work as little as possible; 
no one will perform the hard and disagreeable 
tasks; knowledge, having ceased to be appred-j 
ated, will cease to be cultivated; and the fint 



THE CLASS STSUGGLB 

iiilt wiU be the relapse of society iato barbar- 
ism. Consequently, socialism is impracticable." 

The fallacy of ttiis reasoning is too glaring to 
need exposure. This much may be said : Should 
socialist society ever decide to decree equality of 
incomes, and should the effect of such a measure 
threaten to be the dire one prophesied, the natural 
result would be, not that socialist production, but 
that the principle of equality of incomes, would 
be thrown overboard. 

The foes of socialism would be Justified in 
concluding from the equality of incomes that 
socialism is impracticable if they could prove: 

(1) That this equahty would be under all 
circumstances irreconcilable with the progress of 
production. This they never have, and never 
can, prove, because the activity of the individual 
in production does not depend solely upon his 
remuneration, but upon a great vanety of cir- 
cumstances — his sense of duty, his ambition, his 
dignity, his pride, etc. — none of which can be 
the subject of positive prophecy, but only of con- 
jecture, a conjecture which makes against, and 
not for, the opinion expressed by the opponents 
of socialism. 

(2) That the equality of incomes is so es- 
sential to a socialist society that the latter cannot 
be conceived without the former. The oppo- 
nents of socialism will find it equally impossible 
to prove this. A glance over the various forms 
of communist production from the primitive 
communism down to tlie latest communist socie- 
ties will reveal how manifold are the forms of 

iBtribution that are applicable to a community 



; COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTXIKE 143 

of property in the instruments of production. 
All forms of modern wage-payment- fixed sala- 
ries, piece wages, time wages, bonuses — all of 
them are reconcilable with the spirit of a social- 
ist society; and there is not one of them that 
may not play a role in socialist society, as the 
wants and customs of its members, together with 
the requirements of production, may demand. 

It does not, however, follow from this that 
the principle of equality of incomes — not neces- 
sarily identical with their uniformity — will play 
no part in socialist society. What is certain is 
that it will do so not as the aim of a movement 
for leveling things generally, forcibly, artificially, 
but as the result of a natural development, a 
social tendency. 

In the capitalist system of production there 
exist two tendencies, one to increase and the 
other to decrease the differences in incomes; 
one to increase, one to diminish inequality. By 
dissolving the middle classes of society and swell- 
ing constantly the size of individual fortunes the 
capitalist system broadens and deepens the chasm 
that exists between the masses of the population 
and those who are at its head, the latter tower 
higher and higher above the former. Together 
with this tendency, is noticed another, which, 
operating within the circle of the masses them- 
selves, steadily equalizes their incomes. It flings 
the small producers, farmers and manufacturers, 
into the class of the proletariat, or at least, pushes 
their incomes down to the proletarian level, and 
wipes out existing differences among the pro- 
letarians themselves. The machine tends steadily 



144 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

to remove all differences which original _ 

peared in the proletariat. Today the difference 
in wages among the various strata of labor fluct- 
uate incessantly and come nearer and nearer to 
a point of uniformity. At the same time, the 
incomes of the educated proletariat are irresist- 
ibly tending downward. The equalization of in- 
comes among the masses — that which the oppo- 
nents of socialism, with the greatest moral in- 
dignation, brand as the purpose of socialism — 
is going on before their eyes in the society of 
today. 

Under the socialist system, as a matter ol 
course, all those tendencies that sharpen in- 
equalities and that proceed from private owner- 
ship in the means of production, would come to 
an end. On the other hand, the tendency to 
wipe out inequalities of incomes would find 
stronger expression. But here, again, the obser- 
vations made upon the dissolution of existing 
family forms and the downfall of small produc- 
tion hold good. The tendency of economic de- 
velopment remains in socialist, as in capitalist, so- 
ciety, but it finds a very different expression. To- 
day the equalization of incomes among the mass 
of the population proceeds by the depression of 
the higher incomes to the level of the lower ones, 
In a socialist society it must inevitably proceed by 
the raising of the lower to the standard of the 
higher. 

The opponents of socialism seek to frighten 
the small producers and the working-men with 
the claim that equalization of incomes can mean 
for them nothing else than a lowering of their 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE 1« 

condition, because, they say, the incomes of t 

wealthy classes are not sufficient, if divided 
among the poor, to preserve the present average 
income of the working and middle classes; con- 
sequently, if there is to be an equality of incomes, 
the upper classes of workers and the small pro- 
ducers will have to give up part of their in- 
comes, and will thus be the losers under social-_^ 

Whatever truth there may be in this i 
lies in the fact that the wretchedly poor, espi 
cially the slum proletariat, are today so 
ous and their need so great that to divide among 
them the immense incomes of the rich would 
scarcely be enough to make possible for them 
the existence of a worker of the better-paid 
class. Whether this is a sufficient reason for 
preserving our glorious social system may very 
well be doubted. We are of the opinion, how- 
ever, that a diminution of the misery, which 
would be accomplished through such a division, 
would mean a step forward. 

There is, however, no question of "dividing 
up" ; the only question is concerning a change 
in the method of production. The transforma- 
tion of the capitahst system of production into 
the socialist system of production must inevitably 
result in a rapid increase of the quantity of wealtfi 
produced. It must never be lost sight of that 
the capitalist system of production for sale 
hinders today the progress of economic develop- 
ment, hinders the full expansion of the productive 
forces that lie latent in society. Not only is i 
unable to absorb the small industries as rapidl 



THE Class struggle 

as the technical development makes possibSe 
and desirable, but it has even become impassible 
for it to employ all the labor forces that are 
available. The capitalist system of production 
squanders these forces ; it steadily drives increas- 
ing numbers of workers into the ranks of the 
unemployed, tlie slum proletariat, the parasites 
and the unproductive middlemen. 

Such a state of things would be impossible 
in a socialist society. It could not fail to find 
productive labor for all its available labor forces. 
It would increase, it might even double, the 
number of productive workers ; in the measure 
in which it did this it would multiply the total 
wealth produced yearly. This increase in pro- 
duction would be enough in itself to raise the 
incomes of all workers, not only of the poorest, 

Furtherinore. since socialist production would 
promote the absorption of small production by 
large production and thus increase the productiv- 
ity of labor, it would be possible, not only to 
raise the incomes of the workers, but also to 
shorten the hours of labor. 

In view of this, it is fooHsh to claim that 
socialism means the equality of pauperism. This 
is not the equality of sociahsm ; it is the equality 
of the modern system of production. Socialist 
production must inevitably improve the condi- 
tion of all the working classes, including the 
small industrialist and the small farmer. Ac- 
cording to the economic conditions under which 
the change from capitalism to socialism is ef- 
fected this improvement will be greater or less, 
, but in any case it will be marked. And every 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE 147 

economic advance beyond that will produce an 
increase, and not, as today, a decrease, in the 
general well-being. 

This change in the tendency of incomes is, in 
the^eyes of socialists, of much more importance 
than the absolute increase of incomes. The 
thoughtful man lives more in the future than in 
the present ; what the future threatens or prom- 
ises preoccupies him more than the enjoyment 
of the present. Not what is, but what will be, 
not existing conditions, but tendencies, deter- 
mine the happiness both of individuals and of 
whole states. 

Thus we become acquainted with another ele- 
ment of superiority in socialist over capitalist 
society. It affords, not only a greater well-being, 
but also certainty of livelihood— a security that 
today the greatest fortune cannot guarantee. 
If greater well-being affects only those who have 
hitherto been exploited, security of hvehhood is 
a boon to the present exploiters, whose well-being 
demands no improvement or is capable of none. 
Uncertainty hovers over both rich and poor, and 
it is, perhaps, more trying than want itself. In 
imagination it forces those to taste the bitter- 
ness of want who are not yet subject to it; it is 
a specter that haunts the palaces of the wealth- 
iest. 

All observers who have become acquainted 
with communist societies, whether they were 
situated in India, France or America, have been 
struck with the appearance of calmness, confi- 
dence and equanimity peculiar to their members. 
Independent of the oscillations of the market, 



148 



THE CLASS STllUGGLfi 



and in possession of their own instruments of 
production, they are self-sufficient ; they regulate 
their labor in accordance with their needs, and 
they know in advance just what they have to 
expect. And yet the security enjoyed by these 
communities is far from being perfect. Their 
control over nature is slight, the societies them- 
selves are small. Mishaps brought on by dis- 
eases of cattle, failures of crops, freshets, etc., 
are frequent and smite the whole body. Upon 
how much firmer a basis would a socialist com- 
munity stand with boundaries co-extensive 
those of a nation and with all the conqui 
of science at its command! 

10. Socialism and Freedom. 

That a socialist society would afford its mem- 
bers comfort and security has been admitted even 
by many of the opponents of sociahsm. "But" 
they say, "these advantages are bought at too 
dear a price ; they are paid for with a total loss 
of freedom. The bird in a cage may have suf- 
ficient daily food ; it also is secure against hunger 
and the inclemencies of the weather. But it has 
lost its freedom, and for that reason is a pitiful 
thing. It yearns for a chance to take its place 
among the dangers of the outside world, to strug- 
gle for its own existence," They maintain that 
socialism destroys economic freedom, the free- 
dom of labor; that it introduces a despotism in 
comparison with which the most unrestricted ab- 
solutism would be freedom. 

5o great is the fear of this slavery th 
ae socialists have been seized with 




THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE 149 

have become anarchists. They have as great a 
horror of communism as of production for sale, 
and they attempt to escape both by seeking both. 
They want to have communism and produc- 
tion for sale together. Theoretically, this is ab- 
surd; in practice, it could amount to nothing 
more than the estabhshment of voluntary co- 
operative societies for mutual aid. 

It is true that socialist production is irrecon- 
cilable with the full freedom of labor, that is, 
with the freedom of the laborer to work when, 
where and how he wills. But this freedom of 
the laborer is irreconcilable with any systematic, 
co-operative form of labor, whether the form 
be capitahst or socialist. Freedom of labor is 
possible only in small production, and even there 
only up tb a certain point. Even where small 
production is freed from all restrictive regula- 
tions, the individual worker still remains a de- 
pendent on natural or social conditions ; the 
farmer, for example, on the weather, the artisan 
on the state of the market. Nevertheless, small 
production ofTers the possibility of a certain de- 
gree of freedom; this is its ideal, the most revo- 
lutionary ideal of which the small bourgeois is 
capable. A hundred years ago at the time of the 
French Revolution this ideal was based on in- 
dustrial conditions. Today it has no economic 
basis and can persist only in the heads of people 
who are unable to perceive that an economic revo- 
lution has taken place. It is not the sociahst 
who destroy this "freedom of labor," but the 
resistless progress of large production. The 
very ones from whom is heard most frequently 



THE CLASS STKUGGLE 

the declaration that labor must be free are the 
capitalists, those who have contributed most to 
overthrow that freedom. 

Freedom of labor has come to an end, not only 
in the factory, but wherever the individual 
worker is only a link in a long chain of workers. 
It does not exist either for the manual worker 
or for the brain worker employed in any indus- 
try. The hospital physician, the school teacher, 
the railroad employe, the newspaper writer— 
none of these enjoy the freedom of labor; they 
are all bound to certain rules, they must all be 
at their post at a certain hour. 

It is true that in one respect the working- 
man does enjoy freedom under the capitalist 
system. If the work does not suit him in one 
factory, he is free to seek work in another; he 
can change his employer. In a socialist 
munity, where all the means of production 
in a single hand, there is but one employer, 
change is impossible. 

In this respect the wage-earner today 
certain freedom in comparison with the wor^^ 
in a socialist society, but this cannot be called 
a freedom of labor. However frequently a 
worker may change his place of work today, he 
will not find freedom. In each place the activi- 
ties of every individual worker are defined and 
regulated. This has become a technical neces- 
sity. 

Accordingly, the freedom with the loss of 
which the worker is threatened in a socialist 
society is not freedom of labor, but freedom 
choose his master. Under the present sy; 



er^^^H 
t'orlw 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTUSE ISlJ 

this freedom is of no slight importance ; it is :l 
protection to the workingman. But even thifl 
freedom is gradually destroyed by the progress 
of capitalism. The increasing number of thtr 
unemployed reduces constantly the number of 
positions that are open and throws upon the 
labor market more applicants than there are 
places. The idle workingman is, as a rule, happy 
if he can secure work of any sort. Furthennore,j 
the increased concentration of the means of pro- 
duction in a few hands has a steady tendency t 
place over the workingman the same employer- 
or set of employers whichever way he may turn. 
Inquiry, therefore, shows that what is decried 
as the wicked and tyrannical purpose of social- 
ism is but the natural tendency of the economic 
development of modern society. 

Socialism will not, and cannot, check this de- 
velopment; but in this as in so many other re- 
spects socialism can obviate the evils that accom- 
pany the development. It cannot remove the 
dependence of the working-man upon the mech- 
anism of production in which he is one of the! 
wheels; but it substitutes for the dependence of^ 
a working-man upon a capitalist with interest 
hostile to him a dependence upon a society of ' 
which he is himself a member, a society of equal 
comrades, all of whom have the same interests. 

It can be easily understood why a liberal- 
minded lawyer or author may consider such a 
dependence unbearable, but it is not unbearable 
to the modern proletarian, as a glance at the 
trade union movement will show. The organi- 
zations of labor furnish a picture of the "t; 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

anny of the socialist paternal state" of which 
the opponents of socialism have so much to say. 
In the organizations of labor the rules under 
which each member is to work are laid down 
minutely and enforced strictly. Yet it has never 
occurred to any member of such an organiza- 
tion that these rules were an unbearable restric- 
tion upon his personal liberty. Those who have 
found it incumbent upon them to defend 
the freedom of labor against this "terrorism." 
and who have done so often with force of anus 
and bloodshed, were never the working-men, but 
their exploiters. Poor Freedom I which has to- 
day no defenders except slaveholders I 

But in a socialist community the lack of free- 
dom in work would not only lose its oppressive 
character, it would also become the foundation 
of the highest freedom yet possible to man. This 
seems a contradiction, but the contradiction is 
only apparent. 

Down to the day when large production began, 
the labor employed in the production of the ne- 
cessities of life took up the whole time of those 
engaged in it; it required the fullest exercise of 
both body and mind. This was true, not only 
of the fisherman and the hunter, but also of the 
farmer, the mechanic and the merchant. The 
existence of the human being engaged in pro- 
duction was consumed almost wholly by his oc- 
cupation. It was labor that steeled his sinews 
and nerves, that quickened his brain and made 
him anxious to acquire knowledge. But the fur- 
ther division of labor was carried, the more one- , 
sided did it make the producers. Mind and bodjr I 



THE COMMONWEAX,TH OF THE FUTURE 153 

ceased to exercise themselves in a variety of di- 
rections and to develop all their powers. Wholly 
taken up by incomplete momentary tasks, the 
producers lost the capacity to comprehend phe- 
nomena as organic wholes. A harmonious, well- 
rounded development of physical and mental 
powers, a deep concern in the problems of na- 
ture and society, a philosophical bent of mind, 
that is, a searching for the highest truth for its 
own sake, — none of these could be found 
under such circumstances, except among those 
classes who remained free from the necessity of 
toil. Until the commencement of the era of 
machinery this was possible only by throwing 
upon others the burden of labor, by exploiting 
them. The most ideal, the most philosophic race 
that history has yet known, the only society of 
thinkers and artists devoted to science and art 
for their own sakes, was the Athenian aristoc- 
racy, the slaveholding landlords of Athens. 

Among them all labor, whether slave or free, 
was regarded as degrading — and justly so. It 
was no presumption on the part of Socrates 
when he said: "Traders and mechanics lack 
culture. They have no leisure, and without 
leisure no good education is possible. They learn 
only what their trade requires of them; knowl- 
edge in itself has no attraction for them. They 
take up arithmetic only for the sake of trade, 
not for the purpose of acquiring a knowledge of 
numbers. It is not given to them to strive for 
higher things. The merchant and mechanic say : 
'The pleasure derived from honor and knowl- 
edge is of no value when compared with money- 



154 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

making.' However skilled smiths, carpenters and 
shoemakers may be at their trade, most of them 
are animated only by the souls of slaves; they 
know not the true nor the beau6ful." 

Economic development has advanced since 
those days. The division of labor has reached a 
point undreamt of, and the system of produc- 
tion for sale has driven many of the former ex- 
ploiters and people of culture into the class of 
producers. Like the mechanics and farmers, the 
rich also are wholly taken up with their busi- 
ness. They do not now assemble in gymnasiimis 
and academies, but in stock exchanges and mar- 
kets. The speculations in which they are ab- 
sorbed do not concern questions of truth and 
justice, but the prices of wool and whiskey, 
bonds and coupons. These are the speculations 
that consume their mental energies. After this 
"labor" they have neither strength nor taste for 
any but the most commonplace amusements. 

On the other hand, as far as the cultured 
classes are concerned, their education has be- 
come a merchandise. They, too, have neither 
time nor inclination for disinterested search for 
truth, for striving after the ideal. Each buries 
himself in his specialty and considers every mo- 
ment lost which is spent in learning anything 
which cannot be turned into money. Hence the 
movement to abolish Greek and Latin from the 
secondary schools, Whatever the pedagogic 
grounds may be for this movement, the real 
reason is the desire to have the youth taiig-ht 
only what is "useful," that is, what can be turned— 
into money. Even among scientific men aa(' 



THE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE IS] 

artists the instinct after a harmonious develop- ^ 
ment is perceptibly losing ground. On all sides 
speciaHsts are springing up. Science and art 
are degraded to the level of a trade. What Soc- 
rates said of ancient handicraft now holds good 
of these pursuits. The philosophic way of look- 
ing at things is on the decline — that is, within 
the classes here considered. 

In the meantime, a new sort of labor has 
sprung up — machine labor ; and a new class — the 
proletariat. 

The machine robs labor of all intellectual ac- 
tivity. The working-man at a machine no long- 
er needs to think ; all that he has to do is silently 
to obey the machine. The machine dictates to 
him what he has to do; he has become an ap- 
pendage to it. What is said of hand labor ai>- 
plies also, though to a slighter extent, to home- 
work and hand-work done in the factory. The 
division of labor in the production of a single 
article among innumerable working-men paves 
the way for the introduction of machinery. 

The first result of the monotony and absence 
of intellectual activity in the work of the pro 
letarian is the apparent dulling of his mind. 

The second result is that he is driven to re- 
volt against excessive hours of work. To htm 
labor is not identical with life; life commences 
only when labor is at an end. For working-men 
to whom labor and life were identical, freedom 
of labor meant freedom of life. The working- 
man, who lives only when he does not work, 
can enjoy a free life only by being free from 
labor. As a matter of course, the efforts of this 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

class of workers cannot be directed to freeing 
themselves from all labor. Labor is the condi- 
tion of life. But their eiiforts will necessarily 
be directed toward reducing their hours of labor 
far enough to leave them time to live. 

This is one of the principal causes of the 
struggle on the part of the modem proletariat to 
shorten the hours of work, a struggle which 
would have had no meaning to the farmers and 
mechanics of former social systems. The strug- 
gle of the proletariat for shorter hours is not 
aimed at economic advantages, such as a rise in 
wages or the reduction of the number of unem- 
ployed. The struggle for shorter hours is a 
struggle for life. 

But the unintellectual character of machine 
work has a third result. The intellectual pow- 
ers of the proletariat are not exhausted by their 
labor as are those of other workers; they lie 
fallow during work. For this reason the crav- 
ing of the proletarian to exercise his mind out- 
side of his hours of work is just so much the 
stronger. One of the most remarkable phenom- 
ena in modern society is the thirst for knowledge 
displayed by the proletariat. While all other 
classes kill their time with the most unintellec- 
tual diversions, the proletarian displays a pas- 
sion for intellectual culture. Only one who has 
had an opportunity to associate with the pro- 
letariat can fully realize the strength of this 
thirst after knowledge and enlightenment. But 
even the outsider may imagine it, if he cotn- 
pares the newspapers, magazines and pamphlets 
[ of Uk wc^kers with the literature that finds ac- 
"i other social circles. 




tHE COMMONWEALTH OF THE FUTURE 157 

And this thirst for knowledge is entirely dis- 
interested. Knowledge cannot help the worker 
at a machine to increase his income. He seeks 
truth for its own sake, not for material profit. 
Accordingly, he does not limit himself to any 
one domain of knowledge; he tries to embrace 
the whole ; he seeks to understand the whole of 
society, the whole world. The most difficult 
problems attract him most; it is often hard to 
bring him down from the clouds to solid earth. 

It is not the possesison of knowledge but the 
effort to acquire it that makes the philosopher. 
It is among the despised and ignorant proletariat 
that the philosophical spirit of the brilliant mem- 
bers of the Athenian aristocracy is revived. But 
the free development of this spirit is not possi- 
ble in modern society. The proletariat is with- 
out means to instruct itself; it is deprived of 
opportunities for systematic study, it is exposed 
to all the dangers and inconveniences of planless 
self-instruction ; above all, it lacks sufficient 
leisure. Science and art remain to the prole- 
tariat a promised land which it looks at from a 
distance, which it stru^les to possess, but which 
it cannot enter. 

Only the triumph of Socialism can render ac- 
cessible to the proletariat all the sources of cul- 
ture. Only the triumph of socialism can make 
possible the reduction of the hours of work to 
such a point that the working-man can enjoy 
leisure enough to acquire adequate knowlei^. 
The capitalist system of production wakens the 
proletarian's desire for knowledge; the socialist 
system alone can satisfy it. 



158 IIIE CLASS STRUGGLE 

It is not the freedom of labor, but the jreei 
from labor, which in a socialist society the use 
of machinery makes increasingly possible, that 
will bring to mankind freedom of life, freedom 
for artistic and intellectual activity, freedom for 
the noblest enjoyment. 

That blessed, harmonious culture, which has 
only once appeared in the history of mankind 
and was then the privilege of a small body of se- 
lect aristocrats, will become the common prop- 
erty of all civilized nations. What slaves were 
to the ancient Athenians, machinery will be to 
modem man. Man will feel all the elevating 
influences that flow from freedom from produc- 
tive toil, without being poisoned by the evil in- 
fluences which, through chattel slavery, finally 
undermined the Athenian aristocracy. And as 
the modern means of science and art are vastly 
superior to those of two thousand years ago, and 
the civilization of today overshadows that of the 
little land of Greece, so will the socialist com- 
monwealth outshine in moral greatness and ma- 
terial well-being the most glorious society that 
history has thus far known. 

Happy the man to whom it is given to con- 
tribute his strength to the reahzation of this 
ideal. 




Socialism and the Propertjr- Hoi ding ClasBean 

The last paragraphs of our declaration of prin- 
ciples reads as follows: "This social transfor- 
mation means the liberation, not only of the pro- 
letariat, but of the whole human race. Only the 
working-class, however, can bring it about. All 
other classes, despite their conflicting interests, 
maintain their existence on the basis of the pri- 
vate ownership of the means of production, and 
therefore have a common motive for supportit^ 
the principles of the existing social order. 

"The struggle of the working-class against 
capitalist exploitation is necessarily a political 
struggle. The working-class cannot develop its 
economic organization and wage its economic 
battles without pqlitical rights. It cannot accom- 
plish the transfer of the means of production to 
the community as a whole without first having 
come into possession of political power. 

"To make this struggle of the workers con- 
scious and unified, to keep its one great object 
in view, — this is the purpose of the Socialist 
Party." 

In all lands where capitalist production pre- 
vails the interests of the working-class are iden- 
tical. With the development of world-commerce 
and production for the world-market the posi- 
tion of the workers in each country becomes in- 
creasingly dependent on that of the workers in 
159 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

other countries. The liberation of the working- 
class is, therefore, a task in which the workers 
of all civilized lands are equally concerned. 
Being conscious of this fact the Socialist Party 
proclaims its solidarity with the class-conscious 
workers of all lands. 

"The Socialist Party, accordingly, struggles, not 
for any class privileges, but for the abolition of 
classes and class-rule, for equal rights and equal 
duties for all, without distinction of sex or race. 
In conformity with these principles it opposes in 
present day society, not only the exploitation and 
oppression of wage-workers, but also every form 
of exploitation and oppression, be it directed 
against a class, a party, a sex, or a race." 

The introductory sentence of the first of these 
paragraphs needs little explanation. We have 
already shown tliat the triumph of socialism is 
in the interest of our entire social development. 
In a certain sense it is even in the interest of the 
owning and exploiting classes. These, hke their 
victims, suffer from the contradictions of the 
modem method of production. Some of them 
degenerate in idleness, others wear themselves 
out in the ceaseless race for profits; while over 
them all hangs the Damocles' sword of bank- 
ruptcy. 

But observation teaches us that the great ma- 
jority of the owners and exploiters are bitterly 
opposed to socialism. Can this be due simply to 
lack of knowledge and insight ? The spokesmen 
among the adversaries of socialism are, on the 
contrary, the very persons' whose positions in the 
government, in society, and in science should fit 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 161 

them best of all to understand the social mechan- 
ism and to perceive the law of social evolution. 

And so shocking are the conditions in modem 
society that no one who wishes to be taken se- 
riously in politics or science dares any longer 
to deny the truth of the charges preferred by 
socialism against the present social order. On 
the contrary the clearest thinkers in all the capi- 
tahst pohtical parties admit that there is "some 
truth" in those charges ; some even declare that 
the final triumph of socialism is inevitable unless 
society suddenly turns about and reforms — a 
thing these gentlemen imagine can be done ofl- 
hand, provided the demands of this or that party 
be promptly granted. In this manner even those 
among the non-socialist parties who best under- 
stand the sociahst critique of capitahst society 
save themselves from accepting the conclusions 
of this critique. 

The cause of this remarkable phenomenon is 
not difficult to discover. Although certain im- 
portant interests of the property-holding classes 
plead against the private ownership of the means 
of production, other interests, more immediate 
and easily discernible, demand its retention. 

This is especially the case with the rich. They 
can expect no immediate gain from the abolition 
of private property in the means of production. 
The beneficent results that would flow therefrom 
would be ultimately felt by them as well as by 
society in general, but such results are compara- 
tively distant. The disadvantages which they 
would suffer are, on the other hand, self-evident ; 
the power and distinction they enjoy today would 



THE Cy^SS STRUGGLE 

disappear at once, and not a few mig^ht be de- 
prived, also, of their present ease and comfort. 

It is otherwise with the lower ranks of the 
property-holding classes, the small producers, 
merchants and farmers. These have nothing to 
lose in point of power and distinction, and they 
can only gain in point of ease and comfort by the 
introduction of the sociaUst system of produc- 
tion. But in order to realize this they must rise 
above the point of view of their own class. From 
the standpoint of these small capitalists or farm- 
ers the capitalist system of production is unin- 
telligible; modem socialism, naturally, they can 
understand still less. The one thing they have a 
clear notion of is the necessity of private owner- 
ship in their own implements of labor if their 
system of production is to be preserved. So long 
as the small manufacturer reasons as a small 
manufacturer, the small farmer as a small farm- 
er, the small merchant as a small merchant, so 
long as they are still possessed of a strong sense 
of their own class, so long will they be bound to 
the idea of private ownership in the means of 
production, so long will they instinctively resist 
socialism, however ill they may fare under capi- 
talism. 

We have seen in a previous chapter how pri- 
vate property in the means of production fetters 
the small producers to their undeveloped occupa- 
tions long after these have ceased to afford them 
a competence, and even when they might im- 
prove their condition by becoming wage-work- 
ers outright. Thus private ownership in the 
means of production is the force that binds all 



Erie property-holding classes to the capitalist sys- 
tem, even those who are themselves among the 
exploited, whose property-holding has become a 
bitter mockery. 

Only those individuals among the small capi- 
talists and fanners who have despaired of the 
preservation of their class, who are no longer 
blind to the fact that the form of production 
upon which they depend for a living is doomed, 
are in a position to understand the principles 
of socialism. But lack of information and nar- 
rowness of view, both of which are natural re- 
sults of their condition, make it difficult for them 
to realize the utter hopelessness of their class, 
Their misery and their hysterical search for a 
means of salvation have hitherto only had the ef- 
fect of making them the easy prey of any dema- 
gog who was sufficiently self-assertive and who 
did not stick at promises. 

Among the upper ranks of the property-hold- 
ing classes there exists a higher degree of culture 
and a broader view. Here and there a few indi- 
viduals are still affected by idealistic reminis- 
cences from the days of the early revolutionary 
struggles. But woe to the person in these upper 
ranks who shows an interest in socialism or en- 
gages in its propaganda! He must soon choose 
between giving up his ideas or breaking all the 
social bonds that have held and supported him. 
Few possess the vigor and independence of char- 
acter requisite to approach the point where the 
roads fork; few among these few are brave 
enough to break with their own class when they 
have reached the point; and, finally, of these few 



164 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

among the few the greater portion have hitherto 
soon grown tired, recognized the "indiscretions 
of their youth," and finally turned "sensible." 

The idealists among the upper classes are the 
only ones whose support it is at all possible to en- 
list in favor of socialism. But even among these 
the majority are moved by the insight which 
they have acquired only far enough to wear 
themselves out in fruitless searchings for a 
peaceful solution of the social problem; that is 
to say, in searching for a solution that will recon- 
cile the interests of the capitalist class with their 
more or less developed knowledge of socialism 
and their consciences. 

I Only those bourgeois idealists develop into 
genuine socialists who have, not only the requi- 
site theoretical insight, but also the courage and 
strength to break with tlieir class. 

Accordingly, the cause of socialism has little 
to hope from the property-holding classes. In- 
dividual members may be won over to socialism, 
but only such as no longer belong by convictions 
and conduct to the class to which their economic 
position assigns them. These will ever be a 
very small minority, except when, during revo- 
lutionary periods, the scales incline to the side 
of sociahsm. Only at such times may the so- 
cialists look forward to a stampede from the 
ranks of the property-holding classes. 

Thus far the only favorable recruiting ground 
for the socialist army has been, not the classes 
which still have something to lose, however little 
that may be, but the class of those who have 
nothing to lose but their chains, and a world to 
gain. 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 165 

2. Servants and Menials. 

■rhe recruiting ground of socialism is the class 
of the propertyless, but not all ranks of this 
class are equally favorable. 

Though it is false to say, with the Philistines, 
that there have always been poor people, it is 
nevertheless true that pauperism is as old as the 
system of production for sale. At first it ap- 
peared only as an exceptional phenomenon. In 
the Middle Ages, for example, there were but 
few who did not own the instruments of pro- 
duction necessary for the satisfaction of their 
own wants. In those days it was an easy mat- 
ter for the comparatively small number of prop- 
ertyless persons to find situations with the prop- 
erly-holding families as assistants, farm-hands, 
journeymen, maids, etc. These were ^nerally 
young persons, and their lot was alleviated by 
the prospect of establishing their own workshops 
and owning their own homes. In all cases they 
worked with the head of the family or his wife, 
and enjoyed in common with them the fruits of 
their labor. As members of a property-holding 
family they were not proletarians ; they felt an 
interest in the property of the family whose 
prosperity and adversity they shared alike.' 
Where servants are part of the family of the 
pFQperty-hoIder, they will be found ready to de- 
fend property even though they have none them- 
selves. Among such socialism cannot strike 
root. 

The position of the apprentices was much the 
same as that of the classes just discussed (Com- 
pare Ch. II,, i.). 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

Gradually, however, there grew up beside 
these classes, which really took part in produc- 
tion, another class, that of personal servants. 
Some of the poor turned for support to the fami- 
lies of the greater exploiters. In the Middle 
Ages this meant entering the personal service of 
the nobles, rich merchants, or higher clergy. The 
poor entered this service, not to assist in produc- 
tive labor, but to act as mercenary soldiers or 
mere lackeys. The ancient feeling of mutual 
interest has disappeared, but a new one has 
taken its place. There are various grades of 
servants, with different work and different pay. 
Each individual is eager to improve his position 
by any means within his power. His success ts 
dependent on the master's favor. The more 
skillfully he adapts himself, the better are his 
prospects. Again, the larger the income of the 
master and the greater his power and distinc- 
tion, the more plentiful are the crumbs whidi 
fall to his menials; this holds especially of those 
menials who are kept for show, whose only task 
is to make a parade of the superfluities which 
their master enjoys, to assist him in squandering 
his wealth, and to stand by him loyally if he 
commits crime or folly. The modern servant, 
accordingly, comes into relations of peculiar in- 
timacy with his master, and thus he has naturally 
developed into a foe of the oppressed and ex- 
ploited working-class; not infrequently he is 
more ruthless than his master in his treatment 
of them. The master, if he has any discretion 
at all, will not kill the hen that lays the golden 
^SS' ^^ ^'" preserve her, not only for himself, 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 167 

but also for his successors. The menial is not 
restrained by any such considerations. 

Small wonder that among the people generally 
nothing is more hated than this class of menials. 
Their subservience toward those above and their 
brutality toward those below have become pro- 
verbial. 

The characteristics of the menial are, however, 
not confined to the propertyless people of the 
lower classes. The poverty-stricken noble seek- 
ing a livelihood as courtier is on a level with the 
servant of the lowest class. 

But we are here dealing with menials of this 
latter class. The growing intensity of exploita- 
tion, the constantly swelling surplus enjoyed by 
the capitalist, together with his resulting extrava- 
gance, all favor a steady increase in the number 
of those employed as servants. That is to say, 
tliey favor the growth of a class which, despite 
its lack of property, is not at all a promising re- 
cniiting ground for the socialist movement. 

But other tendencies, fortunately, are working 
in the opposite direction. The steady revolution 
in industry, with its encroachments upon the 
family, its withdrawal of one occupation after 
another from the sphere of household duties and 
the assignment of them to special industries, and, 
above all, the infinite division and subdivision of 
labor, are building up the various trades of bar- 
bers, waiters, cab drivers, etc. Long after these 
and similar trades have lost their domestic char- 
acter they tend to preserve the characteristics of 
their origin ; nevertheless, as time passes, these 
characteristics wear off, and the members of 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

these trades acquire the qualities of the indus- 
trial wage-working class. "~ 
3. The Slumi. 

However numerous the class of menials 
be, it has not. as a rule, been able to absorb the 
whole number of those left propertyless. The 
unemployable, children, old people, sick and crip- 
pies have been from the beginning unable to earn 
a living by entering into service. To these were 
added at the beginning of modem times a large 
number who could work but found nothing to do. 
For them there was nothing but to beg. steal, or 
prostitute themselves. They were compelled 
either to perish or to throw overboard all sense 
of shame, honor and self-respect. They prolong 
their existence only by giving precedence to their 
immediate wants over their regard for their repu- 
tations. That such a condition cannot but exer- 
cise the most demorahzing and corrupting in- 
fluence is self-evident. 

Furthermore, the effect of this influence is 
intensified by the fact that the unemployed poor 
are utterly superfiuous to the existing order; 
their extinction would relieve it of an undesir- 
able burden, A class that has become superflu- 
ous, that has no necessary function to fulfil, must 
degenerate. 

And beggars cannot even raise themselves in 
their own estimation by indulging in the self-de- 
ception that they are necessary to the social sys- 
tem; they have no recollection of a time when 
their class performed any usefid services; they 
have no way of forcing society to support them 



dus-l 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

as parasites. They are only tolerated. Humility 
is, consequently, the first duty of the beggar and 
the highest virtue of the poor. Like the menials, 
this class of the proletariat is servile toward the 
powerful; it furnishes no opposition to the ex- 
isting social order. On the contrary, it ekes out 
its existence from the crumbs that fall from the 
tables of the rich. Why should it wish to abol- 
ish its benefactors? Furthermore, beggars are 
* 3iot themselves exploited ; the higher the degree 
of exploitation, the larger the incomes of thr 
rich, all the more have the beggars to expect. 
Like the menial class, they are partakers in thi 
fruits of exploitation ; they have no motive for 
wishing to put an end to the system. 

But though this section of the proletariat has 
never offered any resistance to the system of ex- 
ploitation, still it cannot be regarded as a bulwark 
of this system. Cowardly and unprincipled, it 
soon deserts its benefactors when power and 
wealth have slipped from their hands. This 
class has never taken the lead in any revolution- 
ary movement. But it has always been on hand 
during social disturbances, ready to fish in trou- 
bled waters. Occasionally it has given the last 
kick to a falling class ; as a rule, however, it has 
satisfied itself with exploiting every revolution 
that has broken out, only to betray it at the ear- 
liest opportunity. 

The capitalist system of production has greatly 
increased the slum proletariat. It constantly 
sends to it new recruits. In the large centers of 
industry this element constitutes a considerable 
portion of the population. 



!70 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 



' III character and view of life the slum prole- 

Vtariat approaches the lowest ranks of the fanner 

and small bourgeois class. Like these, it has 

despaired of its own power and seeks to save 

■-itself through aid received from above. 



It was from the last mentioned 



classes iB^l 



J capitalism drew its first supply of wage-labor. 

^ It needed not so much skilled workers as docile 
ones. And since the slum-proletariat and the 
sections of the population most closely related to 
it had already learned obedience and humility 
they were well fitted to supply the demand. With 
workers from this source capitalism could de- 
velop without opposition. They were easily ex- 
ploited to the limit. They would work long 
hours amidst almost intolerable conditions. Who- 
ever wishes to learn of the deplorable state of 
the proletariat during the early days of modem 
industry has but to read Frederich Engles' classic 
work on the working-class of England. 

5, The Advance of the Wage-EarninK Proletariat. 

At the time of the beginning of modem in- 
dustry the term proletariat implied absolute de- 
generacy. And there are persons who believe 
this is still the case. But even in the earliest 
days there was the beginning of a great gulf be- 
tween the working-class proletariat and the slum 
proletariat. 

The slum proletariat has always been the same, 
whether in modern London or ancient Rome. 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 171 

The modern laboring proletariat is an absolutely t- 

unique phenomenon. 

Between these two there is, first of all, the 
difference that lies in the fact that the first is a ^ 
parasite and the second the most important root 
of modem social life. Far from receiving alms, 
the modern working proletarians support the 
whole structure of our society. At first, to be 
sure, they do not perceive this, but sooner or 
later they discover that instead of receiving their 
bread from the capitalist they furnish him his. 

From house-servants and apprentices, on the 
other hand, the working proletarians distinguish 
themselves by the fact that they do not live and '- 
work with their exploiters. The personal rela- 
tions that formerly bound them to their employ- 
ers have disappeared. 

On the other hand, the modem working-man 
does not envy and imitate the rich, as did the 
poor of pre-capitalist days. He hates them as 
enemies and despises them as idlers. 

At first this feeling exhibits itself sporadically. 
But as soon as the workers discover that their 
interests are common, that they are all opposed 
to the exploiter, it takes the form of great or- 
ganizations and open battles against the exploit- 
ing class. The sense of power that goes with 
class-consciousness means the regeneration of 
the working-class. It raises this class forever 
above the level of tlie parasitic poor. 

All the conditions of modern production tend 
to increase the solidarity of the laboring classes. 
In the Middle Ages each artisan produced a fin- 
ished product; he was industrially almost inde- 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

pendent. Today it often takes scores, or even 
hundreds, to produce a finished product. Thus 
does industry teach co-operation. 

Perhaps modem uniformity of conditions is 
even more effective in this direction than the 
necessity for co-operation. In tlie Medieval 
gilds there were the beginning of international- 
ism, but the various trades were sharply divided. 
Among the menial, as we have seen, divisions 
in rank were endless. But in the modem fac- 
tory there are practically no gradations. All the 
employes work under nearly the same conditions, 
and the individual laborer is powerless to change 
them. Under the influence of machinery, more- 
over, the distinctions among the trades are rap- 
idly disappearing. This is indicated by the fact 
that apprenticeships are constantly being short- 
ened. Whole trades are often rendered unneces- 
sary by some new invention, and those employed 
in them are forced to turn to another form of 
labor. This tends more and more to make an 
individual worker forget his craft and fight for 
his entire class. 

Uprisings against employers are nothing new. 
They occurred in plenty during the Middle Ages. 
But only during the nineteenth century did these 
uprisings attain the character of a class-stru^le. 
And thus this great conflict has taken on a higher 
purpose than the righting of temporary wrongs; 
the labor movement has become a revolutionary 
movement. 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

6. The Conflict Between the Elevating and De^ad- 
ing Tendencies Which Aifect the Proletariat. 

The elevation of the working-class is a neces- 
sary and inevitable process. But it is neither 
peaceful nor regular. The tendency of the capi- 
talist system is, as we have shown in Chapter II, 
to degrade the proletariat ever more and more. 
The moral regeneration of the working-class is 
possible only in opposition to this tendency and 
its representatives, the capitalists. It cannot 
come about except through the new tendency de- 
veloped in the working-class by the modern con- 
ditions of labor. But the two tendencies, the 
one upward and the other downward, vary con- 
stantly in different places and at different periods. 
They depend on the condition of the market, the 
organization of industry, the development of ma- 
ciiinery. the insight of the capitalists and work- 
ers, etc., etc. All of these conditions vary from 
year to year in all the numerous branches of in- 
dustry. 

But fortunately for human development there 
comes a time in the history of every section of 
the proletariat when the elevating tendencies gain 
the upper hand. And when they have once 
wakened full class-consciousness in any group 
of workers, the consciousness of solidarity with 
all the members of the working-class, the con- 
sciousness of the strength that is bom of union ; 
as soon as any group has recognized that it is 
essential to society and that it dare hope for bet- 
ter things in the future, — then it is well nigh 
impossible to shove that group back into the de- 
generate mass of beings whose opposition to the 



174 THE CLASS STHUGCLE 

system under which they suffer takes no other 
form than that of unreasoned hate. 

7. Philanthropy and Labor Legislation. 

If every section of the proletariat had been 
dependent on its own efforts, the uplifting proc- 
ess would have begun much later and been much 
slower and more painful than it actually was. 
Without help many a division of the proletariat 
now occupying an honorable position would not 
have been at all able to overcome the difficulties 
that are inherent in all beginnings. Aid came 
from many an upper social rank, from the upper 
ranks of the proletariat as well as from the 
property-holding classes. The assistance ren- 
dered by the latter of these was of no slight 
value in the early days of capitalist large pro- 
duction. 

During the Middle Ages poverty was so slight 
'' that public and private benevolence sufficed to 
deal with it. It presented no problem for society 
to solve ; in so far as it gave occasion for reflec- 
tion it was only the subject of pious comem- 
plation; it was looked upon as a visitation from 
heaven, intended either to punish the wicked or 
try the godly. To the rich it furnished an oppor- 
tunity to exercise their virtue. 

With the growth of the capitalist system, how- 
lever. the number of the unemployed increased, 
and poverty assumed tremendous proportions. 
The spectacle of a large pauper class, which was 
as novel as it was dangerous, drew upon it the 
attention of all thoughtful and kindly disposed 
persons. Primitive means for the distribution 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

of c,lwt(ity proved inadequate. To care for s 
the poor was soon felt to be a work that greatly 
exceeded the powers of the community. Then 
there arose a new problem: how to abolish pov- 
erty? A great many solutions were offered. 
These ranged from schemes to get rid of the 
poor by Iianging or deportation to elaborate plans 
for communistic colonies. The latter met with 
great applause among people of culture, but the 
former wcte the only suggestions ever really 
tried. 

By degrees, however, the question of poverty 
took on a new aspect. The capitahstic system of 
production developed rapidly and finally became 
the controlling one. As this development went 
on, the problem of poverty ceased to exist for the 
thinkers in the capitalist class. Capitalist pro- 
duction rests upon the proletariat ; to put an end 
to the latter were to render the former impossible. 
Colossal poverty is the foundation of colossal 
wealth; he who would eliminate the poverty of 
the masses assails the wealth of the few. Ac- 
cordingly, whoever attempts to remedy the pov- 
erty of the workers is pronounced "an enemy of 
law and order." 

True enough, neitlier fear nor compassion has 
ceased, even under this changed aspect of things, 
to be felt in capitalist circles, and to tell in favor 
of the proletariat. For poverty is a source of 
danger to the whole social fabric ; it breeds pesti- 
lence and crime. Accordingly a few of the more 
clear-headed and hurnane among the ruling 
classes are willing to do something for the work- 
ing-class; but to the bulk of them, who neitli 



176 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 



dare, nor can afford, to break with their c 
class, the problem can no longer be that of the 
abolition of the protetariat. At best they cannot 
go beyond the elevation of the proletarian. The 
proletariat is by all means to continue, able to 
work and satisfied with its condition. 

Within these bounds, of course, philanthropy 
can manifest itself in manifold ways. Most of its 
methods are either wholly useless or calculated 
only to give temporary aid in isolated cases. 

There is, however, one notable exception to 
this generalization. I refer to labor legislation. 
When, during the first decades of the nineteenth 
century, capitalist production on a large scale 
made its entry into England and was there ac- 
companied by all the horrors which it can produce 
under the worst conditions, the wisest among the 
philanthropists arrived at the conviction that 
there was but one thing able to check the de- 
generation of the workers in the industries af- 
fected. They immediately began to propose laws 
for the protection of the workers, at least for the 
protection of the most helpless among them, the 
women and children. 

The capitalists engaged in large production in 
England did not at that time constitute the rul- 
ing section of the capitalist class, as they do to- 
day. Many economic, as well as political, inter- 
ests among the other sections — especially the 
small producers and landlords — spoke in favor 
of limiting the powers of the large capitalists 
over their workmen. The movement in tiua 
direction was favored also by the considers 
that unless the large capitalists were rest 



. THE CLASS STRUGGLE 



171 



the working class, which was the foundation of 
English industry, would inevitably perish. This 
was a consideration which could not fail to in- 
fluence every member of the ruling class intel- 
ligent enough to see further than his own im- 
mediate interests. A'dded to this there was the 
support of a few large capitalists who reahzed 
that they had sufficient means to adapt them- 
selves to the proposed laws and who saw that 
their less wealthy competitors would be ruined by 
them. In spite of all this, and notwithstanding 
the fact that the working-class itself set in motion 
a powerful movement in favor of factory laws, 
it took a hard fight to obtain the first slight 
factory legislation and subsequently to extend it. 

Slight though these first conquests seemed, 
they were, nevertheless, sufficient to awaken out 
of their lethargy those ranks of the proletariat 
in whose behalf they were passed and to arouse 
in them the upward tendencies inherent in their 
social position. Indeed, even before the move- 
ment had achieved any victory, the struggle was 
enough to reveal to the proletarians how im- 
portant they were and what a power they wielded. 
These early struggles shook them up, imparted 
to them self -consciousness and self-respect, put 
an end to their despair, and set up before them 
a goal beyond their immediate future. 

Another, and extremely important, means of 
improving the condition of the working-class is 
the public schools. Their influence cannot be 
overestimated. Nevertheless their effect in the 
direction of elevating the proletariat is infeii 
to that of thorough-going factory laws. 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

The more fully the capitalist system develi3_ 
the more large production crowds out inferior 
forms or changes their character, the more im- 
perative does the strengthening of factory laws 
become. It becomes necessary to extend them, 
not only to all branches of large industry, but to 
home industry and agriculture, as well. In the 
same measure as the importance of these laws 
increases there grows also the influence of large 
capitalists in modern society. Property-owners 
who are not industrial capitalists — landlords, 
small manufacturers, shop-keepers, etc. — become 
infected with capitalist modes of thought. The 
thinkers and statesmen of the bourgeoisie, form- 
erly its far-sighted leaders, sink to the role of 
mere defenders of the capitalist class. 

The devastation of the working-class by 
capitalist production is so shocking that only 
the most shameless and greedy capitalists dare 
to refuse a certain amount of statutory protec- 
tion to labor. But for any important labor 
measure, the eight-hour law. for example, there 
will be found few supporters among the prop- 
erty-holding class. Capitalist philanthropy be- 
comes constantly more timid ; it tends more and 
more to leave to the workers themselves the 
struggle for their protection. The modern strug- 
gle for the eight-hour day bears a very different 
aspect from the one which was carried on in 
England fifty years ago for the fen-hour day. 
The property-holding politicians who are advo- 
cating the modern measure are moved, not by 
philanthropy, but by the necessity of yielding to 
their working-class constituents. The struggle 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 179 

for labor legislation is becoming more and more 
a class-stru^le between proletarians and capital- 
ists. On the continent of Europe and in the 
United States, where the struggle for labor laws 
commenced much later than in England, it bore 
this character from the start. The proletariat has 
nothing more to hope for from the property- 
holding classes in its endeavor to raise itself. It 
now depends wholly upon its own efforts. 

8. The Labor Untan Movement. 

Struggles between laborers and exploiters are 
nothing new. Extremely bitter and protracted 
ones occurred toward the end of the Middle 
Ages between apprentices and masters. As early 
as the fifteenth century, masters here and there 
would seek to escape from work by increasing the 
number of their apprentices. On the other hand 
they made it more and more difficult for any but 
their sons to become masters. Gradually the 
family relation between master and man was 
loosened, and the modern division into classes 
had begun. 

As soon as the master began to play the part 
of modern capitalist, conflicts were inevitable. 
And in one respect the apprentices were in a good 
position to assert themselves. In each city they 
were well organized. Each gild included all the 
apprentices in a particular trade; it controlled 
absolutely the supply of labor so far as that trade 
was concerned. When the time of conflict ar- 
rived, it could use with tremendous effectiveness 
the weapons which have become so familiar in 
modern times, the strike and the boycott. 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

All the increasing power of the modem I 
was called into action to teach the unruly ap- 
prentices their place. The suppression of the 
working-class has been from the beginning the 
chief function of the state, and in these early 
days it performed this function with terrible ef- 
fect. But all its efforts did not succeed in put- 
ting an end to the trouble. Denied the right of 
organization, the apprentices formed secret 
unions and maintained them in the face of fright- 
ful persecutions. 

But what the state could not accomplish was 
accomplished by industrial evolution. After the 
close of the Middle Ages, particularly during the 
eighteenth century, manufacturing was becoming 
an increasingly important feature of the in- 
dustrial world. Before the introduction of ma- 
chinery, employes in factories had the advantages 
neither of the Medieval system of industry nor 
of the modern. They lived in large towns and 
were often of various races. More than this, dif- 
ferent degrees of skill were demanded for dif- 
ferent occupations. For all of these reasons 
they found it difficult to organize. Their only 
advantage lay in the fact that their work did re- 
quire skill. They were not compelled to com- 
pete against the entire mass of the unemployed. 

Only the introduction of machinery altered 
this last condition. It made the whole mass of the 
unemployed serviceable to capitalism and threw 
even proletarian women and children upon the 
labor market. 

Since the introduction of machinery the trans- 
tnation of industry has proceeded at an un- 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

precedented pace. To be sure, mechanical 
methods were not immediately introduced into 
all industrial branches. In some branches even 
the old handicraft methods have survived. Such 
survivals, however, instead of tending to prolong 
former conditions, usually lead, as has been the 
case in the tailoring industry, to sweat-shop 
labor. That is, they produce the class of laborers 
least able to resist their masters. 

But the tendency is to introduce machines into 
all departments of industry. The effect on the 
power of resistance developed in the working- 
class is of the utmost importance. In the first 
place this change tends to divide the workers into 
two classes, skilled and unskilled. The former 
class includes all whose work requires any special 
degree of skill or efficiency. The latter includes, 
of course, all those who perform such labor as 
can be done by any one having the requisite 
strength. The characteristic mark of members of 
this latter class is to be found in the fact that 
they can be easily replaced. 

It was naturally the skilled workers who began 
the struggle for better conditions. The fact that 
it was difficult to find substitutes for them in case 
of a strike gave them an important strategic ad- 
vantage. Their position was not unlike that of 
the medieval apprentices, and in many respects 
their unions were natural descendants of the 

gilds. 

But if modern skilled laborers inherited certain 
advantages from their predecessors, they also 
took over from them one tendency which has done 
great harm to the modern labor movement. This 



182 THE CLASS STBUGCLE 

is the tendency to separate the various crafti 
Naturally those in the best position to fight have 
won for themselves superior advantages and have 
come to look upon themselves as an aristocracy 
of labor. Looking only at their own interest, 
they have been content to rise at the expense of 
their less fortunate comrades. 

Far-sighted politicians and industrial leaders 
have not been slow to take advantage of this con- 
dition. Today the worst enemies of the working- 
class are not the stupid, reactionary statesmen 
I who hope to keep down the labor movement 
through openly repressive measures. Its worst 
enemies are the pretended friends who encourage 
craft unions, and thus attempt to cut off the 
skilled trades from the rest of their class. They 
are trying to turn the most efficient division o£ 
the proletarian army against the great mass, 
against those whose position as unskilled workers 
makes them least capable of defense. 

But sooner or later the aristocratic tendency of 
even the most highly skilled class of laborers 
will be broken. As mechanical production ad- 
vances, one craft after another is tumbled into 
the abyss of common labor. This fact is con- 
stantly teaching even the most effectively organ- 
ized divisions that in the long run their position is 
dependent upon the strength of the working-class 
as a whole. They come to the conclusion that 
H is a mistaken policy to attempt to rise on the 
•shoulders of those who are sinking in a quick- 
sand. They come to see that the struggles of 
r divisions of the proletariat are by n 

^gn to them. 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

At the same time one division of the unskilled 
after another rises out of its stupid lethargy or 
mere purposeless discontent. This is in part a 
natural consequence of the successes achieved by 
the skilled laborers. The direct results of the 
activities of the unskilled proletarians may seem 
unimportant, nevertheless it is these activities 
that bring about the moral regeneration of this 
division of the working-class. 

Thus there has gradually formed from skilled 
and unskilled workers a body of proletarians 
who are in the movement of labor, or the labor 
movement. It is the part of the proletariat 
which is fighting for the interests of the whole 
class, its church militant, as it were. This di- 
vision grows at the expense both of the "aristo- 
crats of labor" and of the common mob which 
still vegetates, helpless and hopeless. We have 
already seen that the laboring proletariat is con- 
stantly increasing; we know, further, that it 
tends more and more to set the pace in thought 
and feeling for the other working classes. We 
now see that in this growing mass of workers 
the militant division increases not only absolute- 
ly, but relatively. No matter how fast the 
proletariat may grow, this militant division of 
it grows still faster. 

But it is precisely this militant proletariat 
which is the most fruitful recruiting ground for 
socialism. The socialist movement is nothing 
more than the part of this militant proletariat 
which has become conscious of its goal. In fact, 
these two, socialism and the militant proletariat, 
tend constantly to become . identical. In Ger- 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 



/ and Austria their identic is already an ac- 
^lished fatft. ^™ 



a^^^J 



9. The Political Straggle. 
The original organizations of the prolel 
were modeled after those of the medieval ap- 
prentices. In like manner the first weapons of 
the modem labor movement were those inherited 
from a previous age, the strike and the boycott. 
But these methods are insufficient for the 
modern proletariat. The more completely the 
. various divisions of which it is made up unite 
L into a single working-class movement, the more 
1/ must its strij^les take on a political character, 
r Every class-struggle is a political struggle. 

Even the bare requirements of the industrial 
struggle force the workers to make political de- 
mands. We have seen that the modern state re- 
gards it as its principal function to make the ef- 
fective organization of labor impossible. Secret 
organizations are inefficient substitutes for open 
ones. The more the proletariat develops, the 
more it needs freedom to organize. 

But this freedom is not alone sufficient if the 
proletariat is to have adequate organizations. 
The apprentices and journeymen of previous 
periods found it easy to act together. The 
various cities were industrially independent. In 
any given city the number of those engaged in 
any trade was comparatively small. They usual- 
ly lived on one street and spent their leisure time 
at the same tavern. Each one was personally 
acquainted with all the rest. 

Today conditions are radically different 



every industrial center there are gathered 
thousands of working-men. A single individual 
can know personally only a few of his com- 
rades. To make this great mass feel its common 
interests, to induce it to act as one in an organiza- 
tion, it is necessary to have means of com- 
municating with large numbers. A free press 
and the right of assemblage are absolutely es- 
sential. 

The free press is made especially necessary by 
the development of modern means of com- 
munication. It is possible now for a capitalist 
to import strike-breakers from far-lying districts. 
Unless the workers can organize unions covering 
the entire nation, or even the entire civilized 
world, they are powerless. But this cannot be 
done without the aid of the press. 

On this account, wherever the working-class 
has endeavored to improve its economic position 
it has made political demands, especially demands 
for a free press and the right of assemblage. 
These privileges are to the proletariat the pre- 
requisites of life; they are the light and air of 
the labor movement. Whoever attempts to deny 
them, no matter what his pretensions, is to be 
reckoned among the worst enemies of the work- 
ing-class. 

Occasionally some one has attempted to op- 
pose the political struggle to the economic, and 
declared that the proletariat should give its ex- 
clusive attention either to the one or the other. 
The fact is that the two cannot be separated. 
The economic struggle demands political rights, 
and these will not fall from heaven. To secure 



186 THE CLASS STSUGGL^ 

and maintain them, the most vigorous political 
action is necessary. The political struggle is, on 
the other hand, in the last analysis, an economic 
struggle. Often, in fact, it is directly and open- 
ly economic, as when it deals with tariff and 
factory laws. The political struggle is merely a 
particular form of the economic struggle, in fact, 
its most inclusive and vital form. 

The interest of the working-class is not limited 
to the laws which directly affect it; the great 
majority of laws touch its interests to some ex- 
tent Like every other class, the working-class 
must strive to influence the state authorities, to 
bend them to its purposes. 

Great capitalists can influence rulers and 
legislators directly, but the workers can do so 
only through parliamentary activity. It matters 
little whether a government be republican in 
name. In all parliamentary countries it rests 
with the legislative body to grant tax levies. By 
electing representatives to parliament, therefore, 
the working-class can exercise an influence over 
the governmental powers. 

The struggle of all the classes which depend 
upon legislative action for political influence is 
directed, in the modem state, on the one hand 
toward an increase in the power of the parlia- 
ment (or congress), and on the other toward an 
increase in their own influence within the parlia- 
ment. The power of parliament depends on the 
energy and courage of the classes behind it and 
on the energy and courage of the classes on 
which its will is to be imposed. The influence 
of a class within a parliament depends, in the 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 



187 



first place, on the nature of the electoral law in 
force. It is dependent, further, upon the influ- 
ence of the class in question among the voters, 
and, lastly, upon its aptitude for parliamentary 
work. 

A word must be added on this last point. The 
bourgeoisie, with all sorts of talent at its com- 
mand, has hitherto been able to manipulate 
parliaments to its own puqiose. Therefore, 
small capitalists and farmers have in large num- 
bers lost all faith in legislative action. Some of 
these have declared in favor of the substitution 
of direct legislation for legislation by representa- 
tives; others have denounced all forms of 
political activity. This may sound very revolu- 
tionary, but in reality it indicates nothing but the 
political bankruptcy of the classes involved. 

The proletariat is, however, more favorably 
situated in regard to parliamentary activity. We 
have already seen how the modern method of 
production reacts on the intellectual life of the 
proletariat, how it has awakened in them a thirst 
for knowledge and given them an understanding 
of great social problems. So far as their at- 
titude toward politics is concerned, they are 
raised far above the farmers and small capital- 
ists. It is easier for them to grasp party princi- 
ples and act on them uninfluenced by personal 
and local motives. Their conditions of life, 
moreover, make it possible for them to act to- 
gether in great numbers for a common end. 
Their regular forms of activity accustom them to 
rigid discipline. Their unions are to them an 
excellent parliamentary school; they afford op- 



THE CLASS STKDGGLE 

portunities for training in parliamentary law and 
public speaking. 

The proletariat is. therefore, in a position to 
form an independent party. It knows how to 
control its representatives. Moreover, it finds in 
its own ranks an increasing number of persons 
well fitted to represent it in legislative halls. 

Whenever the proletariat engages in parlia- 
mentary activity as a self-conscious class, parlia- 
mentarism begins to change its character. It 
ceases to be a mere tool in the hands of the 
bourgeoisie. This very participation of the pro- 
letariat proves to be the most eifective means of 
shaking up the hitherto indifferent divisions of 
the proletariat and giving them hope and con- 
fidence. It is the most powerful lever that can 
be utilized to raise the proletariat out of its 
economic, social and moral degradation. 

The proletariat has, therefore, no reason to 
distrust parhamentary action ; on the other hand, 
it has every reason to exert all its energy to in- 
crease the power of parliaments in their relation 
to other departments of government and to swell 
to the utmost its own parliamentary representa- 
tion. Besides freedom of the press and the right 
to organize, the tiniversal ballot is to be regard- 
ed as one of the conditions prerequisite to a 
sound development of the proletariat. 

10. The Labor Party. 

In the first place the ballot was useful to the 
working-class only because it now and then made 
various sections of the bourgeoisie dependent on 
it ior /avors. In their intertULl struggles capital- 




ist factions, as, for example, the industrial 
capitalists or the landlords, would offer advan- 
tages to the proletariat for the sake of securing 
its support. Though this procedure often re- 
sulted in valuable concessions, nevertheless so 
long as the working-class went no further in its 
political activities there was a definite hmit to its 
possibilities. 

The interests of the proletariat and the 
bourgeoisie are of so contrary a nature that in 
the long run they cannot be harmonized. Sooneri 
or later in every capitalist country the participa-;, 
tion of the working-class in politics must lead toii 
the formation of an independent party, a labor*' 

P*"^- .... 

At what moment m its history the proletariat 
of any particular country will reach the point at 
which it is ready to take this step, depends 
chiefly upon its economic development. In some 
degree, also, it depends upon two other condi- 
tions, the insight of the working-class into the 
political and economic situation and the attitude 
of the bourgeois parties toward one another. 

But an independent labor party is bound to 
come sooner or later. And, once formed, such 
a party must have for its purpose the conquest 
of the government in the interest of the class 
which it represents. Economic development 
will lead naturally to the accomplishment of this 
purpose. The time and manner of its ac- 
complishment may vary in different lands, 
but there can be no doubt as to the final 
victory of the proletariat. For this class grows 
constantly in moral and political power as 



; CLASS STRUGGLE 

well as in numbers. The class-struggle wid- 
ens its view and teaches it solidarity and dis- 
cipline. In capitahst countries it tends constant- 
ly to become the only working class, hence the 
class upon which all others are dependent. On 
the other hand, the classes opposed to the 
proletariat diminish constantly in numbers and 
lose visibly in moral and political power. In in- 
dustry they become, not only superfluous, but 
often actually detrimental. 

Under these circumstances there can be no 
doubt as to which side will eventually be vic- 
torious. Long ago the possessing classes were 
seized with fear of their approaching fate. 

But the proletariat, as the lowest of the ex- 
ploited classes — the slum-proletariat is not ex- 
ploited — cannot use its power, as the other classes 
have done, to shift the burden of exploitation to 
other shoulders. It must put an end to its own 
exploitation and in the same act to all exploita- 
tion. The root of exploitation, however, is to be 
found in private ownership of the means of 
producrion. The proletariat can do away with 
the former only by destroying the latter. If the 
propertyless condition of the proletariat makes 
possible its winning over to the abolition of this 
form of private property, its exploitation will 
compel it to abolish exploitation and to substitute 
co-operative for capitaHst production. 

But we have seen that this cannot come about 
so long as commodity production remains su- 
preme. In order to substitute co-operative for 
capitalist production it is absolutely necessary to 
replace production for the ma.Tket with produc- 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 19ij 

tion for the community and under the control of ■ 
the community. Socialist production is, there- 
fore, the natural result of a victory of the 
proletariat. If the working-class did not make 
use of its mastery over the machinery of govern- 
ment to introduce the socialist system of produc- 
tion, the logic of events would finally call some 
such system into being — but only after a useless 
waste of energy and time. But socialist produc- 
tion must, and will, come. Its victory will have 
become inevitable as soon as that of the pro- 
letariat has become inevitable. The working- 
class will naturally strive to put an end to ex- 
ploitation, and this it can do only through social- 
ist production. 

Thus it appears that wherever an independent 
labor party is formed it must sooner or later ex- 
hibit socialist tendencies; if not socialist in the 
beginning, it must become so in the end. 

We have now examined the chief recruiting 
grounds of socialism. Our results may be 
summed up as follows: the militant, politically 
self-conscious divisions of the industrial pro- 
letariat furnish the power which is behind the 
sociahst movement; but the more the influence 
of the proletariat affects the ways of thinking 
and feeling in vogue among allied social groups, 
the more will these, also, be drawn into the 
movement. 

11. The Labor Movement and Socialiam. 

In the beginning socialists were slow to recof^fl 
nize the part which the militant proletariat t~ 
called upon to play in the socialist movement. 



THE CLASS STHUGGLE 

couM not be otherwise, in the nature of things 
so long as there was no militant proletariai. 
And socialism is older than the class-struggle oi 
the proletariat. It dates back to the time of the 
first appearance of the proletariat on a large 
scale. It was not until much later that the pro- 
letarians showed the first stirrings of inde- 
pendent life. The first root of socialism was ihe 
sympathy of upper-class philanthropists with the 
poor and miserable. The early socialists were 
merely the bravest and most far-sighted of these 
philanthropists. They saw clearly that the ex- 
istence of the proletariat was a natural result oi 
the private ownership of the means of produc- 
tion, and they did not hesitate to draw the logical 
conclusions from their observation. Socialism 
was the deepest and most splendid expression of 
bourgeois philanthropy. 

There were no class interests to which the 
socialists of that day could appeal ; they were 
forced to turn to the sympathy and enthusiasm 
of upper-class idealists. They attempted to se- 
cure support by means of alluring descriptions of 
a socialist commonwealth, on the one side, and 
persistent representations of the prevailing 
misery, on the other. The rich and mighty were 
to be persuaded to furnish means for a thorough- 
going relief of misery and the institution of an 
ideal society. As is well known, these philan- 
thropic socialists waited in vain for the noblemen 
and millionaires whose magnanimity was to save 
the race. 

During the first decades of the oinel 
century the proletariat began to show si| 



ineteH|M 
sigi^H 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

an independent life. During; the thirties a vigor- 
ous labor movement got under way in France and 
England, 

But the socialists did not understand it. They 
thought it impossible for the poor and ignorant 
proletarians to attain to the moral elevation and 
social power requisite for the realization of the 
socialist plans. But distrust was not their only 
feeling toward the labor movement. This new 
phenomenon was inconvenient to them; it 
threatened to rob them of their most effective 
argument. For the bourgeois socialists' only 
hope of winning over the sensitive capitalist lay 
in being able to show him that every attempt to 
alleviate misery and elevate the poor was 
doomed to failure by the conditions of modern 
society and that, consequently, it was impossible 
for the proletarians to rise through their own ef- 
forts. But the labor movement proceeded upon 
premises absolutely opposed to this line of argu- 
ment. Another fact tended to bring about the 
same result. The class-struggle naturally em- 
bittered the bourgeoisie against the proletariat. 
In the eyes of the capitalists the working-class 
were transformed from pitiful unfortunates who 
needed help into a pack of miscreants who should 
be subdued and kept down. Sympatiiy for the 
poor and miserable, which had been the chief 
root of sociaUsm, began to wither. The teachings 
of socialism came to appear to the terror- 
stricken bourgeoisie as a dangerous weapon 
which might fall into the hands of the mob and 
bring about unspeakable harm. In short, thiu 
stronger the labor movement appeared the u 



THE CLASS STRUOCLE 

fficult became socialist propaganda among the 
ruling classes, and the more welJ-defined became 
the opposition of these classes to the socialist 
movement. 

So long as socialists were of the opinion that 
the means of attaining the objects of socialism 
must come from the capitalist cLlsr. they were 
compelled, not only to look with suspicion upon 
the labor movement, but often to assume an at- 
titude of direct opposition to it. As a result they 
came to regard the class-struggle as the enemy 
of socialism. 

This naturally reacted upon the laboring 
classes, tended to make of them enpraies of 
sociahsm. The ambitious, strugghng proleta- 
rians discovered nothing but opposition among 
the socialists and nothing but discouragement in 
the socialist teachings. As a result, there was 
bom among them a distrust of the whole body 
of socialist doctrine. This feeling was favored 
by the ignorance even of the militant proletariat 
at the beginning of the labor movement. Th» 
narrowness of their view made it impossible for 
them to grasp the purposes of socialism, and a? 
yet they were unconscious of their economip 
position and of the tasks which confronted their 
class. They felt only an indefinite class instinct 
which taught them to distrust everything that 
had its origin in the capitalist class. Under the 
circumstances they were naturally as much op- 
posed to socialism as to any other form of 
bourgeois philanthropy. 

Among certain groups of working-men, es- 
"^ialiy in England, distrust of socialism took 



B THE CLASS 

B deep root at this time. It is partly because of 

Sthis that until recently England has been com- 
paratively unaffected by the socialist movement. 
But no matter how wide might grow the 
■ chasm between socialism and the militant pro- 
l letariat. socialist philosophy is so adequate to the 

[needs of thinking proletarians that the best 
n-inds in the working-class, as soon as they had 
I opportunity, willingly turned to it. Then the 
I bourgeois socialist came under the influence of 
proletarian thinking. The new. proletarian 
socialists took little account of the capitalist 
class. They hated it and were fighting against 
it. In their hands the peaceful socialism which 
was to save the race through the intervention of 
the best elements in the upper classes was trans- 
formed into a violent revolutionary socialism 
which was to depend for its support upon pro- 
letarian fists. 

But even this movement, though essentially 
proletarian in its origin, had no understanding 
of the labor movement; it stood in opposition to 
the class- struggle in its highest form, that is, the 
political struggle. In the nature of the case it 
was impossible for it to transcend the theories 
of the Utopians. At best a proletarian can do no 
more than appropriate for his own purposes a 
part of the learning of the bourgeois world. He 
lacks the leisure necessary to carry independent 
scientific investigation beyond the point reached 
by bourgeois thinkers. Therefore primitive 
working-class socialism bore all the marks of 
utopianisiti. It had no notion of the economic 
evolutitm which is creating the material ele- 



TIIE CLASS STRUGGLE 

Rients of socialist production and, by meat 
long struggle, is training the class that tsft' 
vitalize these elements and develop from them 
a new society. Like the Utopians, the early pro- 
letarian socialists looked upon society as a build- 
ing which could be constructed arbitrarily ac- 
cording to a preconceived plan if one had only 
the required space and materials, They trusted 
themselves to furnish the power both to build 
and to preserve this structure. As to the ma- 
terials and place, they did not expect these from 
the bounty of some millionaire or nobleman; the 
revolution was to be sufficient to tear down the 
old structure, to overpower its defenders, and 
give the discoverers of the new plan an oppor- 
tunity to build the new structure, the socialist 
commonwealth. 

In this course of reasoning there was no place 
for the class-struggle. The proletarian Utopians 
found the misery in which they lived so bitter 
that they were impatient for its immediate re- 
moval. Even if they had thought it possible for 
the class- struggle to raise the proletariat gradual- 
ly, and thus fit them for the further develop- 
ment of society, this process would have seemed 
to them much too tedious and complex. But 
they did not believe in this gradual elevation. 
They stood at the beginning of the labor move- 
ment. The group of proletarians who partici- 
pated in it were few, and among these only a 
still smaller number saw beyond their temporary 
interests. To train the great mass of the popula- 
tion in socialist ways of thinking seemed hope- 
less. The most that could be expected of tius 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE IS 

mass was a violent outbreak which might de-'i 
stroy the existing order and thus clear the way 
for socialism. The worse the condition of the 
masses, thought these primitive socialists, the 
nearer must be the moment when their misery 
would become unbearable and they would rise 
and topple over the social structure which op- 
pressed them. A struggle for the gradual eleva- 
tion of the working-class seemed not only hope- 
less, but harmful. For any shght improvement 
that might be achieved could only tend to post- 
pone the moment of their uprising and, there- 
fore, the moment of permanent release from 
misery. Every form of the class -struggle which 
was not aimed at the immediate overthrow of the 
existing order, that is, every serious, efficient sort 
of effort, seemed to the early socialist as nothing 
more nor less than a betrayal of humanity. It 
is now more than fifty years since this way of 
looking at things made its appearance. Its best 
expression it received, probably, in the works of 
Wilhelm Weitling. Even today it has not died 
out. The tendency toward it appears in every 
division of the working-class which begins to 
take its place in the ranks of the militant pro- 
letariat. It appears in every land where the 
proletariat becomes for the first time conscious 
of its degraded condition and imbued with 
sociaHstic notions, without at the same time hav- 
ing reached a clear insight into social laws and 
gained confidence in its ability to carry on a 
protracted stru^Ie. And since new divisions of 
the proletariat are constantly rising out of the 
depths into which economic development has 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

thrust them, this primitive socialist way of think- 
ing may be expected continually to make its re- 
appearance. It is a children's disease which 
threatens every young socialist movement which 
has not got beyond utopianism. 

At present this sort of socialistic thinking is 
called anarchy, but it is not necessarily con- 
nected with anarchism. It has its origin, not in 
clear imderstanding, but rather in mere in- 
stinctive opposition to the existing order. There- 
fore it may be connected with the most varied 
theoretical points of view. But it is true that 
the rude and violent socialism of the primitive 
proletarians is often associated with the refined 
and peaceable anarchy of the snmll bourgeois. 
With all their differences these two have one 
thing in common, hatred of the protracted class- 
struggle, especially of its highest form, the 
political struggle. 

The proletarian Utopians were no more able 
than their forerunners to overcome the opposi- 
tion between socialism and the labor movement 
It is true that conditions occasionally compelled 
them to take active part in the class-struggle. 
But they were too illogical to see the connection 
between socialism and the labor movement. 
Therefore their activity merely resulted in the 
crowding out of the former by the latter. It 
is well known that the early anarchist-socialist 
movement sank sooner or later either into pure- 
and-simple craft unionism or mere co-operative 
communism. 



THE CLASS SRTUGGLE 

12. 

If the socialist movement and the labor move- 
ment were ever to become one it was necessary 
for socialism to be raised beyond the Utopian 
point of view. To accomplish this was the il- 
lustrious work of Marx and Engels. In their 
Communist Manifesto, published in 1847, they 
laid the scientific foundation of modem social- 
ism. They transformed the beautiful dream of 
well-meaning enthusiasts into the goal of a great 
and earnest struggle, they proved it to be the 
natural result of economic development. To the ■ 
militant proletariat they gave a clear conception 
of their historical function, and placed them in 
a position to proceed toward their great goal with 
as much speed and as few sacrifices as possible. 
The socialists are no longer expected to discover 
a new and free social order ; all they have to do 
is discover the elements of such an order in ex- 
isting society. They need no longer attempt to 
bring to the proletariat salvation from above. 
On the other hand, it becomes their duty to sup- 
port the working-class in its constant struggle by 
encouraging its political and economic institu- 
tions. It must do all in its power to hasten the 
day when the working-class will be able to save 
itself. To give to the class-struggle of the pro- 
letariat the most effective form, this is the func- 
tion of the Socialist Party. 

The teaching of Marx and Engels gave to the 
class-struggle of the proletariat an entirely new 
character. So long as socialist production is t 
kept consciously in view as its object, so long j 



200 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

the efforts of the militant proletariat do aotM . 
tend beyond the framework of the existing 
method of production, the class-struggle seems to 
move forever in a circle. For the oppressive 
tendencies of the capitalist method of production 
are not done away with ; at most they are only 
checiced. Without cessation, new groups of the 
middle class are thrown into the proletariat 
The desire for profits constantly threatens to 
bring to nought the achievements of the more 
favorably situated divisions of labor. Every re- 
duction in the hours of labor becomes an excuse 
for the introduction of labor-saving machinery 
and for the intensification of labor. Every im- 
provement in the organization of labor is 
answered with an improvement in the organiza- 
tion of capital. And all the time unemployment 
increases, crises become more serious, and the 
uncertainty of existence grows more unendura- 
ble. The elevation of the working-class brought 
about by the class-struggle is more moral than 
economic. The industrial conditions of the pro- 
letariat improve but slowly, if at all. But the 
self-respect of the proletarians mounts higher, 
as does also the respect paid them by the other 
classes of society. They begin to regard them- 
selves as the equals of the upper classes and to 
compare the conditions of the other strata of 
society with their own. They make greater de- 
mands on society, demands for better clothes, 
better dwellings, greater knowledge and the edu- 
cation of their children. They wish to have 
some share in the achievements of modern civil- 
ization. And they feel with increasing keenness 



every set-back, every new form of oppression. 

This moral elevation of the proletariat is 
identical with the increasing demands which it 
makes on society. Moreover it advances more 
rapidly than the conditions of labor which neces- 
sarily prevail under the present system of ex- 
ploitation. The result of the class- struggle can, 
therefore, be nothing else than increasing dis- 
content among the proletarians. And therefore 
the class-struggle appears purposeless so long as 
it does not look beyond the present system of 
production. 

Only socialist production can put an end to | 
the disparity between the demands of the work- 
ers and the means of satisfying them. By doing 
away with exploitation it would render impossi- 
ble the luxuries of the exploiters and the natural 
discontent of the exploited. With the removal 
of the standard set by the rich the demands of 
the workers would, of course, be measured by 
the means at hand to satisfy them. We have 
already seen how much the socialist method of 
production would increase these means. 

Perpetual discontent is unknown in com- 
munistic societies. In our capitalistic world it 
results naturally from the distinction of classes 
wherever the exploited feel themselves to be the 
equals of the exploiters. 

So long, therefore, as the class-struggle of tlie 
proletariat was opposed to socialism, so long as 
it did nothing beyond attempting to improve the 
position of the proletariat within the framework 
of existing society, it could not reach its goal. 
But a great diange came with the amalgamation 



^02 



THE CLASS STSCOGLE 



of soculi^n and tbe \3b0r movement. Now i 
proleohat has a goal ta%trd wbidi tt b strug- 
gling, whkb il comes nearer to with every bat- 
tle. Now all features of the dass-strn^le have 
a meaotng, even those that produce no im- 
mediately practical results. Every effort that 
preserves or iiKrcases the self-consciousness of 
the proletariat or its spirit of a>K}peration and 
discipline, is worth the making. 

Many an apparent defeat is turned into a 
Wctory, Every unsuccessful strike, every labor 
law defeated, means a step toward the securing 
of a life worthy of human beings. Every 
political or industrial measure which has refer- 
ence to the proletariat has a good effect. 
Whether it be friendly or unfriendly, matters 
not, so long as it tends to stir up the working- 
class. From now on the militant proletariat is 
no longer like an anny fighting hard to defend 
positions already won ; now it must become clear 
to the dullest onlooker that it is an irresistible 
conqueror. 



:M 



The founders of modem socialism reci _ 
from the beginning the international character 
which the labor movement tends everywhere to 
assume. So they naturally attempted to give 
their movement an international basis. 

International commerce is inevitably connected 
with the capitalist system of production. The 
development of capitalism out of early, simple 



pre* 



I of commodities is most intimately 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

connected with the growth of world-commerce. 
But world-commerce is impossible without peace- 
ful intercourse among the various nations. It 
requires that a foreign merchant be protected 
equally with a native. 

The development of international commerce 
raises the merchant to a high position in our 
society. His way of looking at things begins to 
influence society as a whole. But the merchant 
has always been an unsettled person ; his motto 
has ever been, Where I fare well, there is my 
home. Thus in proportion to the extension of 
world-commerce and capitalist production there 
develop international tendencies in bourgeois 
society. 

The capitalist system of production, however, 
develops the most remarkable contradictions. 
Hand in hand with the movement toward in- 
ternational brotherhood goes a tendency to em- 
phasize international differences. Commerce de- 
mands peace, but competition leads to war. If, 
in each country, the different capitalists and 
classes are in a state of war, so are the capitalist 
classes of the various countries. Each nation 
tries to extend the markets for its own goods by 
crowding out the goods of other nations. The 
more complex becomes international commerce, 
the more essential international peace, the fiercer 
grows the competitive struggle and the greater 
the danger of conflicts between nations. The 
closer the international relations which are de- 
veloped, the louder swells the demand for at- 
tention to separate national interests. The more 
urgent the need of peace, the greater the danger 



of war. These apparently impossible antitheses 
correspond exactly to the character of capitalist 
production. They He hidden in the simple 
production of commodities, but only capitalist 
production develops them till they become in- 
tolerable. That it develops at the same time the 
necessity of peace and the tendency toward war 
is only one of the contradictions which will 
bring about the destruction of the capitalist 
system. 

The proletariat has not assumed the incon- 
sistent attitude with regard to this matter that 
is characteristic of the other classes. The more 
the working-class develops and becomes inde- 
pendent, the clearer becomes the fact that it is 
influenced by only one of the opposing tendencies 
which we have just observed in the capitalist 
system. The capitalist system, by expropriating 
the worker, has freed him from the soil. He has 
now no settled home, and therefore no country. 
Like the merchant, he can take for his motto. 
Where I fare well, there is my home. Even the 
medieval apprentices extended their wanderings 
to foreign lands, and the beginning of an inter- 
national relation was the result. But what were 
these wanderings in comparison with those made 
possible by modern means of travel? And the 
apprentice journeyed with the intention of re- 
turning to his home; the modem proletarian 
journeys with his wife and family in order to 
settle wherever he finds conditions most favor- 
able. He is not a tourist, but a nomad. 

The merchant in a foreign country depends 
upon his government for the support which is 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 205 

Sfcessary to successful competition. He ap- 
preciates his country ; often enough, in fact, he 
becomes the most confirmed among the jingos. 
It is different with the proletarian. At home he 
has not been spoiled by government protection 
of his interests. And in foreign lands, at least 
in such as are civilized, he has no need of protec- 
tion. On the contrary, the new land is usually 
one in which the laws and their administration 
are more favorable to the worker than those of 
his original home. And his co-workers have no 
motive for depriving him of what little protec- 
tion he can get from the law in his struggle 
against his exploiter. Their interest lies rather 
in increasing his ability to withstand the com- 
mon enemy. 

Very differently from the apprentice or the 
merchant is the modern proletarian torn loose 
from the soil. He becomes a citizen of the 
world ; the whole world is his home. 

No doubt this world-citizenship is a great 
hardship for the workers in countries where the 
standard of living is high and the conditions of 
labor are comparatively good. In such coimtries, 
naturally, immigration will exceed emigration. 
As a result the laborers with the higher standard 
of living will be hindered in their class-struggle 
by the influx of those with a lower standard and 
less power of resistance. 

Under certain circumstances this sort of com- 
petition, like that of the capitalists, may lead to 
a new emphasis on national lines, a new hatred 
of foreign workers on the part of the native 
born. But the conflict of nationalities, which is 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

' peqjctiial among the capitalists, can be only 
temporary among the proletarians. For soon« 
or later the workers will discover that the im- 
migration of cheap labor-power from the more 
backward to the more advanced countries, is a 
inevitable a result of the capitalist system as tb( 
introduction of machinery or the forcing of 
women into industry. 

In still another way does the labor moveinent 
of an advanced country suffer under the influ- 
ence of the backward conditions of other lamk. 
The high degree of exploitation endured by the 
proletariat of the economically undeveloped na- 
tions becomes an excuse for the capitalists of the 
more highly developed ones for opposing any 
movement in the direction of higher wages or 
better conditions. 

In more than one way, then, it is borne in 
upon the workers of each nation that their suc- 
cess in the class-struggle is dependent on the 
progress of the working-class of other nations. 
For a time this may turn them against foreign 
workers, but finally they come to see that there is 
only one effective means of removing the hinder- 
ing influence of backward nations: to do tnvay 
with the backivardness itself. German workers 
have every reason to co-operate with the Slavs 
and Italians in order that these may secure high- 
er wages and a shorter working-day; the Eng- 
lish workers have the same interest in relation to 
the Germans, and the Americans in relation to 
Europeans in general. 

The dependence of the proletariat of one land 
on that of another leads inevitably to a joining 



of forces by the miliiXnt proletarians of \ 
lands. 

The survivals of nutional seclusion and na- 
tional hatred which ttie proletariat took over 
from the bourgeoisie, disappear steadily. The 
working-class is freeing itself from national 
prejudices. Working-men learn more and more 
to see in the foreign laborer a fellow-fighter, a 
comrade. 

The strongest bonds of international solidar- 
ity, naturally, are those which bind groups of 
proletarians, which, though of different national- 
ities, have the same purposes and use the same 
methods to accomplish them. 

How necessary is the international union of 
the class-struggles of the proletariat, as soon as 
they extend beyond a certain limit in purpose 
and strength, was recognized in the beginning by 
the authors of the Communist Manifesto. This 
historic document is addressed to the proletarians 
of all lands and concludes by calling upon them 
to unite. And the organization which they had 
won over to the acceptance of the principles of 
the manifesto, and in the name of which it was 
issued, was international, the Society of Com- 
munists. 

The defeats of the revolutionary movements 
of 1848 and 1849 put an end to this society, but 
with the re-awakening of the labor movement in 
the sixties it came to life again in the Interna- 
tional Workingmen's Association (founded in 
1864). This association had for its purpose, not 
only to arouse a feeling of solidarity in the pro- 
letarians of different lands, but also to give them 



THE CLASS STKUGGLE | 

a common goal and lead them toward it by a I 
common route. The first of these purposes was 
gloriously fulfilled, but the second was fuffiHed | 
only in part. The International was to bring 
about the union of socialism and the militant 
proletariat in all lands. It declared that the 
emancipation of the working-class could be ac- 
complished only by the workers themselves ; that 
the political movement was only a means to this 
end, and that the proletariat could not emanci- 
pate itself so long as it remained dependent upon 
the monopolists of the means of productioa 
Within the International opposition to these 
principles developed in proportion to the clear- 
ness with which they were seen to lead to 
modem socialism. At that time there was still 
a comparatively large number of bourgeois and 
proletarian Utopians. These, together with the 
pure-and- simple unionists, dropped out of the 
International as soon as they understood its pur- 
pose. The fall of the Paris Commune, in 1871, 
and persecutions in various European countries, 
hastened its fall. 

But the consciousness of international soh'dar- 
ity that had been generated could not be 
smothered. 

Since then the ideas of the Communist Mani- 
festo have taken hold of the militant proletariat 
of Europe and of many proletarian groups out- 
side of Europe. Everywhere the class-struggle 
and the socialist movement have become one, or 
are in a fair way to do so. The principles, ob- 
jects and means of the proletarian class- struggle 
tend everywhere to become the same. This in 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

itself has been sufficient to produce a feeling of 
union among the sociaiistic labor movements of 
different countries. Their international con- 
sciousness has constantly grown stronger, and it 
needed only an external impulse to give to this 
fact visible expression. 

This came about, as is well known, in connec- 
tion with the celebration of the hundredth an- 
niversary of the storming of the Bastile, which 
occurred at the International Congress of Paris 
in 1889. Since then the international character 
of the proletarian struggle has had a visible 
symbol in the May Day celebration. It has been 
strengthened, moreover, by regularly recurring 
international congresses. These congresses are 
made up, not of isolated enthusiasts, like the 
bourgeois peace congresses, but of the represent- 
atives of millions of working men and women. 
Every May Day shows in the most impressive 
manner that it is the masses of industrial work- 
ers in all the great centers of population of all 
civilized lands that feel in themselves the con- 
sciousness of the international solidarity of the 
proletariat, that protest against war and declare 
that national divisions are no longer divisions be- 
tween peoples, but between exploiters. 

Such a bridging of the chasm between the na- 
tions, such an international amalgamation of 
great sections of the people of different lands, 
the history of the world has never seen before, 
This phenomenon appears the more imposing 
when we remember that it has come into ex- 
istence under the shadow of miHtary armaments 
which, on their part, also offer a spectacle the 




t^mrrmtm^amtu 



', ita*n at «e popk^ *r Uhar pwtr fcwn-e > 

facb Kb a fvciDBnm. akra kE Rcocaias that 
iJfcjBr Jt Mr me bis cU&n. wS soone r OH' J| 
■■■r Ic IhRirt hto dK proletaiist, tfasi dj^^lH 

^^^■Mjfipa foe Um except ^bsoo^L 1^ O^^H 




THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

tion of the proletariat — from that moment on he 
will see in the Sociahst Party the natural repre- 
sentative of his interests. 

We have already explained that he has nothing 
to fear from a sociaHst victory. In fact such a 
victory would be distinctly to his advantage, for 
it would usher in a society that would free all 
workers from exploitation and oppression and 
give them security and prosperity. 

But the Socialist Party represents the inter- 
ests of all non-capitalist classes, not only in the 
future, but in the present. The proletariat, as 
the lowest of the exploited strata, cannot free 
itself from exploitation and oppression without 
putting an end to all exploitation and oppression. 
It is, therefore, their sworn enemy, no matter in 
what form they may appear; it is the champion 
of all the exploited and oppressed. 

We spoke above of the International. It is 
significant that the occasion for its founding was 
furnished by a demonstration in favor of the 
Poles, who had risen against the yoke of the 
Czar. It was characteristic, also, that the first 
address sent ont by the International was a let- 
ter of congratulation to President Lincoln in 
which this association of working-men expressed 
its sympathy with the abolition movement. And, 
finally, the International was the first organiza- 
tion existing in England, and the first counting 
Englishmen among its members, which took the 
part of the Irish who were oppressed by the 
English ruling class. Not one of these causes, 
that of the Poles, the Irish, or the African 
slaves, was direct\y cotvtie.cX^4 mfti. *aR. ^x»s.'a.''»i- 
terests of the wage-ea.in«i&. 



212 THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

We are told, it is trae, that the socialist t 
merit depends on the progress of economic de- 
velopment; that socialist production depends on 
the earhest possible crowding out of small in- 
dustry. Socialism has, it is therefore thought, 
an interest in the disappearance of the inde- 
pendent craftsman, the small business man and 
the small farmer. It demands their ruin, there- 
fore cannot work in their interest. 

In answer to this there is the following to be 
said : The socialist movement does not create 
economic development ; the crowding out of 
small industry will be taken care of without its 
help by the capitalist class. It is true that social- 
ism has no reason for attempting to hinder this 
development. But to stop economic develop- 
ment would not be to serve the real interests of 
the small farmers and business men. For all 
attempts to this end must remain fruitless, if 
they do not cause positive harm. To propose to 
the independent craftsman or farmer measures 
by which their small concerns can once more be 
made profitable, would not be in any sense to 
serve their interests ; the only effect would be 
to arouse illusions which could not be realized. 

Furthermore, although the downfall of small 
production is inevitable, it is not necessarily ac- 
companied by all the horrible circumstances 
which are usually connected with it. We have 
seen that the disappearance of small production 
is only the last act of a long drama. The 
previous acts were taken up by the painful de- 
generation of the small producer. But the 
socialist movement has not xVt s\\%\\te'at ad- 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 

vantage to gain from this degeneration. On the 

contrary, its advantage lies all in the opposite 
direction. The more degraded the groups from 
which the proletariat is recruited the more dif- 
ficult it is to elevate the recruits to the point at 
which they are willing and able to join the ranks 
of the militant proletariat. It is upon the ex- 
tension of this division of the proletariat, how- ' 
ever, that the size and strength of the socialist 
movement depend. The fewer the demands 
made upon society by the farmer or independent 
craftsman, the more accustomed he is to cease-j 
less labor, the less resistance he will be able toj 
oflfer after he has fallen into the proletariat. Trf 
a certain extent the same causes which bring 
about the international solidarity of the workers 
lead to a solidarity with the classes wrom which 
the proletariat is recruited. 

Of course if the sinking farmer or small busi- 
ness man attempts to keep his head above water 
at the cost of the working-class, if, for example, 
he tries to lower wages or hinder tlie organiza- 
tion of labor, then he will always be opposed by 
the proletariat and by the Socialist Party. On 
the other hand, the socialist movement doe.s all 
in its power to support measures which are cal- 
culated to bring about, without injury to the 
working-class, an amelioration of conditions for 
the farmer and small business man. 

This appears unmistakably in the nature of the 
immediate demands which the socialist parties of 
different lands make on their respective govern-. 
ments. Certain of these demands are purely in- 
dustrial in their nature, designed especially ta 



214 THE CLASS STSUGGL.B 

secure the protection of the wage-earner. 

the majority are concerned with interests 
the proletariat and the other groups of the lata- ' 
ing population have in common. These indudi 
demands for such reforms as an income tax, the 
initiative and referendum, freedom of press and 
speech, election of judges, etc. 

Some of these demands are included in tbt 
platforms of bourgeois parties ; others can, in the 
nature of the case, be formulated only by an 
anti-capitalistic organization. And no bourgeois 
party will fight for them with the same energy 
as the Socialist Party, For this is the only party 
that really has an interest in relieving non- 
capitalist classes of their burdens, educating thdr 
children, and elevating their lives in generaL 
y^ Only measures of the sort proposed by the 



Socialist Party are calculated to improve the 
position of the small producers so far as it is 
possible to improve it under existing conditions. 
To assist them as producers by fortifying them 
in the retention of their outhved method of 
production, is impossible, for it is opposed to the 
course of economic development. It is equally 
impossible to make capitalists out of any con- 
siderable number of them. It is only as con- 
sumers that the mass of them can be helped at 
all. But it is precisely the parties most friendly 
to the small producers that cast upon them, as 
consumers, the heaviest burdens. These burdens 
are real, but the elevation of small production 
which is supposed to accompany them, is nothing 
more than empty pretense. 

To assist the small producer in his charact 





THE CLASS STRUGGLE 215 

, far from hindering economic develop-^ 
ment, is a means of promoting it. The better the 
position of the small fanner or small capitalist 
as consumer, the higher his standard of hving, 
the greater his physical or intellectual demands, 
the sooner will he cease the struggle against in- 
dustry on a large scale. If he is accustomed to 
a good living he will rebel against the privations 
incident to a protracted struggle, and will the 
sooner prefer to take his place with the pro- 
letariat. And he will not group himself with 
the most submissive members of this class to 
which he has joined himself. He will pass 
directly into the ranks of the miUtant, purpose- 
ful proletarians, and thus hasten the victory of 
the proletariat. 

This victory will not be bom out of degrada- 
tion, as many have believed; no more out of the 
degradation of the small producers than out of 
that of the proletariat. Socialism has as much 
cause to oppose degradation on the one side as 
on the other, and it does so to the best of its 
ability. To strengthen the socialist movement, 
therefore, is to the interest, not only of the wage- 
earners, but of all sections of the population 
which live by work and not by exploitation. 

The small business men and farmers have 
never, since the beginning of the modern state, 
been in a position to defend their interests as 
against the interests of the other classes. Today 
they are less able to do it than ever. In order to 
fight their battles, they are forced to unite with 
one or more of the other classes. The instincts 
bred by the ownership of property drive them 



216 



TBB CLASS STRUGGLE 



into the arms of the capitalist parties; dd^^| 
into coalition with one of the various groufiofH 
great property-owners. The capitalist pani(*r 
themselves seek this coalition, in part becau«T 
they need votes, in part because of more pro- 1 
found reasons. They know that today the | 
private property of the small producers is the I 
strongest support of the principle of private I 
ownership in general, and therefore of their I 
whole system of exploitation. To the good of | 
the small producer they are indifTerent. They I 
are quick to burden him as a consumer; .so far I 
as they are concerned, it makes no difference I 
how far he is shoved dovm, so long as his smai! I 
business does not perish utterly and he thus re- 
mains in the ranks of the property-owners. At 
the same time all the bourgeois parties are in- 
terested in capitalist exploitation, hence in the 
progress of economic development. They de- 
sire, indeed, to maintain the farmer and inde- 
pendent craftsman, but as a matter of fact they 
do everything in their power to extend the 
domain of industry on a large scale and thus to 
suppress all forms of small production. 

Quite different is the relation between the 
small producer and the socialist movement. 
Even if socialism can do nothing to maintain 
small production, the small producer has nothing 
to fear from it. It is the capitalists, not the pro- 
letarians, who expropriate the farmer and crafts- 
man. The victory of the proletariat is, as we 
have seen in the previous chapter, the only 
means of putting an end to this exploitation. 
'""isumers, moreover, the independent 



THE CLASS STRUGGLE 217 

producers have the same interests as the pro- 
letarians. They have, therefore, every reason to 
protect their interests by joining the SociaHst 
Party. 

It is, of course, not to be expected that they 
will quickly recognize this fact. But the stam- 
pede of the farmers and small capitalists from 
the ranks of the bourgeois parties has already 
begun. And it is a stampede of most remark- 
able character, for it is the best and bravest who 
lead the way — not to desert the field of battle, 
but rather to escape from the petty strife for 
their miserable existence into the gigantic, 
world-moving struggle for the institution of a 
society which shall give to all its members op- 
portunity to share in the great conquests of 
modern civilization, into the struggle for the 
emancipation of all civilized peoples, yes, of all 
humanity, from the bondage of a system which 
threatens to crush it. 

The more unbearable the existing system of 
production, the more evidently it is discredited, 
and the more unable the ruling parties show 
themselves to remedy our disgraceful social ills, 
the more illogical and unprincipled these parties 
become and the more they resolve themselves 
into cliques of self-seeking politicians, the great- 
er will be the numbers of those who stream from 
the non-proletarian classes into the Socialist 
Party and, hand in hand with the irresistibly 
advancing proletariat, follow its banner to 
victory and triumph. 




The Rise of the American Prole- 
tarian, by Austin Lewis, is invaluable 
to anyone desiring to understand the 
process by which the people of the 
United States in the course of two gen- 
erations have been transformed froni a 
nation of small producers owning thcdr 
tools and their product into a nation of 
big capitalists and destitute wage- 
workers. 

It is a history, written in the light of 
the Socialist theory of economic de- 
tenninism, which explains the meaning 
of many well-known events that most 
people find hard to understand. It is 
easy and pleasant reading. Cloth, 
$i.o», postpaid. 

Charles H. Kerr & Con^iany, 
lis West Kintie St., Chicago 




If we investigate the existing social institutions 
we find that every one of them fosters or protects, 
in one way or another, the economic power of the in- 
dustrial kings to-day. It is the men v^o own the 
mines, mills, railroads and factories that rule the 
world to-day. 

Gradually as new systems of production have 
evolved during the ages, the governments, the laws, 
the religions and the institutions of learning, and 
later the press, have evolved also to fit the new 
regime — to foster and to protect the new economic 
powers. 

Men who secure economic control of a nation will 
ultimately be able to dictate the form of govern- 
ment, to choose the college curriculimi, to fill the 
mouths of the clergy with teachings that shall ren- 
der docile the workers who are producing the wealth 
of the world. They are able to harness the press so 
that it shall run only in the paths leading to greater 
power for themselves. 



Every student of sociology learns that in the evo- 
lution of Society governments have changed ; new 
laws have come and gone, with new standards of 
morality. Churches have arisen or altered to meet 
the needs (unconsciously — perhaps) of the ruling 
classes of the various ages. Wise men, authors, 
poets and editors have ever sung the praises of the 
Man in Power. 

Prince Hagen is the personification of Capital- 
ism. For himself, he mocked at morality, but he 
realized fully how the present ethical and religious 
standards protect him and his class. The working- 
men arc many and we are few, he says. They are a 
thousand times more powerful than we. Only their 
religious beliefs, their moral scruples and their fear 
of the law separate them from our wealth. 

But they are "honest men," he sneers. They boast 
of their honesty. They will touch none of our prop- 
erty. 

We all know that many worklngmen toil in mis- 
ery in the hope of treasures stored up in an iwtemal 
heaven. 

As a work showing the value of existing institv 
tions for the protection and support of the capi- 
talist system of society. Prince Hagen is invaluable. 
"Ptmce Huitn" was originaSiv \«qm^'<. cwS. V 



craS.b-!f % 



r 



very respectable Boston publisher at a high price. 
There was far too much truth in it to suit the tastes 
of the capitalistic buyers to whom it was offered, 
and it was soon "out of print." 

The author has now wisely decided that wage- 
workers are the ones who will read, enjoy and cir- 
culate this book. He has therefore leased the plates 
to our co-operative publishing house, owned and 
controlled by wage-working revolutionists. 

If YOU like the book, we want your help in circu- 
lating it. We have a neat library edition in cloth 
binding at fl.OO, and will mail three copies of this 
to one address for $2.00. 

We have also a paper edition at 26 cents, and ml) 
mail six copies to one address for $1.00, or 100 
copies for f 16.00. 

You can get still lower prices by subscribing for 
a share in our co-operative publishing house. For 
particulars see "What to Read on Socialism," one 
copy of which will be mailed free. 

Address 

CHARLES H. KERR & COMPANY 
118 West Kinzie Street ... Chicago 



Industrial Problems 

By N. A. RICHARDSON ^t 

This new book will, we believe, prove Uic 
best and most effective popular text-book of 
socialism ever written. The old story of how 
the earnings of the laborer are taken from 
him by ibe capitalist is retold tn a vivid way 
that will hold the attention of even a careless 
reader. 

The author shows that each productive la- 
borer in the United States creates daily about 
flO.OO worth of goods, figured at their retail 
selling prices. The laborer gets about 52.00 as 
his wages. What becomes of the $8.00 worth? 
This the author shows in the course of the 
book, and the laborer who follows his argu- 
ment will pretty certainly want to struggle in 
the most effective way for the right to keep 
that $8.00 worth for himself. 

Cloth, 229 pages, $1.00; paper, 25c. Six paper 
copies will be mailed to one address for $100. 

Charles H. Kerr & Companyf 

118 lUnzia Street, Chicaso. 



ARE VOU WITH US? 



Onis is tlie onlj' publiitiiiie house in the United J 
SUtea that is attemptiDg in a Uige way to 
scatter the literature of revolutionary sodaliun. 
Ho capitalist is behind it; its books are aold too 
cheaply to accumulate any large surplus out of 
its sales; the way to taise the new capital 
urgently needed is for S,000 more aocialiate to 
do what 2,000 have already done — send $10.00 
each for a share of stock. 

By 80 doing you can, as explained on the nest 
P<Ee, get a discount on out books. But the main 
leasDQ why you should take a share of stock if 
you can is that by so doing you will help build 
up a great socialist publishing house, in which you 
will be joint owner. We have only made a slight 
beginning at the necessary work of socialist propa- 
ganda and education. Yet already we are scatter- 
ing $3,000 worth of socialist books and magazines 
each month. With 2,000 more stockholders we 
will double OUT output during 1910. We give a 
detailed report of each month's business in the 
International SodaUst fieview. If you are with 
us, use the blank below. 



I ft COKPAITT, 

e Straet, Oblamgo: 
Ooiamd» — anelosed find ten dollaii, In return for 
whloh piMua lini« to me a ibare of atoek In yonr 
pnbllaUug' home, fully paid and i 







A SOCIALIST SUCCESS 

The publishing house of Charles If. 
Kerr & Company was established in the 
year 1886. It was incorporated under the 
laws of Illinois in 1899. It took up the 
work of publishing socialist books in 1899, 
and in the following year it started the 
International Socialist Review. 

The growth of the publishing house 
during the next .eight years was steady 
but slow. In 1908 radical changes were 
made in the editorial staff and policy of 
the Review, and since that time the work 
of .the publishing house has been ex- 
panding rapidly. In December, 1908, an 
agreement was reached with the Appeal 
to Reason of Girard, Kansas, the greatest 
socialist weekly newspaper tn the world, 
by which it turned over its book publish^ 
ing business to us. 

The publishing house is owned by over 
2,000 socialists, nearly all of whom have 
invested just $10.00 each, the price of a 
single share. The stock draws no divi- 
dends, but it carries with it the privilege 
of buying books at a discount of forty per 
cent, postage prepaid. A share may be 
obtained by remitting ten dollars with the 
blank on the opposite side of this sheet 
properly filled out. 

CHARLES H. KERR & COMPATIYi 
118 West Kinzie Street, Chicago 



I 



a; 



STANFORD UNIVERSITY LIBRARIES 

STANFORD AUXILIARY LIBRARY 

STANFORD, CALIFORNIA 94305-6004 

(650) 723-9201 

sa!circ@sulmail. Stanford. edu 

All books are subject lo recall. 

DATE DUE 




